,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Engineer - Dashboards,-1,"Job Title: Data Engineer - Dashboards
Location: Redmond, WA
Duration: 1 Year

Summary:
Build new data processing pipelines, analysis frameworks, SQL queries, and dashboards to support our stakeholder's needs.
Securely source data from internal and external partners.
Optimize existing data structures and pipelines, implement new ones, and help maintain domain-related data pipelines.
Collaborate with Environmental, Health, and Safety personnel as well as cross-functional partners, and data engineering/science resources to design and develop solutions.
Continuously improve data processing, analysis, and reporting processes.

Skills:

Experience building interactive dashboards using Tableau, Qlikview, or similar Business Intelligence tools
Experience with scripting or coding (Python, etc) and SQL

Additional Skills
Experience with developing end-to-end analysis frameworks
Experience with big data technology such as Hive or Spark
Experience with data management best practices
Understanding of frameworks, tools, and infrastructure
Ability to work autonomously, set agendas and prioritize work with minimal input
Ability to thrive in a dynamic and fast-paced operational environment
Experience with Markdown, LaTeX Experience using Jupyter
Experience with automating routine tasks and operations (crontab, launchd, Bash, Python, etc.)

Education:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering, Physics, or similar field
5+ years of experience in a data engineer or data science role

IND123",4.5,"Ursus
4.5","Redmond, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
1,Data Analyst/ Data Consultant/ Data Engineer,-1,"At Vaco, we connect professionals with excellent career growth opportunities! Our team helps you get the advantage over your competitors through our direct access to HR departments and hiring managers. We currently have an exciting opportunity for an experienced Data Analyst/ Data Consultant/ Data Engineer. Apply with Vaco, and we will advocate on your behalf! We promote your strengths and experience and help prepare you for your interview by supplying you with key information about our client's background and expectations. We provide great insight about trends in the market and keep you up to date on compensation expectations, company culture and growth opportunities.

The Data Analyst/ Data Consultant/ Data Engineer, will be responsible for collecting, analyzing and reporting data. Ensuring the integrity of such data and generate reports that verify and document their accuracy. This position will be working in a deadline-oriented, fast-paced environment as part of a team consisting of consulting and operations staff. The teams' goal is to provide superior service to states and large school districts in the areas of special education management systems, data warehousing, federal claiming, and other programs. The Data Analyst/ Data Consultant/ Data Engineer role revolves around technology, policy and financial management functions.

The Data Analyst/ Data Consultant/ Data Engineer will be responsible for reviewing, formatting, importing/exporting, transforming, validating or modeling data with the purpose of understanding or drawing conclusions to drive strategical and operational decision-making. The positions responsibilities include presenting data in charts, graphs and tables as well as designing and developing system embedded processes and manual verification methods for collecting and analyzing data.

Responsibilities of the Data Analyst/ Data Consultant/ Data Engineer role include:

Compiling data and analyzing results
Preparing and distributing reports
Ensuring data integrity
Developing and producing reports utilized in measuring data accuracy
Assisting in the completion of appropriate client set-up and maintenance forms
Supporting internal and external users
Creating exception reports to identify fields of incorrect data
Generating custom reports for internal and external clients
Supporting the organization's quality program

Position Overview:

The Data Analyst/ Data Consultant/ Data Engineer will be interacting with the Product Owner of Risk Data Mart and the Enterprise Data Management Team to organize current data in the banking and financial service industries. This position would do some of the hands-on work but would also be coordinating with the other DataStage or Cognos developers.

The Business has a lot of EDW (Enterprise Data Warehouse) ongoing enhancements
Consulting will be working with Business to prioritize these enhancements
Cleaning up historical data
Sharpening data SQL logic that happens before reporting
SQL prototyping that demonstrates the output the Business wants to see

Position Requirements:

Analytical Skills: Analysts work with large amounts of data: facts, figures and number crunching. Must have the ability to design and execute import and export processes as well as recognize the existence (or absence) of patterns in the data. This Data Analyst/ Data Consultant/ Data Engineer requires strong SQL experience and thorough understanding.

Communication Skills: Must communicate well with clients, team members, and ancillary resources. This includes both presenting ideas or findings, as well as drawing out client or team member key concerns or other relevant information.
Attention to Detail: The conclusions drawn from this data analysis will drive critical departmental initiatives. Accuracy and attention to detail are paramount.
Software implementation activities including training, site preparation, and project management.
Documents client discussions, gather requirements and engages technical team as it relates to the emerging data structure and reporting needs, in close partnership with the project leads
Maintains data dictionaries, data flow diagrams, etc. for EDPlan reports and related functions
Ability to dig in with the Business and asking a ton of insightful questions
Previous experience utilizing Cognos, DB2, SQL - Structured Query Language
Database skills- SQL knowledge is a necessary
Strong analytical skills, including the ability to analyze and organize data
Excellent organizational, oral presentation and written communication skills
Research and project management capabilities preferred
DataStage is their ETL tool, but the Consultant doesn't have to be DataStage expert (some experience or familiarity would be great)

Data Analyst/ Data Consultant/ Data Engineer Position Preferences:

Cognos or other reporting background
DB2 and Netezza familiarity
Unix/ Linux
Banking or Financial service background
Loans/ ALS
CIS
Customer data
Credit Cards/ Deposits

Job #162269",3.4,"Vaco
3.4","Raleigh, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
2,Senior Software Engineer - React,$96k-$189k (Glassdoor Est.),"We're looking for experienced, talented and highly motivated software engineers to join our team. As a growth stage technology company, Clear Capital is seeking developers eager to be part of a team, working closely with every part of the company from graphic designers to our executive team.

What you’ll do
Write high quality, well-tested, extensible and scalable code
Evaluate the short- and long-term implications of every implementation decision
You’ll work with a tight-knit team solving tough problems by building quality enterprise solutions with a professional design and coding process
Learn from accomplished developers through mentoring and committed collaboration and take your dev chops to the next level
Make an immediate impact by quickly getting up to speed and building features from start to finish
Who we’re looking for
You write modular, reusable code and have experience building and maintaining internal libraries
You love tackling really tough problems, and value the correct solution over a sloppy one
You have a passion for software development, with side projects to prove it
You understand the value of tested solutions, and you’re a capable debugger
You’re comfortable reading & writing code, and can describe what each part of the code is doing
You’re great at taking constructive feedback on your work
You’re passionate about our mission to disrupt how banks, lenders and investors value real estate
Our tool kit

We believe in using the most effective tool for the job, and also relying on the strengths of our team. While most of our engineers lean toward front- or back-end development, we encourage full-stack learning which makes our team nimble enough to tackle the diverse set of challenges we face. Here are the key technologies that we use:
Modern JavaScript
React, Redux, Reselect, Material UI
HTML, JSX
CSS, Styled Components
Storybook
D3
Jest, Testing Library
Node
Webpack, Jenkins
Git
Atlassian (Jira, Confluence, BitBucket)
Why you’ll love it
Disrupt the Real Estate data industry by bringing cloud based, enterprise software and data services to the market for big banks, lenders and investors
See your work move into production quickly, and avoid the bureaucracy that slows down larger companies
Enjoy a modern office layout that is quiet, yet collaborative surrounded by top quality engineers that enjoy working with each other
Receive great benefits like 401(k) match, and health benefits, PTO and paid holidays
Work with a growth oriented company that is transforming itself and an industry where you can have a real impact on the company's future
About Us

Clear Capital is the premier provider of real estate valuation, analytics, and technology solutions. Powered by its more than 45 years worth of information on nearly every U.S. metro, neighborhood, and property, Clear Capital’s solutions are trusted by community credit unions and billion-dollar financial institutions alike. Clear Capital is headquartered in Reno-Tahoe with a team of more than 500 nationwide, dedicated to going wherever it leads, and doing whatever it takes.

To all recruitment agencies: Clear Capital does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Clear Capital employees, or any other company location. Clear Capital is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.

Compensation

Salary commensurate with experience

Clear Capital is an equal opportunity employer",4.0,"Clear Capital
4.0","Reno, NV",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
3,Data Architect,$86k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"GEICO is looking for an IT Data Architect for the Decision Sciences and Business Transformation (DSaT) Data Consumption team where we work to make GEICO enterprise data usable and easily accessible for our internal customers. We are looking for a highly motivated, high energy, self-starter, problem solver, with a positive attitude, a strong work ethic, and solid interpersonal and communication skills. Must have intellectual curiosity and a desire to learn new skills and technologies.

Qualifications:
Minimum 4 years’ experience as an IT Data Architect

Able to gather requirements from both IT and the Business partners

Demonstrate the ability to create high quality technical artifacts such as Source to Target Mappings (STMs) and Record Level Specifications (RLS)

Data Warehouse experience. Candidate must have experience with designing Data Warehouse schemas (3NF model) as well as Data Mart schemas (Dimensional model)

Familiarity with XML/JSON schemas
Perform data profiling using SQL

Prototype ETL transformation logic using Advanced SQL techniques

Actively participate in data architecture and project discussions

Ability to thrive while working on ambiguous or challenging projects

Able to multi-task under tight deadlines

Able to work independently as well as be a strong team player

Proficient with erwin Data Modeler and MS Office Suite

Big Data experience

Preferred Skills:

P&C Insurance Subject Area Model experience (i.e. Policy, Sales, Service, Claims, and Billing systems)

UNIX command line and vi editor skills
Databases: Preferably DB2 and/or Netezza
Big Data Experience. Hadoop, Hive, Linux.

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

Benefits:

As a full-time IT Architect, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**

Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave

401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
Tuition Reimbursement
Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
4,Electrical Engineer II - Juneau,-1,"Company: Electric Power Systems, Inc.

Location: Juneau, AK

Base Pay: $55,000 – $65,000 / Year DOE

Employee Type: Full Time Position

Job Type: Engineering

Req’d Education: BSEE Degree

Req’d Experience: 1+ Year required

Req’d Travel: Yes

Contact: Melanie Coar

Description:

Electric Power Systems, Inc is a unique company offering a wide range of experience and education in the area of power system operations, design, consultation and studies. We provide extensive services from planning studies, design and construction, to periodic testing and maintenance. We are currently seeking a skilled Electrical Engineer to join our Anchorage team.

Responsibilities:

This person will be responsible for the support and performance of distribution line design and planning, including overhead and underground line extensions and rebuilds, structure and guying strength calculations, clearance reviews, right-of-way requirement determinations, one-lines, protective device coordination, short circuit calculations, and operation of system modelling and planning software. The person will be responsible for developing means and methods of tracking project design status and data requests, design coordination, design progress submissions to client, and incorporating and responding to comments from clients.

Benefits:

Electric Power Systems offers a great benefit package including Medical Insurance, Life Insurance, Long Term Disability, 401 (k) Plan, Employee Assistance Program, Paid Vacation and Paid Holidays.

Electric Power Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Affirmative Action employer that values diversity at all levels. We consider candidates for all positions on the basis of qualifications and without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, disability and any other legally protected status. Minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply. We are an EEO/AA employer.

Electric Power Systems, Inc. is a smoke free and drug free company.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Electrical Engineering: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Alaska (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.epsinc.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"Electric Power Systems, Inc
3.9",Alaska,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
5,"Electrical Engineer II - Anchorage, Alaska",-1,"Electrical Engineer II*
Company: Electric Power Systems, Inc.

Location: Anchorage, AK

Base Pay: $55,000 – $65,000 / Year DOE

Employee Type: Full Time Position

Job Type: Engineering

Req’d Education: BSEE Degree

Req’d Experience: 1+ Year required

Req’d Travel: Yes

Contact: Melanie Coar

Description:

Electric Power Systems, Inc is a unique company offering a wide range of experience and education in the area of power system operations, design, consultation and studies. We provide extensive services from planning studies, design and construction, to periodic testing and maintenance. We are currently seeking a skilled Electrical Engineer to join our Anchorage team.

Responsibilities:

This person will be responsible for the support and performance of distribution line design and planning, including overhead and underground line extensions and rebuilds, structure and guying strength calculations, clearance reviews, right-of-way requirement determinations, one-lines, protective device coordination, short circuit calculations, and operation of system modelling and planning software. The person will be responsible for developing means and methods of tracking project design status and data requests, design coordination, design progress submissions to client, and incorporating and responding to comments from clients.

Benefits:

Electric Power Systems offers a great benefit package including Medical Insurance, Life Insurance, Long Term Disability, 401 (k) Plan, Employee Assistance Program, Paid Vacation and Paid Holidays.

Electric Power Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Affirmative Action employer that values diversity at all levels. We consider candidates for all positions on the basis of qualifications and without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, disability and any other legally protected status. Minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply. We are an EEO/AA employer.

Electric Power Systems, Inc. is a smoke free and drug free company.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
Electrical Engineering: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Alaska (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.epsinc.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"Electric Power Systems, Inc
3.9",Alaska,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
6,Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst,$62k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst

Join a member-driven leader in a fast-paced, challenging and collaborative environment with the shared mission of supporting America’s network of rural electric cooperatives. Since its formation in 1969, National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation, or CFC, located in Dulles, Virginia, has provided capital and industry-leading financial products to more than 900 not-for-profit, consumer-controlled utility systems across the United States. Our exceptional team delivers the “CFC Difference” that encompasses our values of service, integrity and excellence in all our interactions.

CFC has a need for a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst in the BID - Industry Research & Analysis group. In this position you will maintain a high-degree of industry expertise and awareness of current developments in markets, regulations and technologies by conducting research and data analysis on emerging industry trends in the energy and utility sectors. This role contributes to CFC’s thought leadership through expertise and knowledge that is used to support management decision-making and identify areas where CFC can provide value to its utility member-owners with innovative financing products and services and business support tools.

As a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst, you will:

• Monitor and conduct analysis of evolving industry, regulatory and technology short and long term trends and developments and their impacts on the electric utility industry and electric cooperatives.
• Utilize data mining and various data analytics techniques including visualization, statistical modeling, regression and probabilistic analyses (e.g. Monte Carlo simulations) to create models that inform risk and opportunity based decision-making.
• Develop economic and financial analytical models and tools capable of forecasting financial performance for use in budgeting, scenario planning and strategic planning.
• Serve as a leader and resource for industry data, market intelligence and modeling expertise to internal and external stakeholders through industry meetings, conferences, membership meetings and other venues.
• Conduct financial and economic analysis of utility investment scenarios through pro forma analysis.
• Work collaboratively across all functions while building strong relationships and credibility through joint research and analysis.

To be successful, you will need:

• Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Finance, Engineering or other related field.
• Master’s degree in one of the above preferred.
• 8 years of experience in any combination of the following electric utility industry, consulting, finance, or economic forecast modeling and data analytics.
• Strong data mining, data analysis and modeling skills.
• Advanced knowledge of various database and analysis tools (e.g. Visual Basic, SQL, Qlikview, Monte Carlo, artificial intelligence techniques and statistical programming languages) and ability to build forecast models.
• Proficiency in regression analysis techniques and in extracting value from big data sets by leveraging business intelligence tools (e.g. Power BI, Tableau).
• Proven ability to work collaboratively and effectively in a matrixed and team environment and across the organization at all levels.
• Strong and effective verbal, written and presentation communication skills.
• Ability to work effectively in a consultative role.
• Highly organized, with ability to prioritize and manage multiple assignments in a dynamic work environment while maintaining high quality and error free work with minimal supervision.

We offer a comprehensive benefits package that includes short-term and long-term incentive opportunities; an employer-paid pension plan; 401(k); medical, dental and vision insurance; a generous leave policy; onsite gym; and more—all in a friendly, professional work environment. For additional information, please visit our website at www.nrucfc.coop.

CFC is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity.",3.4,"National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation
3.4","Dulles, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
7,Hydrogeologist / Environmental Engineer (Mid to Senior-level),$49k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Integral Consulting Inc. *(www.integral-corp.com) provides technical insight, strategy, and project delivery to help our clients move forward in an evolving world. We seek to achieve this mission by creating a business culture of client service, technical excellence, innovation, and collaboration. Equally, we hold ourselves to strong internal commitments to health and safety, sustainability, diversity, mutual respect, collegiality, and the professional development of our staff.
We are currently seeking a Hydrogeologist, Hydrologist, Geologist, or Environmental Engineer in Syracuse, NY. * The desired candidate will be a detail-oriented team player who can provide technical support and project management to client projects.
Day-to-Day Responsibilities *
As a Hydrogeologist, Hydrologist, Geologist or Environmental Engineer, your job functions will include, but not be limited to:
Implementation of hydrogeologic investigations, including site characterization, preparation and implementation of field sampling programs, and data evaluations
Field sampling and/or sampling oversight
Task management
Communicating technical information to varied audiences (e.g., clients, staff, regulators, and stakeholders)
Technical report writing
Qualifications *
Candidates should hold a Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Geology, Hydrogeology, Civil or Environmental Engineering, or related scientific/engineering field.

The ideal candidate will have:
4 to 10 years of experience
Remedial Investigation/Feasibility Study experience at both upland and sediment sites
Remedial design experience
Experience in environmental field sampling plan development and execution
CAD and/or GIS skills desirable
Strong quantitative and problem solving skills
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Proficiency with current MS Office products (Work, Excel, and PowerPoint)
Possess strong organizational abilities
Ability to work independently and within a multidisciplinary team of scientists and engineers
A desire to grow both intellectually and professionally
40-hour OSHA HAZWOPER Training Certification desirable
HOW TO APPLY: * https://www.integral-corp.com/career/hydrogeologist-environmental-engineer/
APPLICANTS MUST SUBMIT A COVER LETTER*
Competitive salary is commensurate with experience. Integral Consulting Inc. provides an exceptional benefits package with company-subsidized insurance, and an exciting work environment with opportunities for significant professional growth.

All offers of employment are contingent on candidates passing a background screening that includes employment history, criminal background, Federal Watch List, a drug and alcohol screening, and, if applicable, a degree verification. Candidates will receive a written notice of this requirement. All screenings will be done in accordance with all local, state, and federal laws.
We are proud to be an equal employment opportunity employer and are committed to a proactive program of affirmative action and diversity development.*
Integral Consulting Inc. provides equal opportunity in all of our employment practices to all qualified employees and applicants without regard to race; color; religion; gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions); national origin; age; sexual orientation; disability; marital status; military, veteran, or Vietnam Era Veterans’ Readjustment Assistance Act protected veteran status; gender identity or gender expression; or any other category protected by federal, state, and local laws. The “EEO is the Law” poster can be viewed here: http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc\_self\_print\_poster.pdf.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
How many years of experience do you have with remedial investigations/feasibility studies at both upland and sediment sites in New York state?
How many years of experience in environmental field sampling plan development and execution do you have?

Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.8,"Integral Consulting Inc.
3.8","Syracuse, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
8,Network Engineer IV,$50k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Opportunity:

We are seeking a talented Network Engineer IV to be responsible for end-to-end delivery and support of infrastructure solutions to our Clients. Working with Development, Product, Operations and other Delivery teams, the Network Engineer IV will design, deliver, maintain, and support infrastructure solutions that are technically sound, resilient to failure, operationally supportable, and meet the requirements of the business.

What You Can Look Forward to:
The ability to actively contribute to the architecture, design and implementation of LAN/WAN/Cloud technologies/processes for market leading financial services solutions in a global multi data center environment.
This role also requires independent, technical leadership skills, ensuring projects are delivered within scope and on-time.
Primary responsibilities include direct contribution of architecting, developing and maintaining the security posture of our consumer facing products through technology and process in order to adequately protect CO-OP assets and customer data.
Additional responsibilities include ongoing engineering management for the current LAN/WAN/Cloud infrastructure as well as supporting the implementation of LAN/WAN/Cloud technology to protect information systems’ assets from intentional or inadvertent modification, disclosure or destruction.
The ideal candidate will have experience and direct knowledge of managing LAN/WAN/Cloud infrastructure in large complex global multi-data center environments where financial services are present.
A high degree of collaboration with other Infrastructure teams is required to provide right level of agility within a defined delivery process.
The ideal candidate will leverage a consultative approach, exhibit strong leadership skills, be forward thinking, and be able to work effectively across a multitude of technical and non-technical groups in a diverse and talented team, continuously striving for excellence.
The Network engineering team is a point of escalation for operational issues, and will have some expectations regarding tier 3 support.
Additional support related tasks may include major upgrade / patch planning and coordination, capacity planning, technical roadmaps, platform health-checks and will be involved in any significant quality issues for the existing infrastructure.
Security is a critical design requirement and data, systems, and applications must be protected at all points of the development lifecycle.
Communicate consistently and effectively with internal business partners to understand appropriate business requirements.
Assist project team members in developing scope documents, the development of project estimates.
Communicate consistently and effectively with internal business partners to understand appropriate business requirements.
Adhere to Agile principles and philosophies (Scrum or Kanban, as applicable) in fulfillment of the role.
Collaborate within the direct team in accordance with Team Agreement, Definition of Ready, and Definition of Done.
Work as a cross-functional team member in an Agile setting to help complete and deliver the team commitments.
Collaborate across teams and across business areas in the spirit of an Agile mindset.
Fulfill the role in the spirit of the Agile Manifesto, with emphasis on delivery of incremental value with frequent iterations and feedback loops.
Responsible for reporting risks that are identified to the appropriate team and/or management. Additionally, responsible for managing, monitoring and reporting risks within the scope of your work area, to include, but not limited to Information Security risks.
Actively supports our CO-OP culture and embraces our core values of Work as Partners, Communicate Openly and Honestly, Demonstrate Excellence and Champion Change in all interactions.
What Youâll Need to Succeed:
BS in Computer Science / Computer Information Systems or equivalent degree, or equivalent experience can be substituted for degree.
5+ years' experience with cloud computer technologies, Azure, AWS, etc
10+ years’ experience with routers, firewalls, switches and other network related equipment.
10+ years previous systems management experience required.
MCP/MCSA, CCNA, CCNP, CCIE Security+, and VCP certifications or equivalent experience required.
Familiarity with Microsoft Windows Server, Microsoft Exchange, Microsoft Office Professional and Internet applications.
Advanced analytical, design and problem-solving skills at multi-product/multi-environment level to troubleshoot system defects and mitigate the issues they cause.
Expert skills in research and analysis, project planning and implementation. Understanding and awareness of business issues as they impact overall project plans.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills, with an ability to express and document complex technical concepts in business terms. Person must be able to communicate effectively verbally and in writing with technical staff, non-technical staff, end-users for requirements gathering, testing, training, and outcome validation. Good English-language skills, both verbal and written.
Excellent team-oriented interpersonal and communication skills and ability to work effectively in a cross-functional project team environment.
Expert understanding of concepts of project planning and project management techniques to assist in small projects and/or group initiatives.
Architect, Design, and implement enterprise grade network LAN/WAN/Cloud infrastructure solutions to protect and support direct consumer facing solutions.
Participate in leading and defining best of class security practices for enterprise LAN/WAN/Cloud networks providing high-volume financial services transactions.
Deploy solutions to conform to current and future Security certifications (PCI, NCUA) and CO-OP policy standards.
Develop and maintain architectural documents, engineering guidelines and procedures in support of CO-OP’s Best Practices.
Performance tuning, and crash dump analysis; analyze the root cause of incidents.
Create in-depth documentation of network environment, processes and system configuration.
Participate in regular Sunday morning maintenance windows and after hour support calls.
Provide periodic Tier 3 support for the WAN Network Infrastructure.
Drive Continual Service Improvement.
Knowledge of financial networks, extensive firewall knowledge and transaction processing systems is preferred.
Why Join CO-OP?:

CO-OP is committed to fostering a workplace where every employee feels valued, respected, and connected. We are dedicated to understanding, attracting and engaging a diverse workforce where every employee can live up to their value; ensuring that our employee base reflects the consumers we serve. The result of this effort is an inclusive environment where diverse talent thrives. You will be part of an organization that focuses on a strong culture and embodies the credit union movement philosophy of People Helping People. CO-OP’s commitment to reflecting our own core values and purpose extends beyond how we serve our clients and the products that we deliver.

With more than 35 years of industry leadership, CO-OP Financial Services is the largest, most comprehensive credit union service organization in the nation. CO-OP serves as THE credit union technology engine, bringing payments solutions, engagement services and strategic counsel to help credit unions optimize member experiences to consistently provide seamless, personalized multi-channel offerings, while delivering secure, sophisticated fraud mitigation service.

CO-OP serves more than 3,000 client credit unions, with 60 million debit and credit cardholders, nearly 30,000 surcharge-free ATMs and more than 5,600 shared branches nationwide. Our vast technological ecosystem facilitates more than 6.5 billion transactions every year and equips credit unions of all sizes to deepen member engagement and prosper in the fast-paced world of fintech.

The Perks:
Fun, challenging and, collaborative work environment with passionate colleagues that care deeply about the intersection of technology and human-centered financial services.
Great Work/Life Benefits – Paid Time Off (PTO), Maternity, Parental, Family Care, Adoption Leave Programs, Community Volunteer Time Off, and 10 Paid Holidays.
Health benefits – medical, dental, & vision plus wellness programs and gym reimbursements.
401K with generous company match.
Tuition reimbursement.

#Lisa",3.1,"CO-OP Financial Services
3.1","Des Moines, IA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
9,Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$66k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role

Youll be part of the team that enables the database to scale larger without compromising on consistency. The ability to scale-out the database can lead to higher query throughput and faster single query performance.

You will help design and implement innovative features to efficiently maintain consistency even in the face of frequent updates made to a database that is comprised of very many nodes. To accomplish this, youll leverage your knowledge of distributed systems, networking, and systems level programming. Its an exciting time to join the team.

The amount of data stored and analyzed is growing fast, as is the number of transactions and queries processed per second. In response our engineers are constantly thinking of new ways to scale larger.
Required skills
C/C++
Proficient with multi-threaded applications
Customer focused with the ability to work in a cross-functional team with QA, documentation and others
Advanced knowledge of algorithms and data structures
Excellent communication
Desired skills
Distributed systems
Experience with relational databases, such as Oracle, SQL Server, etc.
Willingness and ability to mentor interns and junior team members
SQL
About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2

#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
10,Process Manufacturing Engineer-Nights,$43k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Abbott Rapid Diagnostics is part of Abbott’s Diagnostics family of businesses, bringing together exceptional teams of experts and industry leading technologies to support diagnostic testing which provides important information for treatment and management of diseases and other conditions.

The position of Manufacturing Controls Engineer is within our Infectious Disease Developed Markets business unit located at Scarborough, Maine. In this role you will be responsible for supporting product development from concept through sustained manufacturing of FDA regulated products. Completion of process development, equipment acquisition and leadership of supporting development partners.

This job description will be reviewed periodically and is subject to change by management.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

· Process development, equipment specification, acquisition and implementation.

· Evaluation of machine logic and controls to troubleshoot equipment and identify process improvement opportunities.

· Integration of controls hardware and software into new and existing manufacturing equipment.

· Design of experiments, validation, completion of testing and analysis of data.

· Suggests and supports new methods or materials for continual improvement of quality and efficiency.

· Analyzes current equipment for process suitability and provides detailed plans for improvement

· Creates and revises manufacturing documents, specifications, standard operating procedures (SOPs), safety instructions, validation protocols, risk assessments, and procedures and other technical documents to ensure compliant, efficient and safe procedures

· Works with other engineers and technicians in developing solutions and improvements in materials, equipment and process as necessary

· Actively participates in teams as necessary to ensure continual improvement, safety and compliance

· Lead cross functional project teams and coordinate activities.

Abbott Rapid Diagnostics is part of Abbott’s Diagnostics family of businesses, bringing together exceptional teams of experts and industry leading technologies to support diagnostic testing which provides important information for treatment and management of diseases and other conditions.

The position of Manufacturing Controls Engineer is within our Infectious Disease Developed Markets business unit located at Scarborough, Maine. In this role you will be responsible for supporting product development from concept through sustained manufacturing of FDA regulated products. Completion of process development, equipment acquisition and leadership of supporting development partners.

This job description will be reviewed periodically and is subject to change by management.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

· Process development, equipment specification, acquisition and implementation.

· Evaluation of machine logic and controls to troubleshoot equipment and identify process improvement opportunities.

· Integration of controls hardware and software into new and existing manufacturing equipment.

· Design of experiments, validation, completion of testing and analysis of data.

· Suggests and supports new methods or materials for continual improvement of quality and efficiency.

· Analyzes current equipment for process suitability and provides detailed plans for improvement

· Creates and revises manufacturing documents, specifications, standard operating procedures (SOPs), safety instructions, validation protocols, risk assessments, and procedures and other technical documents to ensure compliant, efficient and safe procedures

· Works with other engineers and technicians in developing solutions and improvements in materials, equipment and process as necessary

· Actively participates in teams as necessary to ensure continual improvement, safety and compliance

· Lead cross functional project teams and coordinate activities.

BASIC QUALIFICATIONS | EDUCATION:

· Bachelor's degree (BS) in engineering or equivalent combination of education and experience.

· Minimum two years engineering experience in a manufacturing environment. P

· Previous experience with common manufacturing automation technologies and architectures. This includes but is not limited to:

o Programmable Logic Controllers (PLC’s)

o Human Machine Interfaces (HMI)

o Motion Control to include Servo Drives, VFD’s and Stepper Drives.

o Robots (preferred)

o Vision Systems

o Electrical Aptitude

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

· Experience working in a GMP, FDA, ISO and USDA regulated environment.

· Prior experience with Staubli and/or Epson.

· Prior experience with Allen Bradley Logix5000.

· Prior Allen-Bradley Factory Talk View experience.

· Prior Cognex and/or Keyence experience.",3.7,"Abbott Laboratories
3.7","Scarborough, ME",-1,10000+ Employees,1888,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1
11,Software Development Engineer - CloudWatch,-1,"· 4+ years of professional software development experience
· 3+ years of programming experience with at least one modern language such as Java, C++, or C# including object-oriented design
· 2+ years of experience contributing to the architecture and design (architecture, design patterns, reliability and scaling) of new and current systems

Come change the way the world sees the Cloud!

Amazon CloudWatch gives customers actionable visibility into the health of their applications and services. Today we run one of the largest time-series data stores on the planet and teams in CloudWatch solve problems of massive metric ingestion, distributed systems/cloud computing, data visualization, log processing and analytics, anomaly detection, and predictive analytics. Our services are the “eyes and ears” for customers everywhere, both inside Amazon along with AWS customers across the world.

We are looking for software development engineers that are passionate about creating application software that underpins the robust CloudWatch system. On any given day, we use Python, Java, SQL, Lambda, DynamoDB, and CloudFormation, as well as other public AWS services and a host of Amazon-internal tools. We don’t expect you to be an expert in, or necessarily even be familiar with, all of the technologies listed above, but we do expect you to be excited to learn about them!

This position involves on-call responsibilities, typically for one week every two months. We don’t like getting paged in the middle of the night or on the weekend, so we work to ensure that our systems are fault tolerant. When we do get paged, we work together to resolve the root cause so that don’t get paged for the same issue twice.

Our team is dedicated to supporting new team members. We are partnered with a team of mostly mid-level engineers who enjoy helping new engineers grow through one-on-one mentoring and thorough, but kind, code reviews.

We take code reviews seriously. We believe that good code reviews raise our code quality, grow our technical acumen, and provide opportunities to support and share knowledge with each other.

We care about your career growth. We try to assign projects and tasks based on what will help each team member develop into a more well-rounded engineer and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

Our team is family-oriented and values work-life balance. Most days, our team is located in our northern VA office, but we’re also flexible when people occasionally need to work from home. We generally keep core in-office hours from 10am to 4pm. About half of us come in earlier and the other half of us stay later.

We are building a new team from scratch, and we're looking for a new members who are enthusiastic, empathetic, curious, motivated, and reliable; someone who will help us build the positive team culture we’ve been cultivating.

· Proficient in GoLang programming
· Administrative knowledge in both Linux and Windows
· Hands on working experience with containers
· Experience with open source software development
· Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal
· Experience with Agile engineering practices (continuous integration, continuous release, etc.)",-1,"Amazon Dev Center U.S., Inc.","Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
12,Network Operating Center (NOC) - IT Systems Engineer,$32k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Network Operating Center – Systems Engineer (NOC-SE) is an experienced IT support professional working onsite in our data center to provide around the clock support to a variety of clients. The NOC-SE assumes responsibility for the 24x7x365 monitoring of the data center and our client's critical systems. In this role you are expected to provide exceptional customer service and technical support for both internal and external clients and products. Additionally, the NOC-SE performs Data Center activities/inspections and assists the managed services teams with technical support , such as desktop/server, software, smartphones, printers and Active Directory admin functions (creating/deleting users, managing groups, managing distribution lists and public folders, etc.) Please see ""Special Requirements"" section for position hours.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Ability to handle Prioritization, Escalation & Incidents
Works with the Technical Services/Managed Services teams to monitor and respond to events to ensure client system uptime and stability
Provides intermediate desktop OS support and includes new hardware deployments.
Provides basic technical support for each client’s server-based systems and environment as a whole
Provides basic technical support for each client’s collaborative technology, including email and unified communication systems
Provides basic technical support for each client’s virtualization and shared storage environments
Provides basic technical support for each client’s data network, including configuration, performance and security
Ensures change control and other processes and procedures are followed and that configuration documentation is completed when systems are deployed and/or modified
Monitor critical Data Center Infrastructure (i.e. HVAC, Electrical Infrastructure, Fire Suppression, Physical Security, and Access Control)
Detailed utilization and time tracking through a ticketing system
Review & Act on NOC Incident Reports
Perform Data Center Inspections
Oversee Customer Visit Escorts
Compiles Tape Rotations and DataSafe Reporting
Manages Hardware OS Staging and Installations
Handles Cabling and Cross-connects
Provides first line end-user technical support via phone, email, ticketing system
JOB QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS:

A) Knowledge/Skill/Ability
An individual must be able to perform each essential job duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required:
1+ year experience with system monitoring in a NOC environment
1+ year experience within a Data Center
Must pass internal NOC certification.
Basic level knowledge of TCP/IP, networking (DNS, DHCP, PING)
Intermediate knowledge of desktop operating systems and configurations (Windows 7, 8, and 10), server operating systems (Windows) and productivity software (Office, Outlook, etc)
Knowledge of Active Directory and email administration
Ability to manage O365\M365 Tenants i.e. License, User management, etc.
Ability to identify, through troubleshooting critical issues and escalate appropriately
Analytical and process-oriented approach to issue resolution and assigned tasks
Intermediate level diagnostic method and skills in a variety of environments
Understanding of concepts, such as virtualization, share storage, networking and thin-client technology
Effective both independently and as a member of a team
Highly effective interpersonal and organizational skills
Effective verbal and written communication
B) Education
Some formal IT training and/or certification preferred
1 year of experience in a Tier 1 technical support capacity
Relevant Certifications:
M365 Certified: Modern Desktop Administrator Associate (MD-100, MD-101), Enterprise Administrator Expert (MS-100, MS101)
C) Special Requirements
Will be required to work 12 hour shifts from 12:00am-12:00pm including holidays and weekends. Overtime as needed.
D) Physical Requirements
The physical requirements described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job:
Must be able to sit for extended periods of time, performing work on a computer
Must be able to periodically lift parcels weighing in excess of 50 pounds and 100 pounds occasionally
Job Title: Network Operating Center - System Engineer
Division: Technical Services
Location: Kansas City, KS
Reports To: Data Center Manager
FLSA Status: Non-Exempt",3.2,"NetStandard
3.2","Kansas City, KS",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
13,SAP Maintenance Master Data Engineer,-1,"L&T Technology Services Limited (LTTS) is a listed subsidiary of Larsen & Toubro Limited focused on Engineering and R&D (ER&D) services. We offer consultancy, design, development and testing services across the product and process development life cycle. Our customer base includes 52 Fortune 500 companies and 51 of the world’s top ER&D companies, across industrial products, medical devices, transportation, telecom & hi-tech, and the process industries. Headquartered in India, we have over 14,700 employees spread across 17 global design centers, 27 global sales offices and 48 innovation labs as of December 31, 2018. For additional information about L&T Technology Services log on to www.LntTechservices.com

Job Title: SAP Maintenance Master Data Technician

Seeking a skilled technical resource with 5 years experience in the maintenance reliability or design fields. The ideal candidate will have experience in:
Hands on equipment maintenance and management
Management of timelines and work outline
Able to read schematics and technical drawings
Working Knowledge of MircoSoft® suite
Working in a team environment, multiple customers
Consideration given to those with robotics and automation experience
Job Duties:
Perform asset walk down for equipment
Creation of Functional Locations in SAP up to 6th level (this will be trained)
Critical Assessment of equipment
Creation of Maintenance task list based on OEM recommendations
Creation of Maintenance Actives
Maintenance Planning & Scheduling
Creation of Bill of materials
Successful candidate will possess and demonstrate these attributes:
Dedication to collaborative work environment and committed to team success.2. Works for win-win scenarios, whenever possible
Internally motivated, goal driven, biased toward action
History of success and overcoming adversity
Experienced with multilayered matrix organizations
Have a Technology Degree or Military Equivalent
Communicates in timely, honest, candid, direct, and concise manager in all environments
Willing to work out of Anderson, Indiana location",4.1,"L&T TECHNOLOGY SERVICES LIMITED
4.1","Anderson, IN",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
14,Principal Software Engineer,$70k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"Secure our Nation, Ignite your Future

Become an integral part of a diverse team while working at an Industry Leading Organization, where our employees come first. At ManTech International Corporation, you’ll help protect our national security while working on innovative projects that offer opportunities for advancement.
Currently, ManTech is seeking a motivated, career and customer-oriented CNO Developer to join our team in the Hanover , MD .
Responsibility include, but are not limited too:
Expert knowledge of multiple programming languages such as C/C++, assembly (e.g. x86, ARM, MIPS), Python, or PERL.
Familiar with multiple software development methodologies (e.g. Scrum, TDD, Waterfall).
Expert level knowledge of security concepts, networks, device drivers, & system internals are applied in daily tasks.
Expert knowledge in at least one technology area (e.g. Windows, Unix, Mobile, Network devices).
Communicates status with leadership and customers. Contributes to the completion of milestones associated with specific projects.
Provides solutions to a variety of complex technical problems.
Determines computer user needs; analyzes system capabilities to resolve problems on program intent, output requirements, input data acquisition, programming.
Ensures software standards are met. Leads the design, development, documenting, testing and debugging of applications software and systems that contain logical and mathematical solutions.
Able to lead a project developing hardware or software based CNO capabilities providing direction to other CNO developers.
Plans and conducts assignments, generally involving the larger and more important projects or more than one project.

Required:

Seven to nine years of relevant work experience.
Proficient C programming skills
Software Analysis/Reverse Engineering experience
Embedded systems development experience
Understand assembly programming concepts
Bachelors Degree

Clearance Required:

TS/SCI with Polygraph

Desired:

Experience working with networking (TCP/IP)
Python experience
Unit Test experience
Experience using Jenkins Continuous Integration Server

ManTech International Corporation, as well as its subsidiaries proactively fulfills its role as an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, national origin, marital status, physical or mental disability, status as a Disabled Veteran, Recently Separated Veteran, Active Duty Wartime or Campaign Badge Veteran, Armed Forces Services Medal, or any other characteristic protected by law.

If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a position with ManTech through its online applicant system, please contact ManTech's Corporate EEO Department at (703) 218-6000. ManTech is an affirmative action/equal opportunity employer - minorities, females, disabled and protected veterans are urged to apply. ManTech's utilization of any external recruitment or job placement agency is predicated upon its full compliance with our equal opportunity/affirmative action policies. ManTech does not accept resumes from unsolicited recruiting firms. We pay no fees for unsolicited services.

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request an accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access http://www.mantech.com/careers/Pages/careers.aspx as a result of your disability. To request an accommodation please click careers@mantech.com and provide your name and contact information.",4.2,"ManTech International Corporation
4.2","Hanover, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
15,Mid-Level Engineer,-1,"LESCO is seeking Mid-Level Engineers (2 year term) to provide aviation-engineering support to the Army Futures Command (AFC), Aviation Engineering Directorate (AED), Maintenance Engineering Division (FCDD AMA-M), co-located at the Corpus Christi Army Depot (CCAD).
Job Description: *
This support includes providing on-site engineering capability necessary for depot-level maintenance production support of requirements for aircraft components, power plants, aircraft systems and mission systems to include the CH-47 Chinook, AH-64 Apache and UH-60 Blackhawk. Job duties will include but are not limited to: supporting government engineers with expert advice, analysis, research, and technical guidance for Army rotary aircraft and associated subsystems (i.e., hydraulics, electrical, power plant, drivetrain and airframe). Evaluating work for adherence to government policies, plans, procedures, and management requirements. Providing analytical skills to support and evaluate engineering dispositions. Working independently and able to understand, anticipate, and act on the requirements of senior leaders. Writing detailed technical substantiation analysis, reports, and briefings. Support and coordination as necessary with other organizations in the development and/or substantiation of depot and field level maintenance policies and procedures, modifications, upgrades, repairs, technical data revision/improvement, field inspection, and new depot and field maintenance concepts. Develop and evaluate Depot Maintenance Work Requirements for engines and other components. Develop and review Maintenance Engineering Division standard operating procedures. Review and gather data to determine trends to develop algorithms for inventoried repair items. Develop structure analysis guidance procedures (play book) and create a structural repair library.
Required Qualifications: *
Must be a US citizen. Bachelor in Aerospace, Mechanical, or Electrical Engineering from an accredited university and 5+ years of engineering/technical experience. Must have or be able to obtain and maintain a Secret Clearance.
Preferred Qualifications: *
Knowledgeable in Army aviation technical manuals. Knowledgeable in rotary aircraft electrical and structural depot level engineering repairs. Must have excellent communication, interpersonal skills, and able to work independently. Army aviation experience, Previous military experience
Physical Requirements: *
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or abilities required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform essential job functions. Must be able to walk or stand on level and/or inclined surfaces and sit for extended periods of time. Must be able to routinely grasp or handle objects, use finger dexterity, bend elbows / knees, and reach above / below shoulders. Must be able to routinely climb / descend stairs.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per day

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
Logistics & Environmental Solutions Corporation (LESCO)
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.9,"LESCO - (Engineer)
2.9","Corpus Christi, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
16,"Specialist V/VI, Information Technology (Systems Engineer)",$45k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Details

Requisition Number S456P
Home Org Name Office of Information Technology Ad
Division Name Chief InfoOffice and InfoTechnology
Position Title Specialist V/VI, Information Technology (Systems Engineer)
Job Class Code MA14 E/F
Appointment Status Full-time
Part-time FTE
Limited Term No
Limited Term Length
Job Summary

The Office of Information Technology Enterprise Systems group is seeking applicants for a System Engineer Generalist. The System Engineer Generalist will assist in the day to day operations and maintenance of OIT’s virtual server and storage infrastructure providing support to internal and external customers related to services provided by the Enterprise Systems group. This position will maintain security patches utilizing best practices for all assigned systems, provide troubleshooting and problem resolution as well as assist in planning and execution of software and firmware upgrades and be willing to take on new task and responsibilities as needed to support the infrastructure team. In addition, this position will work closely with both IT personnel and end-users from several different disciplines and backgrounds. After-hours and on-call responsibilities should be expected.

Essential Functions

As a member of the ERP Systems Team, this Specialist will, under limited supervision, perform the duties listed below:
Administers and supports deployed University applications and systems including, Banner, Automic Workload Automation Suite (Appworx), Workflow, Luminis, etc. Documents and deploys systems and their integration points. Reviews and performs system testing.
Implements and troubleshoots configuration changes, systems, and applications to identify and correct service interruptions and other operational problems. Monitors University systems to ensure service uptime and availability
Creates technical solutions to automate, monitor, test, and deploy applications. Designs methods and procedures for collecting, organizing, interpreting, and classifying system and log data for security, performance, and capacity planning needs.
Maintains established backup and disaster recovery processes and procedures. Performs regular tests of the high availability, backup, and disaster recovery processes.
Deploys new technologies and performs system integration testing.
Provides ongoing technical assistance to customers regarding systems and applications. Makes recommendations to stakeholders to increase efficiencies in systems.
May provide on-call support for designated systems or services.
May perform other related duties as assigned by the IT Manager.
Education Level Bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution
Field of Study
Years of Experience Four (4) or more of experience in software support to include the experience below
Area of Experience
A working knowledge of one or more of the following: Automic Workload Automation Suite (Appworx), Banner, Workflow, Linux, Tomcat, shell scripting, SQL, Oracle Database, SQL Developer, web services/APIs, or F5 Load Balancers.
Experience working in software and web server administration, integration skills, and networking and database fundamentals.
The Specialist V starting salaries are typically between $64,000 and $75,000.

Requirements for Additional Job Levels

The Specialist VI position requires a Bachelor’s degree and seven (7) or more years of applicable experience. The starting salaries for this level are typically between $73,000 and $84,000.

Education Level
Field of Study
Years of Experience
Area of Experience
Requirements for Additional Job Levels
Minimum Skills and Abilities
Minimum Technology Skills
Minimum License and Certifications
Desired Qualifications
Salary Grade 35
Salary Range $51,900 - $99,600
Job Category Information Systems/Technology
Working Hours if Non-Traditional
List any hazardous conditions or physical demands required by this position
Posting Date 10/07/2020
Closing Date
EEO Statement

AUBURN UNIVERSITY IS AN AFFIRMATIVE ACTION/EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER. It is our policy to provide equal employment opportunities for all individuals without regard to race, sex, religion, color, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other classification protected by applicable law.

Special Instructions to Applicants

Auburn University is one of the nation’s premier public land-grant institutions. In 2020, it was ranked 44th among public universities by U.S. News and World Report. Auburn maintains high levels of research activity and high standards for teaching excellence, offering Bachelor’s, Master’s, Educational Specialist, and Doctor’s degrees in agriculture and engineering, the professions, and the arts and sciences. Its 2019 enrollment of 30,460 students includes 24,594 undergraduates and 5,866 graduate and professional students. Organized into twelve academic colleges and schools, Auburn’s 1,643 instructional faculty members—87% of whom are employed full-time—offer more than 200 educational programs. The University is nationally recognized for its commitment to academic excellence, its positive work environment, its student engagement, and its beautiful campus.

Auburn residents enjoy a thriving community, recognized as one of the “best small towns in America,” with moderate climate and easy access to major cities or to beach and mountain recreational facilities. Situated along the rapidly developing I-85 corridor between Atlanta, Georgia, and Montgomery, Alabama, the combined Auburn-Opelika-Columbus statistical area has a population of over 500,000, with excellent public school systems and regional medical centers.

Auburn University is committed to providing a comprehensive employee benefits package that attracts and retains talent to further the University’s mission and contributes to the personal and financial well-being of employees and their families. Employee Benefits include: Health Insurance, Dental Insurance, Vision Care, Cancer Insurance, Life Insurance/Personal Accident Coverage, Disability Group & Supplemental Plans, Flexible Spending Account Plan, and Mandatory and Voluntary Retirement Plans, Auburn University Federal Credit Union, Bookstore Discounts, Tiger Perks discounts on dining, shopping and entertainment, Travel Assistance (Domestic and International), and Educational Improvements for Employees and Dependents.

Quick Link for Internal Postings http://www.auemployment.com/postings/19728",4.5,"Auburn University
4.5","Auburn, AL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1885,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
17,Data Engineer,$59k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary of Responsibilities

Codes and develops software applications. Works as part of a development team on the design and implementation of analytical applications, including current Business Intelligence technologies, modern programming languages (Python, Scala, R) and current SQL database skills. Conducts requirement analysis, produces design documents on proposed solutions, and delivers consistent, test-covered, high quality code in a timely fashion. Recommends and completes product revisions or enhancements based on feedback. Develops and maintains documentation as required.

Performs work under minimal supervision. Handles moderate to complex issues and problems, and engages higher-level staff on only the most complex issues as necessary. Possesses comprehensive knowledge of subject matter. Provides coaching, and/or mentoring to a subordinate group.

Preferred Experience and Skills
Four to Eight year of related experience
Technical expertise and detail orientated
Complex problem-solving and critical thinking skills
Analytical thinking skills
Ability to build collaborative skills
Agile/SCRUM methodology experience
Azure DevOps experience
Property and Casualty insurance experience
4+ years of Hands-on experience with SQL databases, SSIS/Informatica ETL, Power BI, Cloud based integration tools.
Knowledge of Data warehousing concepts, and data modeling using Kimball methodology.
Preferred Education and Training
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field
INDSP",3.6,"West Bend Mutual Insurance Co.
3.6","West Bend, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1894,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
18,"Radar Modeling, Analysis, and Simulation Engineer",-1,"Radar Modeling and Analysis Engineer*
Signature Solutions, Inc., an engineering services company headquartered in Huntsville, AL, has an immediate opening for a Radar Modeling, Analysis, and Simulation Engineer supporting electromagnetic phenomenology, radar signature, and radar simulation development. A Bachelor of Science or greater in Electrical Engineering, Physics, or other associated technical field is required. Candidates with a minimum of 5 years or more related experience are a plus, but not a requirement. Applicants must have MATLAB experience. Strong verbal and written communication skills are required. Talented and motivated engineers or scientists ready to join a dynamic and engaging team and push the limits of their skills should apply.

Work will involve creating radar simulation model inputs for use include all-digital and hardware-in-the-loop environments. Engineers/Scientists will support first principles based electromagnetic model development, empirical data modeling, radar model algorithm refinement and development, weapon system performance assessment, and threat validation and accreditation analysis. Candidates should have strong programming skills; ideally with MATLAB. Applicants will work independently as well as in a team setting and must be able to balance multiple task requirements in a robust development environment.
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, physics, or mathematics is required; advanced degrees are a plus
5 years or more of related experience is a plus
Experience with Xpatch and Method of Moments predictive software is a plus
Strong software programming skills and experience are required; specific Matlab experience is a plus
Ability to obtain and/or hold a security clearance is required
Active DoD security clearance is a plus
*U.S. Citizenship is required for this position*
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Engineering: 3 years (Preferred)
Location:
Huntsville, AL (Required)
License:
U.S. Citizenship (Required)",4.0,"Signature Solutions, Inc.
4.0","Huntsville, AL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
19,Data Integration Engineer,$56k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Integration Engineer - Location, Orlando, FL
SUMMARY DESCRIPTION OF POSITION:
The Data Integration Engineering role is geared to develop and leverage api's to connect and move data to various cloud-based front-end (web) and back-end (ERP) and Data systems. This candidate will play a critical role in the FL integration strategy by linking multiple customer-facing systems to Master Data Management (Semarchy), CRM (Salesforce), Marketing Automation platform (Acoustic) and our Data warehouse. Candidate will design, develop, implement, and integrate information systems and software applications to meet functional and technical requirements for internal staff members and ministry constituents. He/she designs and codes API software applications, configures and tests applications, adheres to industry best practices, standardizes quality assurance procedures for software integrations. Candidate oversees testing, develops fixes, maintains, supports, and upgrades existing application code.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
The Data Integration Engineer/Developer supports and helps design and implement the integration architecture that will be used in interconnecting FamilyLife’s (FL) ecosystem
Work with other technical resources to build necessary connectivity and move data between systems in accordance with FL’s goals and objectives.
Provides technical support and collaborate with project team members and demonstrates expertise in a variety of the field's concepts, practices, and procedures.
He/She performs a variety of tasks where a wide degree of creativity and latitude is expected
Analyze functional users’ needs and then design, develop, integrate, and test software and integrations to meet those needs.
Become an expert on FL ecosystems, Master Data Management and Data Flows.
Design each integration in accordance with functional policies, procedures, and quality assurance best practices.
Ensure development projects meet business requirements and goals, fulfill end-user requirements, and identify and resolve systems issues.
Monitor and analyze effectiveness and efficiency of existing applications; develop strategies for improving, upgrading or leveraging these systems.
Lead the development of system architectures that define the interaction between systems to include the use of platforms and tools and definition of standards shared between systems.
Create a variety of models and diagrams (such as flowcharts) that instruct other developers/programmers how integrations and data flows function.
Document integrations, applications and system components as a reference for future maintenance and upgrades.
Evaluate proposals to identify potential problem areas and make appropriate recommendations.
Collaborate with analysts, designers, contractors/consultants, system owners, and other developers/programmers during system/software implementation.
Research technologies for possible placement/adoption into FL's back-office system.
Actively and intentionally, grow in his / her Christian faith.
Maintain a positive witness for Christ.
Share what God is teaching him or her.
Consistently attend and participate in team / ministry devotional times.

OTHER FUNCTIONS (Non-essential):
Perform related duties or special projects as assigned

SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Contractors and consultants as necessary.

KNOWLEDGE OF:
Strong knowledge of system/software implementation and quality assurance best practices.

ABILITIES:
Ability to manage workloads and processes.
Ability to communicate ideas in both technical and user-friendly language.
Experience performing Data Integration activities.
Experience coding to Rest and SOAP API's.
Experience with Master Data Management tools and processes.
Experience connecting front end web sites to back end reporting, CRM and finance systems.
Proven ability to design and write web services/API code.
Ability to establish standards, roadmaps and lead others in their support and execution
Strong knowledge and ability to code in Nodejs, Lambda
Experience using Github, Jenkins
Coding experience using Visual Studio and C#
Ability to create micro services, API Frameworks API’s, (Rest, Json)
SQL Server, Postgres, SSIS packages
Bonus for experience with Google Big Query, AWS, Semarchy, Salesforce, Acoustic email marketing platform

EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:
Four-year computer-related degree and 5 years equivalent work experience in software development and/or design and systems integration and management.
Strong requirements gathering, project, and process management experience.
Proven experience in systems architecture, development, implementation, integration, optimization, and sustainment of software solutions.",4.1,"FamilyLife
4.1","Orlando, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
20,Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$66k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role
Youll be part of the team that enables the database to scale larger without compromising on consistency. The ability to scale-out the database can lead to higher query throughput and faster single query performance.
You will help design and implement innovative features to efficiently maintain consistency even in the face of frequent updates made to a database that is comprised of very many nodes. To accomplish this, youll leverage your knowledge of distributed systems, networking, and systems level programming.
Its an exciting time to join the team. The amount of data stored and analyzed is growing fast, as is the number of transactions and queries processed per second. In response our engineers are constantly thinking of new ways to scale larger.
Required skills
C/C++ or Java
Proficient with multi-threaded applications
Customer focused with the ability to work in a cross-functional team with QA, documentation and others
Advanced knowledge of algorithms and data structures
Excellent communication
Desired skills
Distributed systems
Database internals
Willingness and ability to mentor interns and junior team members
SQL

About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2

#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
21,Sr Voice Platform Engineer,-1,"Sr Voice Platform Engineer - Arlington, VA - Visioneering, LLC

Opportunity to join a Dynamic Company!

We are a Consulting and Telecom Engineering Services firm serving our DoD customers in Arlington, VA. We promote a culture of operational excellence while upholding the highest standards of compliance, quality and integrity.

We are in search of an experienced Voice Platform Engineer to complement our IT operations team and are looking for a motivated and enthusiastic individual who shares our commitment to excellence in meeting the needs of our DoD clients and working in a team atmosphere. We offer a challenging, customer focused environment with competitive compensation and a robust benefits package in a team-oriented, casual atmosphere. If you desire to work in an environment where you are appreciated and supported by senior management, apply today to join our team.
Description: *
The Engineer is responsible for VoIP Maintenance on a geo-diverse platform and must have the experience and ability to configure and troubleshoot the telephony platform, including using tools to monitor and increase the system capabilities. Employee will also work on unique and interesting advanced projects in a lab and provide cut-over support, application troubleshooting / triage, and follow-up support as required.
Responsibilities Include:
Operate in a Voice SIP Engineer role, establish and perform routine preventative maintenance tasks. Enforce security guidelines to maintain compliance. Review, test and apply hardware, firmware, and OS patches.
Perform emergency recovery on failed components and coordinate repair with vendor software and hardware support as needed.
Deployment and configuration of physical and virtual servers.
Assist operations staff in resolving customer trouble tickets and network issues that are outside of their troubleshooting scope.
Perform Interoperability and acceptance testing directly with customers and suppliers.
Document network architecture and methods of procedure for regularly performed tasks.
Candidates must be willing to occasionally travel within the Washington, DC Metro area to support various program initiatives in regional co-location facilities.
Required Knowledge and Experience:
The ideal candidate will have skills and experience in some or all of the following areas:
Able to triage, diagnose and repair hardware and software faults.
Strong enterprise background with administrative experience in virtualization technologies.
Strong technical background of TCP/IP and Network Security related protocols such as DNS, FTP, HTTP, ICMP, IPSec, IPv4, IPv6, NTP, RADIUS, RTP, SRTP, SNMP, SMTP, SSH, NAT, and VLAN.
Interoperability experience with the following protocols/technologies:
SIP Applications
SIP Trunking / Access
VoIP CODEC Transcoding G711, etc.
Avaya AS5300 / Genband Experience a Plus
SBC Experience a Plus
Asterisk Experience a Plus
Installation and maintenance experience with enterprise server hardware, copper, and fiber Ethernet
Experience with CLASS 5 Softswitch and feature server
Extensive hands on experience with the Avaya AS5300 as it is very similar in base code and architecture to the Genband AS.
Basic knowledge of Session Border Controllers
Solid knowledge of Gateways such as AudioCodes, MG3500, MG9000 etc.
Solid knowledge of legacy switches such as Nortel CS2100, Nortel CS1000, 5ESS, etc.
Solid knowledge of trace captures analysis
Solid knowledge of IP Data Network functions and configuration
Solid IP Experience
Solid SIP Experience
Manufacturer certifications acknowledging expertise in any of the above or similar a Plus
Minimum Qualifications:
5 years relevant training, knowledge, & experience
Secret Security Clearance
Position: Full-time*
We continually strive to create an environment that balances work life and offers benefits that will enhance the compensation package. We offer Medical, Dental, Vision, Health Savings Accounts, Short Term Disability, Long Term Disability, Life Insurance and AD&D, Paid Time Off, Personal Leave, Holidays, 401(k) plan with company match and work/life balance. Equal Opportunity Employer. Security+ will be required once starting.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $109,000.00 - $165,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SIP VoIP: 5 years (Required)
Ribbon / GENBAND / Avaya: 3 years (Preferred)
SBC: 5 years (Preferred)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Company's website:
www.GOVisioneering.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,VISIONEERING LLC - DoD Contracting Firm - www.GOVisioneering.com,"Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
22,IT Engineer III,$49k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Staff in IT Engineering are responsible for researching, designing, developing, documenting, testing and deploying new technologies in order to enhance credit union operations. They develop and apply models, processes, tools, standards, road maps and methodologies to support the organization’s technical infrastructure as it relates to systems, networks, servers, storage, databases, and telecommunications. They ensure that new systems are implemented with adequate capacity and appropriate business continuity and disaster recovery capabilities.

Advanced IT professional providing technical leadership in multiple areas of the organization’s technical infrastructure and effectively contributing to technology innovation.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Serves as a key technical resource and expert for multiple areas of the technical infrastructure. Provides training and documentation for day-to-day support teams on backups, performance monitoring/tuning, proactive capacity planning, Disaster Recovery, granting user privileges/access, hardware/server/application/service monitoring, patching/updating, and group policy administration.

Creates technical blueprints, translating logical architecture into physical specifications. Directs and oversees the implementation effort.

Troubleshoots most problems within assigned area(s), providing fault isolation and resolution that may be complicated by technology interdependency. Analyzes cross-technology/platform issues and addresses problems factoring in an understanding of the current and future architecture.

Leads the evaluation of new technologies relative to their domain(s). Proposes technology investments supported by a thorough technical analysis and business case.

Serves as a leading participant in industry forums, bringing new technical information into the organization and disseminating it to appropriate IT colleagues.

Specifies the monitoring points to assess performance of technologies in their domain(s). Recommends the necessary actions to ensure optimal performance and reliability.

Develops disaster recovery and contingency goals for their areas of expertise.

Provides guidance and technical coaching to less experienced staff.

Provides input to RFI and RFP process related to their areas of expertise.

Interacts with major providers at the technical expert level to address mission critical issues.

Minimum formal education required for this position:

BS in a technical field or equivalent

Preferred Education:

Post-graduate classes beneficial

Minimum work experience:

8+ years of relevant experience (networking, security, systems administration, Disaster Recovery, Citrix server administration, storage technology, server management, databases, etc.)

Technical or specialized knowledge/skills:
Must be able to function as a key resource and expert within the company for multiple technical areas. Expert in implementing efficient procedures for backups, performance monitoring/tuning, proactive capacity planning, Disaster Recovery, granting user privileges/access, hardware/server/application/service monitoring, patching/updating, and group policy administration.
Strong understanding of IT systems/data security as it relates to financial institutions or other industries that must comply with federal regulations
Ability to apply seasoned expertise in multiple technologies to address interoperability issues.
Must demonstrate a good understanding of new technologies and their applicability relative to assigned domain(s).
Must demonstrate a strong understanding of the current and future technology architecture, including the inter-operability of technologies.
Ability to provide guidance and training to other IT colleagues in their areas of expertise.
Understands business trends, strategies and the direction technology must take to support the business.
Strong communication skills (written, verbal, and listening) with specific ability to translate technical details to a non-technical audience.
Excellent analytical skills.
Proficiency with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Microsoft Project, and Visio.
Certifications Required:

None required.

CCNA/CCNP/CCIE, MCSA/MCSE/MCSM, CISSP, CCA/CCEE/CCIA, and/or VCP preferred

Environmental, physical and psychological requirements:
Must be able to sit or stand for prolonged periods of time in a climate controlled environment. Must be able to use fingers, hands, wrists for repetitive tasks such as typing, using a mouse, handling paper, and operating a telephone. Demands for visual and auditory acuity are typical of an office environment. Must be able to interact via email, telephone, or in person with diplomacy, tact, and courtesy with all members under varying circumstances. Must be able to lift up to 40 lbs.
Starting Salary Range: $86,000+",3.7,"Ent Credit Union
3.7","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1957,Other Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
23,Data Engineer,$58k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you passionate about Data and Cloud Technology? Do you enjoy working with Python, ETL Frameworks, and BI Reporting? Are you intrigued by Investments and Finance? Do you want to join an Innovative Team with a start-up mindset and fortune 100 stability? If Yes, there’s a place at Liberty Mutual Investments for you!

About the job:

The Data Engineer will help build technology to enable Back and Middle Office Investment functions (trade flows, accounting, reconciliation, reporting, and automated batch scheduling workflows) for integration with the investments Accounting Book of Record. Knowledge of investment financial data to serve application integration to trading platform and reporting is strongly desired. Prior experience working on Agile scrum teams in a scaled framework is preferred.

You will possess a hardworking “can-do” mindset with focus on the collective success of the scrum team to iteratively deliver high quality products to enable the investments business.

Collaborates with the Product Owner, Scrum Master, Subject Matter Experts and Development team to define and analyze user stories tracked in Jira.

Collaborate in design, development and implementation of software solutions for LMI Tech using modern technology stack.

Demonstrates solutions and articulates business value to LMI business partners at sprint showcases.

Desired skills:

Bachelor’s degree in technical discipline, or equivalent professional experience.

Minimum 3-5 years' experience as Data Engineer.

Expertise in MS SQL Server (Programming views, stored procedures, and functions).

Expertise in Python (ETL tools- Pandas/NumPy, Python unit testing etc.).

Experience with Cloud platform technologies (AWS/Azure).

Experience with Data Warehousing, Dimensional Modeling (Kimball etc.), and Data Extraction Utilities.

Experience with business intelligence tools and reporting solution (PowerBI, Tableau etc.)

Experience with Financial Systems and reporting (Investments accounting/General Ledger)

Preferred skills:

Experience in integrating large scale financial investment/ERP systems (SimCorp Dimension or similar platform) is a plus.

Experience with CI/CD pipeline, and DevOps.

Experience with REST API.

Experience with Git/Bitbucket.

Experience in Agile software development practices (story sizing, sprint planning, retrospectives).

Experience with automated testing software (Selenium, Ranorex, Tosca).

Benefits: We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/BenefitsOverview:

At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.

We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
24,"Sr. Software Development Engineer, Amazon S3",-1,"· 4+ years of professional software development experience
· 3+ years of programming experience with at least one modern language such as Java, C++, or C# including object-oriented design
· 2+ years of experience contributing to the architecture and design (architecture, design patterns, reliability and scaling) of new and current systems
· Able to debug, troubleshoot and resolve complex technical issues reported by customers

Amazon S3 powers businesses across the globe that make the lives of consumers better daily. Whether its electronic content delivered to your home, technology that betters your remote working experience, allows you to plan travel to exotic places or simply get stuff delivered to your home. As a Sr. Software Dev Engineer in S3, you get to deliver these capabilities and delight our customers through teams of talented engineers and leaders.

As an engineer in the S3 User Security team, you will drive development that improves security for all S3’s users. You will work with peer engineers to deliver new APIs and features that provide customers with flexible access control, cryptographic data protection, and secure audit facilities. You will design, build, and deploy new services and tools that help S3 to scale with its growing user base and increase team agility, all while maintaining the focus on customer trust that is at the heart of S3’s culture.

Our team works together to provide work/life balance for all team members. We recognize that the circumstances of our team members vary, and we balance work across the team so that we’re all able to maintain high standards on behalf of our customers, while at the same time allowing for rich and happy personal lives.

S3 services are highly available, but there are times when we occasionally stray away from our SLAs. In order to minimize the impact of such excursions, we do have On-Call rotations. However, we set these up so there are focused time periods when you are on-call and when you are not, you can focus on your day job :)

We have a formal mentor search application that lets you find a mentor that works best for you based on location, job family, job level etc. Your manager can also help you find a mentor or two, because two is better than one. In addition to formal mentors, we work and train together so that we are always learning from one another, and we celebrate and support the career progression of our team members.

We have a diverse team and drive towards an inclusive culture and work environment. Our team is intentional about attracting, developing, and retaining amazing talent from diverse backgrounds. Our team members are active in Amazon’s 10+ affinity groups, sometimes known as employee resource groups, which bring employees together across businesses and locations around the world. These range from groups such as the Black Employee Network, Amazon Women and Engineering and LGBTQ+

This role will sit in our new headquarters in Northern Virginia, where Amazon will invest $2.5 billion dollars, occupy 4 million square feet of energy efficient office space, and create at least 25,000 new full-time jobs. Our employees and the neighboring community will also benefit from the associated investments from the Commonwealth including infrastructure updates, public transportation improvements, and new access to Reagan National Airport.

· Experience with security threat modeling and analysis
· Deep understanding of scalable computing systems, software architecture, data structures and algorithms
· Proven track record of designing, building and delivering high quality software on time
· Possess strong verbal and written communication skills
· Possess a passion for technical leadership and mentoring
· Experience in Agile/SCRUM enterprise-scale software development
· Strong desire to build, sense of ownership, urgency, and drive.
· Possess strong analytical skills, with excellent problem solving abilities in the face of ambiguity",-1,"Amazon Dev Center U.S., Inc.","Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
25,Enterprise Software Engineer,$70k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Piping Rock is aggressively expanding its global reach and with it, its use of data and analytics to drive business decisions. We are looking for a great Enterprise Software Architect. This is a key role that reports into the VP of Technology Operations.

Be at the forefront of the future of health and wellness, with the ability to work in a fast paced, family owned entrepreneurial environment where the work is meaningful, associates are valued, and you can grow your long-term career. Joining Piping Rock means being part of a fast-growing team where you can take ownership of your work and be a decision maker, where you are encouraged to work smarter, not harder, with all of the tools necessary to be successful.

We are looking for talented, self-motivated people to join us in this effort. Piping Rock manufactures and packages its own branded product lines, operating its own end-to-end supply chain, all in-house. This is how we consistently deliver the best quality and value directly to customers all across the globe.

We are quickly becoming a data-driven commerce organization that is leveraging any available technologies to drive growth. While we are growing fast, we are maintaining a laser focus on our customers and are driven by our desire to delight them. We see endless opportunities in delivering the best possible experience - adding value, reducing friction and earning loyalty each step of the way.

As an Enterprise Software Architect, you’ll be involved in the whole lifecycle of PipingRock's digital product portfolio. You will bring leadership - and thought-leadership - to a great team whose focus is enablement - of your business/marketing side partners; on the engineering side for implementation and delivery; and of our customers – whose happiness, satisfaction and loyalty drive everything we do here.

Your responsibilities will include:

Design and deliver the elegant, frictionless digital products that will enhance and expand our ability to delight our customers, by delivering the best digital experience in the business.
Master the business we are in. We are in an interesting, challenging, complex, international business space that requires full engagement. We believe in drinking from the firehose, becoming the job, and knowing our customers as real people.
Be hands-on. This role is about architecture AND engineering. We are engineers here, including leadership. We get our hands dirty and we wouldn't have it any other way. If your comfort zone leans more toward the PowerPoint and LucidChart side, all due respect, let's pass. Yes, we want the diagrams, but they're only part of this role, which is waiting for a builder.
Design and implement data solutions that solve for this problem space - elegant, performant, secure and highly available. This applies equally to our green-field initiatives and our existing systems and solutions - and we have plenty of both.
Engage on an end-to-end basis: from strategic infrastructure planning; to close partnership with the dev and product teams; right on through to our delighted customers.
Design and implement effective database solutions and models to store and retrieve company data.
Examine and identify database structural necessities by evaluating client operations, applications, and programming.
Design, build and maintain in accordance with organizational requirements for compliance and other regulations. PCI, SOC, SOX, ADA, HIPAA, etc.
Communicate effectively in all formats - across the team and up to senior leadership.
Oversee the migration of data from legacy systems to new solutions.
Monitor the system performance by performing regular tests, troubleshooting and integrating new features.
Recommend solutions to improve new and existing database systems.
Be generous at sharing knowledge, while being curious and learning from your teammates as well. Be a mentor, and generally make your team better.
Offer support by responding to system problems in a timely manner.

Requirements

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or relevant field.
A minimum of 5 years’ experience in a similar role.
10 years’ experience in the web tech space as a whole.
Strong experience with cloud-based solutions (emphasis on AWS), cloud-first strategy and migration/transformation/hybridized environments. Excellent grasp of AWS vocabulary, with skills to back up the vocab. We’ll ask what you’ve built, and how.
Specific experience with enterprise-level e-commerce is preferred.
Programming: expert-level at client-side web - HTML/CSS/JS, etc. Expert level at server-side/full-stack, both architectural and hands-on.
Demonstrable ability to model/map problem spaces to elegant architectural solutions.
Be experienced and comfortable working in customer-first, product- Agile
Excellent organizational and analytical abilities.
Outstanding problem solver.
True customer-first mindset in the context of Agile methodologies.
Be a great teammate. We want to be happy to see you in the morning, and vice versa. That’s very important here.
Excellent communications skills – verbal, written and visual.

Benefits

We know talent when we see it, and we value it highly. For the right candidates, this is a great place to come to work every day. If it sounds like we're talking about you, we really hope to hear from you.

Piping Rock proudly offers comprehensive medical, dental, vision plans to all full-time associates. In addition, voluntary life insurance, flexible spending plans, and short-term disability plans may be optionally added. All full-time associates also receive group term life insurance and long-term disability coverage. Associates are eligible to participate in a 401(k) savings plan with a generous company match.

Piping Rock Health Products LLC is an equal opportunity employer.",3.4,"Piping Rock Health Products
3.4","Bohemia, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
26,Data Engineer,-1,"You can make a salary. Or you can make a difference. Or you can work as a Data Engineer at Herman Miller and make both.

About this Opportunity
As a Data Engineer, you'll move and integrate data across multiple disparate systems. You will clean, normalize, and aggregate Herman Miller corporate reporting and analytics. You'll also provide support to functional areas by acting as expert in tools and methods for accessing, analyzing, and reporting corporate data.

What You'll Do
You'll have opportunities to speak up, solve problems, lead others, and be an owner every day as you...
Assist end users in reporting and analysis tools.
Collaborate with Analytics and Business Teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools, increase data accessibility, and foster data-driven decision making across the organization.
Define company data assets (data models).
Design data integrations and data quality framework.
Develop and maintain scalable data pipelines and build out new API integrations to support continuing increases in data volume and complexity.
Implement processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for the key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Perform data analysis to troubleshoot data-related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Work closely with a team of Application Developers, Architects, and Analysts.
Work closely with all Business Units and Software teams to develop strategy for long-term data platform architecture.
Write unit/integration tests and document work.
Perform additional responsibilities as requested to achieve business objectives.
Sound Like You?
You might be just who we’re looking for if you have...
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical field.
Fully proficient retail and online retail data engineering abilities, typically gained through five years of working with Python/Java, SQL, working schema design, and dimensional data modeling.
At least five years of experience, or and equivalent combination of education and experience.
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems.
Experience working with cloud services and cloud data warehouses.
Experience with Snowflake, Matillion, Tableau, Business Objectives, and Net Suite (desirable).
The ability to manage and communicate data warehouse plans to internal clients.
Expert knowledge of best practices and IT operations in an always-up, always-available service.
Experience with or knowledge of Agile Software Development methodologies.
Advanced problem-solving and troubleshooting skills with the ability to identify and solve complex business needs.
The ability to be process-oriented with great documentation skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills with a keen sense of customer service.
The ability to perform all essential job functions of the position with or without accommodations.
Who We Are
At Herman Miller, our unique culture represents the collective attitudes, ideas, and experiences of the people who work here. We focus on protecting the environment, impacting our communities, exceeding the expectations of our customers through high quality products, and championing diversity in all areas of the business, and together we are on a journey toward a better world. We support the well-being of our employees in and outside of work by providing a variety of opportunities including award-winning work-life integration resources, development programs, complex health and wellness offerings, and much more.

Herman Miller is a globally recognized provider of furnishings and related technologies and services. Headquartered in West Michigan, we have relied on innovative design for over 100 years to solve problems for people wherever they work, live, learn, and heal.

Herman Miller is committed to diversity and inclusion. We are an equal opportunity employer including veterans and people with disabilities.

Apply Now!",3.8,"Herman Miller
3.8",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1905,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
27,Software Systems Engineer (nCino),$76k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Farm Credit Mid-America, we believe people are our strongest asset. We are consistently looking to hire individuals from a wide range of experience and capabilities who have a desire to serve. Currently, we have over 1,400 employees across Indiana, Ohio, Kentucky and Tennessee.

We are looking for a Certified Sales force Administrator or a Certified nCino Administrater with 2 plus years experience implementing and administering nCino. The primary function of this position will be to provide experience in Salesforce and nCino administration within a financial organization .

MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES :

• Reviews and analyzes requirements to design a solution utilizing the lightning app builder, lightning components, the available declarative development tools, AppExchange apps, or a combination of these

• Communicates and builds strong relationships with end users, stakeholders, vendors and leadership

• Troubleshoots errors, overcome challenging roadblocks, or design creative solutions to solve challenging requests

• Develops documentation as necessary to support users

• Designs, documents, builds, tests and deploys alerts, reports, dashboards and workflows.

• Assists with ongoing system administration including security, profiles, workflow rules, custom objects, custom fields, etc.

• Integrates Salesforce/nCino with other 3rd party apps, downstream Enterprise applications, and business intelligence databases

• Assists with release evaluations including updating user guides and system documentation

• Manages ongoing support requests and administrative needs of the client

• Regularly performs database de-duping and clean-up procedures

• Experience supporting Change Management, Data Migration, and Production Deployment processes and tools

• Applying Analytics and Data Management skills to create Reports and Dashboards across the Association

• Mentor new nCino/Salesforce Administrators

• Salesforce Lightning Experience

EXPERIENCE IN THE FOLLOWING IS A PLUS:

• Certified Salesforce Advanced Administrator, and/or other Salesforce certifications

• Certified Salesforce Sales Cloud or Service Cloud Consultant

• IPaaS software (Azure, Apigee, Mulesoft etc.)

• Salesforce Financial Services Cloud

• Ability to Configure and Deploy Community Cloud Solutions for Partners and External Customers

Knowledge in the following area(s) is a plus; Database systems and data integration experience, MS SQL, Non-Salesforce Customer Relationship Management (CRM) systems, IT Service Management software, Enterprise Content Management software.

MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS

Education and Experience

Bachelor's degree in computer science, business or related field; with at least one year experience supporting enterprise software applications; or a minimum of four years of direct experience in a software administration/software implementation role. Good project management skills, oral and written communication skills, and analytical skills necessary.

Here's What We Can Offer You...

Farm Credit Mid-America has an outstanding Total Rewards package, which includes, but is not limited to:

Salary commensurate with experience
15 vacation days, 15 sick days, and 11 paid holidays per year
401(k) plan with outstanding match
Medical, Dental, Vision, STD, LTD, Life/AD&D benefits, etc.
Fitness Incentive Program
Tuition assistance for employees and dependents.

Requirements of the job include the ability to do the work, with or without reasonable accommodations. It is the Association's policy to make reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities. Leadership retains the right to add, subtract or change duties of the position at any time.

IND123

Farm Credit Mid-America is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other category protected by law.

IND123",3.7,"Farm Credit Mid-America
3.7","Louisville, KY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
28,Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$88k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role
The Vertica Ecosystem Team is looking for an experienced software engineer and python expert to help us take our Big Data Analytics Platform to the next level.

Our team is responsible for the components that enable deployment and operation of our distributed database: installation, upgrade, orchestration, administration, configuration, and diagnostics. Our users experience these parts of the product first and rely on these components during critical points in their deployments lifetime. In this role you will make contributions that impact Verticas entire customer base and help us expand to new customers who want to deploy in novel ways.

We need a self-directed engineer who is capable of solving problems in diverse areas, including:
Distributed systems
Systems programming
Networking
Operating system integration
The candidates responsibilities will include:
Design and implement features in the Vertica Analytics Platform to improve distributed database installation, upgrade, orchestration, administration, configuration, and diagnostics
Define requirements for new features in collaboration with Product Managers, Support Engineers, and customers
Diagnose, debug, and resolve product issues discovered during the development process and coming from customers
Influence the design of other in-database features based on their interaction with the deployment mechanisms
Provide technical leadership and support for junior members of the team by conducting thorough design and code reviews
The recommended requirements the candidate should meet are:
Bachelor, Masters, or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field
At least 4 years of experience working full time as a software engineer
Strong understanding of data structures, algorithms, and software engineering practices for sustainable development
Strong working knowledge of python3
Experience writing software for Linux and working on the command line
Familiarity with popular cloud deployment, provisioning and infrastructure-as-code tools

About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2
#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
29,"Lead DevOps Engineer, Cloud",-1,"Why 2nd Watch

2nd Watch is in growth mode, and we are looking for like-minded, focused team members to join us! We are looking for the most technically forward-thinking, cloud-passionate employees in the world, and strive daily to align our core values with those that we hire Elevating Each Other, Being Outcome Driven, Winning as a Team, Being Bold, Trusting Each Other, and Having FUN! these are all key elements to who we hire.

2nd Watch has a unique company culture and working environment that live and breathe success and promote pushing the envelope every day in your respective role at the company. This is what drives our teams a perpetual thirst for knowledge, and a desire to work with the best people and take on big challenges together. Getting our attention takes creativity, integrity, a desire to improve yourself and your co-workers each day, and a track record of caring about who you are affecting, both positively and negatively, while you are getting the right stuff done.

We offer roles ranging from all levels in our Sales, Managed Cloud Services, Cloud Enablement, DevOps, Product Development teams and beyond. We are looking for superstars to help raise the bar, setting industry-level standards around project management and delivery of AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud services.

About 2nd Watch

As a cloud native company, 2nd Watch has walked alongside our clients for over a decade helping them migrate to the cloud, accelerate application development, and deliver on their companys strategic goals through the blend of technology and innovation that is at our core. Our services deliver cloud native capabilities through strategic consulting, modernization services, and specialized technology practices focused on maximizing the value of public cloud through:
Business Transformation
Cloud Advisory
Datacenter Migration & Application Modernization
Optimization
Data Engineering
Compliance, Security & Business Continuity
DevOps
Managed Cloud services
With a client NPS of 85, our approach has been successful for some of the worlds leading brands and is tested, trusted, and proven to accelerate your cloud adoption.

2nd Watch is an AWS Partner Network (APN) Premier Consulting Partner, a Microsoft Azure Gold Partner, and a Google Cloud Platform Partner. The venture-backed company is headquartered in Seattle, Washington. To learn more about 2nd Watch, visit www.2ndwatch.com or call 888-317-7920.

Position Title:

DevOps Engineer, Cloud

The ideal candidate is someone who:
Operates with the highest levels of integrity
Thinks Big and takes on Big Challenges
Has a continuous thirst for knowledge and is a perpetual learner
Strives to make themselves and everyone around them better
Has a passion for technology
About you

You are a systematic thinker. You find yourself uncomfortable when things are messy or unorganized and you feel the urge to fix them. You take pride in your work and focus on the details that others often overlook. You love working closely with peers in an environment that tirelessly strives for improvement and doing the right things, the right way. You always seek to find the quickest, safest, and most repeatable processes to perform your tasks including automating everything possible. You recognize that you may not presently know everything that you need to know, yet you are confident in your abilities to learn the skills needed to fulfill any job role and are eager for the challenge. You want to gain deep, firsthand knowledge of the public cloud space including Amazon AWS, Microsoft Azure, and Google Cloud Platform. You want to join a team working to deliver a legendary customer experience.

About the amazing things that you will do

You will join a thriving DevOps culture as an operations engineer embedded on the software development team. You will spearhead operations management of developed solutions including log management, monitoring/alerting, infrastructure provisioning, system patching, configuration management, and support. As part of the product development team, you will actively participate in agile development practices working closely with engineers to maintain and enhance infrastructure management and CI/CD processes to optimize for quality, reliability, and availability. You will ensure that security, performance, and disaster preparedness are always represented in team decisions. You will gain and expand on your experience managing cloud native microservices utilizing Docker clustering technologies (ECS, Kubernetes, ).

Responsibilities:
Match infrastructure implementation / monitoring / management with software architecture
Influence software architecture to simplify / streamline operational management
Working close with the developers
Manage All Environments
Monitor running instances ensure costs are managed and optimized against performance
Configuration changes / documentation / automation of changes
Monitor / manage logs
Patch management
Security and key management
Establish and monitor operational dashboards and work queues
Monitor infrastructure / application performance & health
Shared software release duties
Developing and monitoring infrastructure automation for deployment
Code coverage metrics
Monitor build / deployment status
Must haves:
Be passionate about being challenged and hungry to continuously learn
Mid-level to Senior on typical operations front (operating system patching, systematic troubleshooting, eye for operational details, )
Must have experience and be extremely comfortable with Unix/Linux server environments
Comfortable with command line tools (Bash, Powershell, )
Working understanding of code and script development (ex: Python, )
Familiar with agile software development lifecycles
Knowledge of best practices and IT operations for always-up, always-available services
Major experience bonus point:
Docker / container cluster management (AWS ECS, Kubernetes, Vagrant, OpenShift, Apache Mesos, Deis, Mesophere DCOS, )
Docker / Microservice release orchestration including Blue Green Deployments and Canary Releases
Managing infrastructure on Amazon AWS
Managing infrastructure on Microsoft Azure
Continuous Integration / Continuous Delivery software release management and automation
Infrastructure as Code i.e., Terraform and Cloud Formation
Minor experience bonus:
MS SQL and/or MySQL administration / optimization
NoSQL and caching tools such as MemCache / Redis
GIT / Source Control tools (i.e., GitHub, Bit Bucket, TFS, )
Automation / configuration management using either Puppet, Chef or equivalent
Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"2nd Watch, Inc.
3.8",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
30,Electrical Controls Engineer / PLC,-1,"OVERALL JOB PURPOSE: *
The engineer supports Victory Energy (VEO) by the execution of job requirements to meet schedules and budgets. This encompasses the creation of P&ID’s, knowledge of boiler codes, selecting instruments and control components, and preparing instrument data sheets that meet customer and VEO requirements. Design, develop, and implement all aspects of the programming for a Burner Management System (BMS), Boiler Control System (BCS), and Combustion Control System (CCS). Auxiliary equipment control systems are also the engineer’s responsibility. The engineer works with minimal supervision.
ESSENTIAL JOB DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: *
General knowledge of boilers: instrumentation and control concepts.
Ability to generate ISA data sheets, instrument indexes and logic drawings.
Work with Microsoft Excel and Word to generate and maintain department documents.
Organize documents both physically and electronically.
Read customer specifications and use them when developing control systems and choosing instruments.
Design electrical control systems in accordance with recognized codes and standards (NFPA 85, ASME, ISA, NEMA, UL, etc.).
Collaborate with department members and members of other VEO departments to resolve job-related concerns as required.
Be the sole engineer for an entire project or share portions thereof with other engineers.
Conform to existing departmental standards and offer objective, valuable input for the development of future standards.
Programming
Create software programs for BMS, BCS, CCS, and other systems as required using RSLogix500 and RSLogix5000 to program Allen-Bradley Programmable Logic/Automation Controllers (PLCs and PACs).
Work with FactoryTalk View Studio software to create graphically interactive Human Machine Interfaces (HMIs).
Enable system software/hardware to communicate with other systems via various communication protocols (Ethernet/IP, Modbus, Modbus TCP/IP, DeviceNet, ControlNet, etc.).
Assist other department personnel with control system Factory Acceptance Tests (FATs).
Troubleshoot software/hardware issues with fellow employees and/or product manufacturers as needed.
OTHER JOB DUTIES: *
View and manipulate drawings in AutoCAD.
Attend internal job-specific meetings.
Meet with customers and vendors at VEO.
Provide phone support to VEO customers and personnel in the field as needed.
Perform other duties as assigned.
ESSENTIAL JOB QUALIFICATIONS: *
B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Electrical Engineering Technology, Computer Engineering, or Computer Science with a minimum of 4 years experience in electrical controls.
At least 8 years experience in electrical controls programming will be considered in lieu of a B.S. degree.
PLC/PAC programming experience using Rockwell (Allen-Bradley) software *is required*. Additional manufacturer’s products is a bonus: GE Fanuc, Siemens, Triconex, Telemecanique, Modicon (Schneider Electric), etc.
Excellent interpersonal skills with ability and motivation to represent Victory Energy well when in the field with customers.
Must have valid driver’s license and be able to obtain a passport (if required).
A working knowledge of NFPA 85, and 54 are desired.
Prior boiler experience is a plus.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
NFPA 85 and 54: 4 years (Preferred)
Electrical Control Programming: 8 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.victoryenergy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Yes",2.9,"Victory Energy Operations, LLC
2.9","Tulsa, OK",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
31,Sr. Automation Controls Engineer,-1,"Senior Automation Controls Engineer - NC
Industrial Systems Division
Location: North Carolina
Job Type: Full Time, Direct Hire
Reports To: Department Manager, Industrial Systems
FLSA Status: Exempt STOT
DESCRIPTION
The Senior Automation Controls Engineer serves as the primary customer interface for multiple customers in the state of North Carolina. In addition to technically leading and executing projects, the Senior Automation Controls Engineer also assists with the scoping and bidding of new projects. This position interacts with clients to understand and develop automation requirements and transform them into effective control solutions. This is done through the use of software engineering techniques, use of Matrix standards, templates, and procedures, and use of good engineering judgment in making minor adaptations and modifications. The Senior Automation Controls Engineer must have strong written and verbal communication skills and must be team-oriented. The ideal candidate will have depth of experience in the following areas:
PLC: Rockwell Logix Controllers, PLC-5s, SLCs
HMI: FTView, PanelView, Wonderware
Drives: Allen-Bradley VFDs
DCS: PlantPAx
This position will be based in North Carolina and initially be a remote worker position. Based upon client growth, this position could form the basis of a permanent Matrix Technologies North Carolina office.
PRIMARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Perform design and engineering functions in accordance with accepted practices and company standards.
Prepare project scopes of work, preliminary design concepts, bills of material, cost estimates, and other necessary project documents.
Lead or assist in gathering field data and preparing project and functional specifications.
Coordinate the design and implementation of high-quality industrial software programs with other members of the project team in keeping with the defined project requirements.
Work with the assigned Project Manager to achieve the overall project goals and objectives.
Prepare project correspondence as required.
Maintain positive client relationships on assigned projects.
SPECIFICATIONS
Bachelor of Science Degree in any of the following: Electrical Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Technology, or related field from an ABET accredited college or university.
Twelve plus years of controls, automation, and electrical troubleshooting with start-up experience.
Professional Engineering (PE) certification preferred.
Varied industrial background is a plus. Key industries include food, specialty chemical, pharmaceuticals, mining and aggregates, oil and gas, and manufacturing.
Ability to travel approximately 50% locally and 20% overnight. Current clients are within a 1.5 hour driving radius of central North Carolina.
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk, and hear.
Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.
This position must also be able to perform industrial field work which may include hazardous locations, ladders, and stairs.

ABOUT MATRIX
At Matrix Technologies, our core values define our culture and we live out those values in everything we do. We call this “The Matrix Way.” We strive for a culture that promotes teamwork and collaboration, engagement, and talent development. Our culture reflects what the modern workforce wants and inspires our employees to perform their best. We support our employee’s personal goals and interests with flexible work schedules and options for increased paid time off. This focus on the employee experience is why we have been named a Top Work Place by the Toledo Blade. To ensure we are providing our customers with the best solutions from the industry’s leading experts, we encourage our employees to grow professionally by offering technical and leadership training, tuition reimbursement, memberships to professional societies, and diverse experiences.
Since 1980, Matrix Technologies, Inc. and our professional team of engineering and automation experts have been the leading single source for any process, facility, or automation engineering need. We only hire the best which allows us to provide our customers with “A Better Process for Success”. Our talented staff and processes have also earned us a spot in the Control Engineering System Integrator Hall of Fame.
Matrix Technologies is a versatile, platform-independent, full-service resource for process design, automation and information system engineering. We have a commitment to our clients and it shows with 87% of our projects being repeat engagements from satisfied customers. Matrix Technologies has expertise in oil & gas, chemical, food & beverage, consumer packaged goods, pharmaceutical/biotech, aggregates, discrete manufacturing, automotive, glass, and metals.
Come see what “The Matrix Way” is all about!",4.0,"Matrix Technologies, Inc.
4.0",North Carolina,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
32,Data Engineer,$83k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Boeing Intelligence & Analytics is seeking a Data Engineer or Software Developer with data transformation (ETL) experience working with the latest industry tools.
Duties Entail:
• Write code on a data extract, transform and load (ETL) platform to ingest and transform data to a suitable formats
• Add features to ETL platform to shorten timelines for future data integration efforts
• Develop, maintain code, and integrate software into a fully functional software system
• Participate in daily scrum meetings, sprint retrospectives, and other agile processes
• Work with external teams to validate data ingest
• Provide and maintain documentation of system architecture, development and enhancements
Education:
• Bachelor's Degree and 5 or more years' experience or master's degree with 3 or more years' experience from an accredited course of study in a technical field such as engineering, computer science, mathematics, physics or chemistry
Required Experience:
• An Active TS/SCI clearance
5+ years of software development experience
• Demonstrated understanding of high scale cloud architecture
• Linux/Unix experience
• Object Oriented programming language skills
• Possess strong verbal and written communication skills
• Possess strong analytical skills, with excellent problem-solving abilities in the face of ambiguity
Desired Experience:
• Expertise in data ingestion, data transformation (ETL) and data modeling
• Experience with Java, Ruby or Python
• Experience in Agile/SCRUM enterprise-scale software development
• 3 years experience working with batch-processing and tools (e.g., Nifi, Midpoint, MapReduce, Yarn, Pig, Hive, HDFS, Oozie)
• 1 year experience working with Restful web services
• Experience with Code development, deployment, versioning and build tools (e.g., Eclipse, git, svn, maven, Jenkins)
• Experience working with tools in stream-processing (e.g., Storm)
• Experience developing applications that work with NoSQL stores (e.g., ElasticSearch, Hbase, Cassandra, MongoDB, CouchDB)
• Working in cloud architecture with AWS EC2, RDS, S3, VPC, ElasticSearch
• Experience working with moving data across different networks and security domains
BI&A is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race,color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
Equal Employment Opportunity is the Law (PDF)",3.7,"BOEING
3.7","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1916,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
33,Software Engineer - Big Data - Hadoop,$78k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Lam….
Together we move the Atoms that move the World:

Imagine working on the front lines of innovation! As one of the semiconductor industry's leading suppliers of wafer fabrication equipment and services, our technology depends on finding and hiring the best and the brightest employees. We know that our dynamic, global team of exceptional employees is essential to our continued growth.

Lam Research - where successful people want to work:

We are a company comprised of people who work hard, deliver outstanding results and maintain a sense of humor during even the most challenging times. This is truly a rare opportunity. Lam Research is a market leader where our core values are not just words on the back of your badge. Given the criticality of this role to Lam Research's success, this philosophy starts with you.
Job Responsibilities
Role is Software engineer working within Software & Controls group serving in multiple areas such as SW applications development, SW/HW server support, and qualification of Lam’s new big data and analytical machine learning platform. In addition, this role will also support SW front-end web-based applications development, field deployment, and troubleshooting.
Primary responsibility of this role will be support of both software & hardware readiness of Lam’s new data management platform and associated SW apps for field deployment at major semiconductor customers. Ensures the install, setup and qualification of the new SW/HW functions properly. Knowledge on server hardware configuration and windows and linux OS.
Software coding and troubleshooting for Big Data architecture such as Hadoop and its technology elements including HDFS, Spark, HBase, Ambari, YARN, and others are essential. This individual will also be familiar with ML algorithms and techniques being utilized in the Hadoop ecosystem including knowledge of open source practices.
#LI-SG1

Designs, develops, troubleshoots and debugs software programs for enhancements and new products. Develops software and tools in support of design, infrastructure and technology platforms, including operating systems, compilers, routers, networks, utilities, databases, cloud-based and Internet-related tools. Determines hardware compatibility and/or influences hardware design.
Other Job Responsibilities
Other duties include SQA and continuous integrated SW test & development practices and methods. Use of standard software development program management processes like agile.
Secondary function would be development and support of the Lam system tool operating software.
Strong project management, working in teams, effective communication, and clear documentation skills are needed for this role. Knowledge in applying structured problem solving, project management, and excellent presentation skills both verbal and written communication are essential in this role.
Minimum Qualification
Minimum Education:

MS in Computer Science or related field such as Computer Engineering or Electrical Engineering. Advanced degree desirable, but level of work experience also considered. Knowledge and experience in multiple software languages developing and support applications – Java, C++, Python, R Smalltalk
Preferred Qualification
Typically requires a minimum of 3 years of related experience working in software development and support position in high technology company. Travel up to 25% may be expected.

Work history demonstrating good project management, organizational and communication skills working in and leading teams. Previous roles demonstrating R&D, new product development and customer facing assignments showing good understanding of both factory & customer needs / issues.
More About Us ….
Our work is everywhere you look – even if you can’t actually see it. Lam Research goes deeper than software or chips to the heart of the process that enables chip creation. So if you want to help power the components that empower everything, join us.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or on the basis of disability.",3.9,"Lam Research
3.9","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1980,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
34,"Software Engineer - (Python, C/C++/C#, Perl)",-1,"Job Description:
DEPROCESSING/IMAGING EMBEDDED HARDWARE

o Acquire images to perform the physical deprocessing of integrated circuits (ICs).

o Investigate and develop techniques to reduce or remove noise, balance intensity levels, and improve linearity of integrated circuit in all SEM captured images.

o Perform image analysis/processing tools to complete image capture requirements.

VULNERABILITY ANALYSIS

o Analyze the functionality of a hardware device

o Identify its security weaknesses/strengths

o Provide guidance for further enhancements

o Develop exploits to defeat hardware imposed security mechanisms that may enable retrieval of information stored within the device

o Use commercial design tools such as Cadence, Hercules, and Formality

SOFTWARE DEVELOPMENT

o Develop/enhance software tools and the associated graphical user interfaces (GUIs) to analyze, annotate and enhance images produced by any of the image acquisition tool systems

o Develop software programs in various programming languages (e.g. Python, C/C++/C#, Perl) in order to;

Implement image processing/manipulation algorithms.
Analyze digital logic and other circuit schematics.
Analyze large quantities of hardware-related data from a variety of sources.
Provide efficient software user interfaces.

Candidates should have a minimum of a Bachelors Degree in Computer Science or Electrical Engineering (or similiar) and ideally 14 years of relevant experience. Current TS/SCI required

Overview:

Entegra Systems designs, develops and deploys advanced technology and performs critical analytical roles to support our nation’s most important intelligence missions. Whether as a valued partner to other leading contractors, or directly for federal customers, Entegra brings innovative thinking, top-tier talent, and a positive attitude to every aspect of every project. Ethics and integrity are at the heart of our name, our brand, our people, our product, our way of doing business. Ethics and integrity are our core values that guide everything we do.

The work is challenging. The team is top-notch. The benefits are almost too good to be true.

There’s a reason Entegra is such a terrific place to work. Our founders looked at their own experiences as employees, and consciously decided to create a workplace that represented the “best of the best” of where they’d worked before. And make it even better.

Competitive pay is a given, though at Entegra, you do get paid for every hour you work. Our benefits have become something of a legend in our community. They’re that good. Because our people are our most important investment. Everybody gets time and budget for training. And we always work with our people to make sure their careers are on trajectories that work for them and us.

We’re not a company that’s just about filling seats. We’re about filling expectations — for our clients, our staff, our company. You’ll also find here a diverse, collegial atmosphere marked by mutual respect. Best of all, you’ll do important work with talented people. And you’ll make a difference for your country.",4.5,"Entegra Systems
4.5","Annapolis, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
35,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"At Tend, we’re combining top-notch care with soothing and safe environments, elevated hospitality, consumer-grade technology, and curated products to redefine going to the dentist as a whole-you wellness experience.

Reimagining dentistry takes a unique and diverse team, all working together through commitment, collaboration, and creativity to create the world’s first dental wellness experience. Join the team that makes going to the dentist an experience people look forward to.

We’re looking to add a Senior Data Engineer to our team who is experienced in creating SQL databases for a variety of applications and business uses. You’ll work across teams and use cutting edge tech to solve interesting, large-scale problems. Creating at a rapid pace you’ll make a direct and lasting impact anywhere that technology powers our business.
About the Role*
Design, implement and maintain reporting databases, data warehouse and OLAP data structures
Design, develop, test, deliver, and implement SQL solutions within ETL processes.
Manage day to day operations of multiple Microsoft SQL Server/Postgres databases.
Optimize databases for performance and scalability.
Develop, implement and optimize stored procedures and functions using T-SQL
Analyze, define, and document system requirements for data, workflow, logical processes, interfaces with other systems, internal and external checks and controls, and outputs.
Responsible for problem resolution, database configuration, capacity planning, performance tuning and optimizations.
Create and maintain database master plans, data dictionaries and disaster recovery documentation
Consults with internal and external clients to prototype, refine, test, and debug databases and obtain client approval.
Writes and maintains documentation to describe program development, logic, coding, testing, changes, and corrections.
Design, build, and deploy BI solutions (Looker)
Responsible for on-call emergency response during database failure.
Develops and maintains professional relationships
Promotes good working relationships among staff and between other disciplines and departments. Assumes individual accountability for own conduct and maintenance of professional attitude and appearance.
Approaches change in a positive manner, motivate staff to work as a team, accept constructive criticism and learn from it.
Must be able to apply principles of critical thinking to a variety of practical and emergent situations and accurately follow standardized procedures that may call for deviations.
Must be able to apply sound judgment beyond a specific set of instructions and apply knowledge to different factual situations.
Must be able to work under stress on a regular or continuous basis.
About You*
5+ years of experience with MSSQL/TSQL/BI
3+ years or more ETL concept exp
Bachelor’s degree.
Knowledge of dimensional and relational database models
Experience with web services (Both REST and SOAP).
Some programming experience.
Experience with MSSQL and/or Postgres
Our Goodie Bags are Pretty Impressive! *
Our comprehensive benefits & perks program will make you grin. Employer-sponsored healthcare coverage, 401(k) with an employer match, generous paid time off, a pre-tax commuter benefit, and much more!
Keeping the Tend Community Safe *
We’ve always been committed to providing the highest quality of care for our team and members. During this time, we are taking extra precautions to promote the health and safety of those who work and receive treatment at our studios. From enhanced PPE to sterilized equipment and staggered visit times with on-site temperature checks, we prioritize your health every step. For more information on how we’re making our dental visits safer, please visit: https://www.hellotend.com/notice
EEO Statement*
We are committed to promoting a work environment in which differences are respected, employees are treated fairly and individual contributions are valued and rewarded. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $102,859.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Application Question:
Will you now, or in the future, require sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g. H-1B visa status)?
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.5,"Tend
3.5","Nashville, TN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
36,Industrial IoT System Integration Developer / Engineer,-1,"Industrial IoT System Integration Developer / Engineer*
BID Group*
Location: South Eastern US*
The BID Group of Companies is a North American leader in the design, manufacture and support of World Class equipment, services and turnkey solutions for the solid wood processing industry. BID Group serves primarily the North American market and offers the most comprehensive range of products available, producing everything from mechanical equipment and control systems to optimization systems equipped with digital machine vision and AI technology. The company integrates its products & technology to deliver fully automated production lines. BID Group has over 1500 employees working in our many divisions located around North America.

The OPER8 offering is an Industrial Internet of Things (IoT) platform with custom BID-designed architecture centered around PTC ThingWorx that connects to operations and business/IT data sources and orchestrates the data to drive efficiency, reliability, and uptime in our customer’s operations through the use of data visualization, data analytics, and custom IoT applications.

The Industrial IoT System Integration Developer / Engineer is a highly motivated professional working with the OPER8 team. As a key member of the team, the successful candidate will be responsible for designing, developing, and deploying various end to end production, throughput, asset health and quality control solutions for our customers. The successful candidate must be technically inclined and willing and able to learn new technologies as they are required. We’re a small but growing team of highly motivated professionals that feed on results. We strive to create a fun, flexible and rewarding work environment.

Responsibilities Include:
Deploying data connectivity software and customized Edge programming on-premise.
Working extensively with the cloud based IIoT platform to deploy and develop offerings.
Configuring cloud databases.
Building and QA of queries for KPI development and dashboarding.
Preparing design documentation for technical and non-technical audiences.
Contributing to the product development team by staying up to date on disruptive, breakthrough technologies and processes.
Working closely with customer reliability engineers, data analysts, electrical/automation groups, and management.
Ensuring customer satisfaction and foster loyalty to the BID Group.
Skills and Qualifications
Background and/or education in one of the following: electrical or software engineering or computer science or 4+ years of relevant work experience.
2+ years of experience with programming languages: Javascript, Python, Java, C or Shell.
2+ years of experience with databases is required: TSDBs, SQL variants or Mongo, TICK stack experience preferred.
Familiarity with communication protocols and web standards: HTTP, Websocket, REST, RPC, KepServerEx, CIP, OPC, Ethernet/IP, MQTT.
Understanding of OOP or other programming models: composition, inheritance, polymorphism, async, flow inversion of control.
Allen Bradley ControlLogix system knowledge is beneficial, but training is provided as required.
PTC ThingWorx knowledge is beneficial, but training is provided as required.
IT/computer networking skills are an asset: LANs, subnets, troubleshooting communication issues.
Methodical, able to pay close attention to detail, and possess excellent communication skills.
Flexibility in learning new technologies, often independently and under pressure.
Able to work independently and be results driven.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
A “Fair Chance” job (you or the employer follow Fair Chance hiring practices when performing background checks)
A job for which all ages, including older job seekers, are encouraged to apply
A job for which people with disabilities are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
www.bidgroup.ca
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.9,"BID Group Technologies, US Inc
2.9",South Carolina,-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
37,Senior Process Engineer I – Downstream Manufacturing Development and Technology,$98k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Process Engineer I – Downstream Manufacturing Development and Technology
Location: Bedford, MA
Overview
We are seeking a highly motivated Senior Process Engineer I with outstanding knowledge and hands-on experience in downstream process development and process scale-up. This individual will be responsible for providing technical and scientific expertise to downstream process transfer, scale-up, and GMP manufacturing for Homology’s novel and proprietary adeno-associated virus (AAV) viral vectors. Critical to this role, is the ability to effectively communicate scientific findings and innovative solutions with other functions including Process Development, Manufacturing, Engineering, Quality and CMC teams.
Responsibilities
Play a lead role in providing routine person-in-plant support to downstream GMP manufacturing activities
Support downstream GMP manufacturing batch record review, change controls, deviations, etc.
Provide technical expertise in trouble-shooting, root cause analysis, and data trending toward continued downstream process improvement
Act as subject matter expert for technology transfer, scale-up, and process characterization
Collaborate with internal and external groups to ensure alignment and completion of project objectives and activities
Author technology transfer and GMP manufacturing campaign reports
Maintain and update downstream database containing information related to all GMP manufacturing activities; ensure data integrity and traceability
Support regulatory filings and responses to regulatory questions
Qualifications
A Ph.D., M.S. or B.S. in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering or related fields with a minimum of 2 (Ph.D.), 5 (M.S.) or 8 (B.S.) years of relevant industry experience.
Previous experience in downstream process development
Ability to operate cross-functionally with strong communication and interpersonal skills
Attitude to proactively learn and apply new technologies
Ability to assist in analyzing complex technical problems, and proposing new solutions
Willingness to travel both domestically and internationally (up to 15%)
Interested candidates should forward a cover letter and Resume / CV to careers@homologymedicines.com or on line:
www.homologymedicines.com
Homology Medicines, Inc. (HMI) has built foundational intellectual property on gene editing and gene therapy vectors derived from naturally occurring human adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The Company's technology is precise, on-target and highly efficient for in vivo editing of genetic mutations. This transformative platform technology, combined with an elite leadership team of biopharmaceutical industry veterans, create a significant opportunity for HMI to rapidly advance a diverse pipeline of new medicines that address and potentially cure the underlying cause of genetic diseases.",4.4,"Homology Medicines
4.4","New Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
38,Senior-Level Software Engineer / PHP Programmer,$77k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our fast-growing company with major clients in an exploding and innovative industry has openings for full-time, experienced PHP application developer to work on a variety of projects.
Candidate will be able to learn our proprietary content-delivery framework as well as our client facing MVC framework, and create highly functional pages for both administrative control and personalized end-user delivery on a robust platform serving millions of users.
This is a career-growth position for the right individual; join our team of programmers and engineers and you will be exposed to a variety of applications with the opportunity to ""learn up"" into a system-owner or management role. Your appetite for information and attention to detail will allow you to master the existing code base and learn our complex business.
The ideal candidate will have at least 6 years of software engineering experience in a fast-paced environment dealing with complex systems. Excellent communication skills are required, as is an ability to learn quickly.
Immediate Responsibilities:
Work with the AFS proprietary MVC framework and CMS housing our Loyalty programs
Design and develop efficient and scalable and responsive front-end and back-end solutions
Write secure code nullifying XSS, SQL injection and other threats
Ability to juggle between different time sensitive tasks
Work with a Linux environment for website and access and error logs
Capacity to debug and troubleshoot legacy code bases
Understand existing data models, backend data processes, platform architecture and inbound/outbound file processing
Learn and adhere to our system standard architecture/framework
Work with Account Associates, Ops Managers and Quality Analysts for client requests and inquiries
Handle code reviews for security and best practice purposes
Team player and junior developer mentorship
Off-hour support and work as needed
Technical Requirements and Skills:
Very strong coding with PHP 7
Strong understanding of the object-oriented design and programming paradigm
Proficiency with RESTful API web services
Ability to write and optimize complex SQL queries
Familiarity with HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, jQuery and Ajax
Strong understanding with XSS and SQL injection preventions
Comfortable to work on a Linux environment
Strong grasp of the MVC framework paradigm
Strong Git code repo and management skills
Follow industry coding and release standards
Experience with SSO using SAML 2.0 but not required
Experience working with project management tools like Jira
Critical and analytical thinking
Excellent communication skills
Qualifications:
Bachelors degree or higher in Computer Science or related discipline
At least 6 years’ experience of Web Development.
The candidate must be able to work in our NY office daily",3.2,"Affinity Solutions
3.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
39,Engineer - Satellite Flight Software (Mid to Senior),$67k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Space Dynamics Laboratory (SDL) is seeking mid to senior level software engineers to develop innovative, high-quality solutions to support customers in various small satellite programs.

SDL, a University Affiliated Research Center, has been developing innovative technologies and solutions for cutting-edge DoD and intelligence programs for almost six decades. Our expertise is in space and airborne IR, VIS, UV, and RF sensors, small satellite technologies, test and calibration, cybersecurity, data visualization and assurance, and ground stations.

Key Responsibilities:

· Developing and testing embedded space flight software

· Leading other software engineers

· Supporting spacecraft component integration and test

· Preparing satellites for launch

· Supporting software development and integration for mission planning, spacecraft operation, and telemetry data processing systems

Required Qualifications:

· BS degree in computer science, computer engineering, electrical engineering or other related, technical field

· 5+ years’ experience in C/C++, embedded software development, and hardware interface/control

· Capable of leading and mentoring a team of software engineers

· Experience with hardware testing, debugging, and interfaces

· Demonstrated ability to follow rigorous software development processes including analysis, design, testing, peer review, and continuous integration techniques

· Work effectively both independently and within multi-disciplinary teams

· Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal

· Must be a US citizen and be able to obtain a US government security clearance

· Must be able to travel on occasion

Preferred Qualifications:

· Familiarity with Linux, driver development, network programming, and concurrency

· 10+ years’ experience

SDL Benefits:

At SDL, we take pride in and highly value our employees. SDL offers competitive salaries and a fantastic benefits package, including:

· Flexible work schedules

· Generous annual, sick, and holiday paid leave

· A variety of inexpensive-premium, high-quality health, dental, vision, and life insurance options

· Generous employer retirement contribution (Up to 14.2% of annual gross earnings)

· Discounted USU tuition of 50% for employees and dependents

· Access to USU facilities and USU staff privileges

Instructions to applicants:

Along with the online application, please attach:

1) Cover Letter

2) Resume

Once you've completed the initial application, you will receive an e-mail requesting you to complete a video digital interview. For more information, please visit: https://hirevue.secure.force.com/E2Candidate/?lang=en_US

Please contact us if you do not receive a confirmation email within 24 hours of applying.

AA/EOE",4.5,"Space Dynamics Laboratory
4.5","Logan, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1959,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
40,Data Analyst/Lead Collateral Analyst,$69k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"At FHLB Des Moines, we work each day to develop an inclusive culture that supports and leverages the complexity of a diverse workforce. This enables us to effectively serve the needs of our members and help them succeed.

Responsibilities/Duties/Function/Tasks:
Extract data from Bank systems and validate for accuracy.
Analyze collateral data received from members in order to create spreadsheets, reports, and perform research.
Maintain a controlled operating environment, perform first line of defense data analysis, process reviews, ensuring compliance with Bank policy, regulation and procedures.
Manage and report on Member and Financial Operations End User Computing Applications (EUCs), ensuring compliance with necessary controls as outlined in the Bank’s policies and procedures
Analyze and develop processes to ensure compliance with all regulations, policies, and procedures
Identify and implement efficiencies within processes to aide in prompt, accurate delivery of products and services to our members
Ensure written procedures align with Bank policies and controls
Support management in preparation and validation of reports and presentations for the Board of Directors, Management, Internal Audit, FHFA examinations and members as well as other information as needed
Provide excellent service to internal and external customers by responding to requests for service and choosing the appropriate method for communicating with members and co-workers
Manage departmental internal controls and regulatory issues
Ensure business activities are in line with Strategic Business Plans
Provide backup to the other Member and Financial Operations Collateral Analysts as needed
Perform other duties and projects as assigned
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in an accounting, finance, business or math-related fields or equivalent experience in a financial services field.
Experience with mortgage lending documentation (residential, commercial, and/or agricultural) a plus
Experience working with securities a plus
High attention to detail; inquisitive mind-set.
Strong verbal and written communications skills that promote effective working relationships in a team-oriented environment.
Strong organization and presentation skills.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to interact effectively with customers, vendors and employees at all levels of the Bank
Strong computer skills, including proficiency using Microsoft Windows, Word, Excel and Visio.
Experience with business intelligence & visualization software such QlikView, Qlik Sense or similar is preferred
Solid understanding of business process flows, data sources and controls
Must be analytical and team-oriented, enthusiastic and able to work in a fast-paced environment
Excellent project management and multi-tasking skills
Ability to work independently.
Demonstrated ability to partner and build strong collaborative, trusting relationships.
Ability to positively engage, self-motivate and possess a strong desire to learn.
Manage, analyze, and recommend changes to processes and procedures within the Bank’s control framework, perform comprehensive mapping of business processes, while encompassing requirements of SOX controls, general controls, End User Computing Applications and Qliksense reports to ensure compliance with Bank policies, procedures and applicable regulations. Further improve the quality and strength of collaborative risk assessment initiatives for all controlled operating environments focusing on the reporting of numerous processes including, but not limited to member collateral, Muni Evaluations and pricing thus enabling a more synchronized approach for internal audits, external audits and regulatory exams.",3.4,"FHLB Des Moines
3.4","Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1932,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
41,SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js,-1,"SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js*
(Top Secret - TS/SCI Clearance Required!)
BigBear, Inc.* is an industry-leading provider of big data computing and analytics solutions. We help people make sense of their data using our cloud-based platform and big data processing algorithms. Each day, we crunch massive volumes of structured and unstructured data into usable and actionable information for our customers. We currently have offices in Reston, VA., Charlottesville, VA., and San Diego, CA.
REQUIRED: *
5+ years of professional software development experience (MINIMUM)*
Solid experience with Python/ Django, Node JS, or Flask.
Solid experience with PostgreSQL.
Solid experience in Linux environment.
Solid experience with data modeling, business logic, and RESTful APIs.
Experience with NGINX and SSL.
US Citizenship and TS/SCI US Security Clearance.*
BS/MS in Computer Science or related field or equivalent military experience.
BONUS SKILLS: *
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum development process.
Experience with deployment automation in Amazon Web Services.
Experience with Django Framework.
Experience with geospatial toolkits including GDAL and PostGIS
Experience with high volume data flow.
Solid experience with Amazon Web Services (EC2, S3, SQS, RDS).
TECHNOLOGY WE USE: *
ElasticSearch
PostgreSQL
Python - Django
Java
AWS
Docker
Git
Angular, React
Jenkins
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)
· A competitive salary based on experience
· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional
· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%
· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables
· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company
· Education Assistance
· 529 College Savings Plan - optional
· Healthy Rewards Program
· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional
· Gym Reimbursement
· Pet Insurance - optional
· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things
· Flexible Hours
· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks
· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $135,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
We are mostly working remotely at the moment due to COVID but we will be back to full time onsite at some point in the not too distant future

Experience:
Python: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Reston, VA 20191 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Relocation Assistance Provided:
No
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
www.bigbear.io
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
42,Senior Data Engineer,$67k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta has an immediate need for a Senior Data Engineer to join a fast-paced program in support of a government customer with a very critical national security mission. This is a multi-year program, where the successful candidate will work on an interdisciplinary project team of more than 30 highly qualified individuals with a wide array of skills that include client (reactjs), server (spring java), QA Automation Engineers, UI/UX Designers, and DevOps engineers. The team is responsible for building a next generation Mission Information System and is performing greenfield Software Development using modern technologies via an Agile DevOps approach.

This Senior Data Engineer will play a vital role collaborating as part of this cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance data ingestion pipelines and address big data challenges. The Senior Data Engineer will work closely with the Chief Architect, systems engineers, software engineers, and data scientists on the following key tasks:
Provide Extraction, Transformation, and Load (ETL) experience coupled with enterprise search capabilities to solve Big Data challenges
Design and implement high-volume data ingestion and streaming pipelines using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Flink, Nifi, and Kafka on AWS Cloud
Leverage strategic and analytical skills to understand and solve customer and business centric questions
Create prototypes and proofs of concept for iterative development
Learn new technologies and apply the knowledge in production systems
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the enterprise data pipelines and the data lake
Partner with various teams to define and execute data acquisition, transformation, processing and make data actionable for operational and analytics initiatives

Required Qualifications / Experience:

BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or a related technical field or equivalent experience with at least 8+ years in systems engineering or administration (6+ years with a MS/MIS Degree).
Must have an active Top Secret security clearance and able to obtain a TS/SCI with Polygraph.
3 years of experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, NiFi.
3 years of experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python (preferred) and/or Java.
3 years of experience with and managing data across relational SQL and NoSQL databases like MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, HDFS, Redis, and Elasticsearch.
3 years of experience working in a Linux environment.
2 years of experience working with and designing REST APIs.
Experience in designing/developing platform components like caching, messaging, event processing, automation, transformation and tooling frameworks.
Experience developing data ingest workflows with stream-processing systems: Spark-Streaming, Kafka Streams and/or Flink.
Experience transforming data in various formats, including JSON, XML, CSV, and zipped files.
Experience with performance tuning of ETL jobs.
Experience developing flexible ontologies to fit data from multiple sources and implementing the ontology in the form of database mappings / schemas.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills necessary to work effectively with customers and other team members.

Preferred Qualifications / Experience:

Data engineering experience in the Intelligence Community or other government agencies.
Experience with Microservices architecture components, including Docker and Kubernetes.
Experience developing microservices to fit data cleansing, transformation and enrichment needs.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Athena and/or Glue.
Experience with Jira, Confluence and extensive experience with Agile methodologies.
Knowledge about security and best practices.
Experience developing flexible data ingest and enrichment pipelines, to easily accommodate new and existing data sources.
Experience with software configuration management tools such as Git/Gitlab, Salt, Confluence, etc.
Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and their enabling tools such as Jenkins, Nexus, etc.
Detailed oriented/self-motivated with the ability to learn and deploy new technology quickly.

Clearance Level: TS/SCI with Poly

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
43,Data Engineer - AWS,-1,"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with AWS in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oRDS
oAWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB
oAmazon Redshift
oAWS DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline
oAWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAmazon EMR
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
o AWS Kinesis Analytics, AWS Lambda
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAWS QuickSight
oAmazon Athena
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAWS S3
oAWS ElastiCache
oAWS CloudSearch
•Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",-1,"Solution Design Group, Inc.","Golden Valley, MN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
44,Senior Embedded Performance Engineer,$76k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"CIeNET is a leading global technical consulting, software engineering, and technical solutions provider.

Our team is working on design, development and maintenance of best-in-class platforms in automotive, enterprise, mobility industries for leading OEMs and looking for experienced engineers with extensive embedded software development background in developing linux based devices.

Candidate will play a key role in our embedded systems team and work on analysis and optimization of system performance on Linux devices.

Day to day responsibilities include:

Triaging, troubleshooting, and developing software to reach the required performance targets.
Contribute to technical discussion and defect analysis with various technical teams.
Provide work estimate project milestone planning
Be responsible for the complete SDLC , including requirements analysis, design, development, code review, integration, and maintenance
Collaborate with team members in software development activities using the Scrum/Agile development process.

Requirements

Qualified candidates must be able to demonstrate extraordinary skills in attention to system performance improvement: understand complex software systems, perform system performance analysis, propose and develop performance improvement features, and have technical capabilities of investigation and fixing bottlenecks.
Bachelor’s degree or above in Computer Science, Computer/Electrical Engineering or equivalent.
5+ years of software engineering experience in performance analysis and optimization of Linux system performance.
Experience in system performance diagnosis, bottleneck localization, and deep-dive analysis.
Skills in using Linux/Android/Chromium OSS performance tools and ability to select appropriate tools based on problems.
Experience in software development with C/C++ and Linux software development environment.
Strong understanding of code optimization, memory management, data coherency, concurrency and multi-threading, and experience in software performance analysis
Deep understanding of Linux systems, Linux architecture, and Linux internals.
Good knowledge on system stress, load, reliability, and endurance testing. Experience on the system KPI analysis.
Strong problem solving and debugging skills on Linux systems.
Strong scripting skills - Bash / Python.
Excellent technical communication, and interpersonal and teamwork skills.
Domain knowledge on networking, BT, audio, video, or browsers will be a plus.

Benefits

Full-time salaried position
Excellent Health Benefits
PTO and Sick Leave
401K Matching
Must be able to pass a background check",3.6,"CIeNET International
3.6","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
45,Software Engineer - Adobe Multi Solutions - Remote,$37k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Pay Range: $78,312 - $97,107 annually

Applicants for this position can work remotely from their home! Applicants must live in Nebraska, Kansas, Iowa or Texas however due to store locations and tax purposes.

At NFM, we’ve been hiring friends since 1937—people who share our passion for helping customers feel right at home. If you share our vision, we invite you to be one of us!

People love working here! Glassdoor ranked Nebraska Furniture Mart in the top 50 Best Places to Work in the U.S. and here are a few reasons why:

A FUN, stable work environment, with no lay-offs in our history
A safe place to work and shop
A path to the career of your dreams (career development opportunities)
A culture that encourages volunteering and serving our communities

Job Description: Your Piece of the Puzzle

NFM’s Adobe Multi-Solution Engineer is responsible to be the subject matter expert for Adobe Campaign Standard and other Adobe Experience Cloud Products and Services such as Launch and Analytics. The primary responsibility will be to translate business requirements for these tools into custom implementations by using a combination of custom JavaScript, data layer objects, processing rules, report suite configurations and technical workflows.

Job Duties: A Day in the Life

Plan: Gather and understand unique business requirements and implement the desired solutions
Research: Proactively identify, analyze, and position opportunities to improve digital analytics front-end implementation based on internal and external data
Collaborate: Coordinate final project quality analysis, reporting, transferring of reporting knowledge, provide close-loop communication within the organization including creating senior executive dashboard
Create: Perform extensive testing, create queries to extract and validate segment data and sizing or perform quality analysis testing to validate project test data
Design: Setup new SProps and eVar through Adobe Analytics
Optimize: Act as the owner of Adobe Launch and coordinate with the web-dev team to realize tagging

Your work will directly impact our ability to help people create a lifestyle they love, for the people they love—because that’s what we love.

Benefits: What’s in It for You?

As a full-time member of our NFM Family, you will enjoy:

Competitive pay
Health, dental, vision and life Insurance
Paid holiday and paid time off
Staff discount on merchandise
(Collectively, NFM staff has saved almost $2 million on purchases in the last 12 months)
Tuition reimbursement
Paid training
401(k) with company matching
Short and long-term disability
Employee assistance program
Career development and advancement opportunities
Community volunteer opportunities

NFM is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

Experience
Required
• Bachelors’ Degree in Computer Information Systems, related field required or equivalent experience
• 1+ year of hands on Adobe Campaign Standard experience or 3+ years of marketing campaign development experience on a tool equivalent to Adobe Campaign Standard (Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Cheetahmail, …)
• At least 2 years of experience in software development life cycle
• At least 1 year of experience in translating functional/non-functional requirements to system requirements
• Expertise and Experience in SQL (Oracle / SQL Server / PostgreSQL)
• Experience working with/creating APIs
• Strong understanding of tag management systems and platforms (Adobe DTM/Launch, GTM, Tealium, Ensighten, etc…)
• Excellent understanding of analytics and tag management best practices, including workflows and planning
• Outstanding project management skills with proven experience managing end-to-end projects including managing budget, timelines/milestones, multiple partners and deliverables
• Demonstrated ability to manage simultaneous projects in a fast-paced environment
• Estimation abilities in scoping work in a highly complex environment
• Must be able to work independently and collaboratively (team oriented) with an enthusiastic attitude
• Strong interpersonal, communication and influencing skills
• Problem analysis and problem resolution at both a strategic and a functional level
• Ability to work nights, weekends and/or early morning hours based on business needs
• Pre-employment screening includes, but isn’t limited to, drug screen and criminal background check
Preferred
• Proficient in Adobe Launch
• Experience migrating Tag Management Systems
• Experience with on-demand reporting/Analysis/business intelligence tools, including Tableau, etc…
• Experience with Commerce Cloud
• Experience with Adobe Campaign, Adobe Target, or other Adobe Solutions (Audience Manager, AEM)
• Experience with Agile development philosophy, practices, and tools
• The right mix of experience in Marketing and Technology is highly desirable
• Adobe Analytics Certification – Certified Expert, Business Practitioner; Certified Expert, Technical Architect
• 2 years of technical workflow development experience in Adobe Campaign Standard and 4 years in a related tool (Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Cheetahmail, …)
• 3+ years’ experience with Web Analytics Tools
• 2 years+ experience in JavaScript and Various JavaScript libraries and Experience in Workflow (Import, export, maintenance, data extraction)
Education
Preferred
Bachelor's Degree or better in Computer Science or related field",3.3,"Nebraska Furniture Mart
3.3","Omaha, NE",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1937,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
46,IDCS Systems Engineer- Python Developer,$43k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"About SHI:

Innovative Solutions. World Class Support.

Constantly growing in response to the needs of our customers in all sectors and verticals, SHI has transformed itself from a $1 million ""software-only"" regional reseller into a $11 billion global provider of information technology products and services.

From software and hardware procurement to deployment planning, configuration, data center optimization, IT asset management and cloud computing, SHI offers custom IT solutions for every aspect of your environment.

Privately-held and under the guidance of our current ownership since 1989, SHI has experienced tremendous growth in size and scope through neither merger nor acquisition. Our organic growth and two decades of stability are a direct result of backing a highly-skilled and tenured sales force with software volume licensing experts, hardware procurement specialists and certified IT services professionals.

Headquartered in Somerset, NJ, SHI supports their clients from over 30 offices throughout the U.S., Canada, the U.K., Germany, France and Hong Kong. SHI’s goal is to foster long-term, mutually-beneficial relationships with its customers and partners, every day.

What SHI Can Offer:

World Class Facility includes on site gyms, restaurants and community events
Ongoing opportunities for personal and professional growth and development due to our strong promote from within philosophy
Work in an up-beat, creative, and fun environment
Benefits, include medical, vision, dental, 401K, and flexible spending

Job Summary:

The Integration Systems Engineer will help build out, maintain, and enhance our rapidly expanding internal automation infrastructure. She/he will be part of a talented team of engineers in our Integration Data Center Services team that demonstrate superb technical competency, delivering data center critical infrastructure and ensuring the highest levels of availability and performance. The Integration Systems Engineer will be responsible for supporting a growing deployment network and all underlying systems related to supporting Integration Services workloads and IT project deployment. The Systems Engineer will utilize critical thinking and problem solving in concert with industry tested and internally developed tools to deliver a stable platform that the build technicians can use to analyze, configure, and deploy hardware devices within the customer defined architecture.

This position is required to report to the SHI Piscataway NJ office location as determined by SHI management.

Responsibilities:

• Install, configure, validate, and troubleshoot data center hardware, software, and systems.
• Proactively ensure the highest levels of internal systems and infrastructure availability.
• Maintain internal infrastructure, network, and automation environment.
• Write and maintain custom scripts to automate tasks including configuration and hardware verification in order to increase efficiency and remove human error.
• Participate in the design of automation, information and operational support systems.
• Provide high level support and insight related to builds both internally and to customers.
• Liaise with vendors and other IT personnel for problem escalation and resolution.
• Provide support for dynamic client information technology needs.
• Interface with Project Management and Quality Control teams in order to determine integration requirements and expectations.
• Participate in customer and internal technical calls and meetings.
• May be required to work beyond normal shift to finish projects.
• It is expected that the candidate is motivated, disciplined and able to produce quality results under pressure.

Qualifications:

•Minimum 3-5 years of working experience in installing, configuring and troubleshooting servers, switches, routers, firewalls, and other datacenter appliances.
• Minimum 3-5 years of working experience in installing, configuring and troubleshooting UNIX/Linux/Windows Server/ESXi environments.
• Minimum 3-5 years of infrastructure and network monitoring/management systems.
• Minimum 3-5 years experience working with large scale IT projects related to deployment and configuration.
• Minimum of 2-3 years of experience with scripting (e.g., shell scripts, Python, Perl).
Solid networking knowledge/skills (OSI network layers, TCP/IP, DHCP, DNS, Routing).

Required Skills:

• Strong critical thinking and problem-solving skills.
• Ability to work individually without much direction while also working as part of a team towards a common goal.
• Ability to multitask while retaining strong attention to detail.
• Ability to communicate with customers at all levels.
• Demonstrated scripting skills (e.g., shell scripts, Python, Perl).
• Ability to master new technologies
• Ability to conceptualize capabilities and document the technical plan
• Ability to train other team members and hand off tasks when necessary
• Distribute workloads to other team members and move action items forward
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills, and have the ability to articulate ideas succinctly.
• Reliable and can be depended upon to show up, complete tasks and is required to give plenty of notice when scheduling time off.
• Motivated, disciplined and able to produce quality results under pressure.

Preferred Skills

•Experience with infrastructure automation tools (xCAT, Ansible, Cobbler, Chef, etc.)
• Experience working with RESTful APIs.
• Experience and capable operating in CLI-based environments.
• Experience with modern data center technologies and concepts.
• Certifications in technology related disciplines such as Networking (CCNA, CCNP) or Server Infrastructure (MCSE) is desired but not mandatory.
• College Degree in technology related discipline is desired but not mandatory.

Unique Requirements:

• May need to stay late or work extended hours to meet deliverables.

Equal Employment Opportunity – M/F/Disability/Protected Veteran Status

Additional Information:
FLSA Status: Exempt

Equal Employment Opportunity – M/F/Disability/Protected Veteran Status",3.6,"SHI International
3.6","Piscataway, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
47,Senior Software Engineer II -,$95k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Healthcare– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

A Tabula Rasa Healthcare Co., CareKinesis, is looking for a telented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based medication Risk Mitigation Platform The candidates selected for these roles will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer II, he or she will take a paramount role as a tech lead in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship. He or she will also be a key member in the overall assessment, vision, and implementation of our technical decisions by participating in cross-team committees.

Location: Mount Pleasant, SC

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Function as a tech lead in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services as well as a Rails Core application in our EOM Platform. (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js, Ruby, Rails preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Participation in cross-team architecture, design, process discussions and decisions within established committees.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
Experience:
10+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Preferred Experience in Healthcare Technology and/or Pharmacy Operations.
Preferred Experience with EHRs, integrations, system validations (EPIC, Cerner, QS/1, etc.).
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus
Qualifications:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Experience with performance optimization, especially the use of asset pipelines and CDNs, as well as tools used to analyze front end performance bottlenecks.
Preferred experience with database re-factoring and decomposing existing systems from a monolith to a micro-services architecture.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to work remote when warranted.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE",4.4,"CareKinesis
4.4","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
48,Principal Software Engineer - File Accelerator,$84k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nasuni is growing and looking for talented engineers to help found a new File Accelerator Team and create a new product. This is a green-field opportunity at an established leading tech company to build something new from scratch using industry best-practices. We're looking for multi-disciplined software engineers interested in all aspects of product development - architecture, design, coding, testing, CI/CD, release & deployment management - all in an Agile environment.

The Role: Principal Software Engineer

Key skills we're looking for include:

* At least 5 years of python development in a product environment.

* Demonstrable experience with AWS Serverless technologies including API Gateway and Lambda. AWS certifications a plus.

* Development of testing frameworks, building CI/CD pipelines, and management of 3rd party packages.

* High-scale computing in enterprise or global production environments that are receiving, handling, and processing large amounts of data in a time-critical manner.

* Data modeling of SQL and/or no-SQL databases, including AWS DynamoDB.

* Infrastructure-as-code technologies like AWS CloudFormation or Terraform, as well as, command line tools for managing this infrastructure.

* Monitoring of and alerting on highly available systems
Focus on quality by testing, code reviews, and other methodologies.

Nice-to-have Skills:

Data analysis and /or high-scale request and data processing with recommendation systems.

Other high-level languages for prior serverless development including Golang, Java, and Javascript.

Nasuni is hiring remotely during Covid-19. This team will be based in Boston Seaport. We will consider remote employees for this team who have created high-scale computing products in serverless environments.

About Nasuni

Nasuni delivers a single software platform to store, protect, synchronize, and collaborate on unstructured file data at scale. Nasuni Cloud File Services, powered by the patented UniFS® global file system, leverages cloud storage to modernize primary NAS and file server storage; file archiving; backup; and disaster recovery, while offering transformational new capabilities for multi-site file collaboration. By combining the low cost, unlimited capacity, and durability of private or public cloud object storage with the high performance, security, and broad application compatibility of traditional disk-based file storage, the Nasuni subscription service improves workforce productivity, simplifies IT operations, and reduces IT costs. Nasuni operates globally from its worldwide headquarters in Boston, Mass., USA.

Why work at Nasuni?
As part of our commitment to your well-being, we are pleased to offer comprehensive benefits packages to employees across the world. Benefits packages vary by geography, but generally include:
Take-What-You-Need paid time off
Incentive stock options
Comprehensive health, dental, and vision plans
Life and disability insurance
Retirement plan
Generous employee referral bonuses
To all recruitment agencies: Nasuni does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our job boards, Nasuni employees or any other company location. Nasuni is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.

Nasuni is an equal opportunity employer. The equal employment opportunity policy at Nasuni protects employees and job applicants from discrimination on the bases of race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or other non-merit based factors. These protections extend to all management practices and decisions, including recruitment and hiring practices, appraisal systems, promotions, and training and career development programs.",3.9,"Nasuni
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
49,Senior Software Engineer - EOM,-1,"Tabula Rasa Healthcare– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

A Tabula Rasa Healthcare Co., CareKinesis, is looking for a talented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based medication Risk Mitigation Platform. The candidate selected for this role will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer, he or she will take a paramount role as a tech lead in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship. He or she will also be a key member in the overall assessment, vision, and implementation of our technical decisions by participating in cross-team committees.

Location: Mount Pleasant, SC

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Function as a tech lead in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services as well as a Rails Core application in our EOM Platform. (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js, Ruby, Rails preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Participation in cross-team architecture, design, process discussions and decisions within established committees.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
Experience:
6+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Preferred Experience in Healthcare Technology and/or Pharmacy Operations.
Preferred Experience with EHRs, integrations, system validations (EPIC, Cerner, QS/1, etc.).
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus
Qualifications:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Experience with performance optimization, especially the use of asset pipelines and CDNs, as well as tools used to analyze front end performance bottlenecks.
Preferred experience with database re-factoring and decomposing existing systems from a monolith to a micro-services architecture.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to work remote when warranted.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE",4.4,"CareKinesis
4.4","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
50,Senior Software Engineer - EireneRx,$95k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Healthcare– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

A Tabula Rasa Healthcare Co., CareKinesis, is looking for a talented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based medication decision-support and e-prescribing platform team, EireneRx.

EireneRx is the source of patient demographics and medication information between Nurses, Prescribers, Technicians, and Pharmacists. From on demand and automated messaging, to medication entry & e-prescribing with clinical analysis and recommendations, to detailed and high level reporting across the board - EireneRx is the all in one place for clinical interactions between our clients and our pharmacy. EireneRx primarily serves the Program for All-inclusive Care of the Elderly (PACE), and has been reducing healthcare costs and improving patients' lives since 2010.

The candidate selected for this role will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer, he or she will take a paramount role in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship.

Location: Mount Pleasant, SC

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services as well as a Ruby on Rails Core application in our EireneRx Platform. (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js, Ruby, Rails preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
Experience:
8+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Experience in Healthcare Technology (preferred)
Qualifications:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to work remote when warranted.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!",4.4,"CareKinesis
4.4","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
51,COL - Data Engineer,$67k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Daugherty Business Solutions, a leading advisory services and technology consulting firm will be expanding its operations to open a new, world-class Software Development Center in Columbus, Ohio to support its rapid growth and to engage the region’s diverse talent pool and thriving business community.

In addition to existing Software Development Centers across the organization; in Minneapolis, Atlanta, Dallas, Chicago, NY and the St. Louis Headquarters, the team in Columbus will strategically support Daugherty’s growth strategy and commitment to delivering high quality software fast and effectively for its Fortune 500 clients.

From Ron Daugherty, founder and CEO of Daugherty Business Solutions: “I am excited to announce that Daugherty is expanding to Columbus, OH. This expansion is a direct result of the hard work of our consultants during this pandemic. Daugherty teammates continue to find ways to add even more value for our clients and to increase the demand for our consulting expertise. Columbus is a growing metro area with a strong base of talent, excellent universities, and interesting perspective clients. That’s why I’m proud to add Columbus to our existing development centers across the country.”

Data & Analytics

Daugherty is hiring experienced Data Engineers to join our Columbus-based team. The ideal employee is a problem solver with the ability to utilize insights, creativity and perspective to drive business success for our clients.

As a Data Engineer you will have the opportunity to:
Contribute to the creation and maintenance of optimal data pipeline architectures.
Collaborate and work closely with team to build data platforms.
Maintain and manage Hadoop clusters in development and production environments.
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional/non-functional business requirements.
Work with team members and functional leads to understand existing data requirements and validation rules to support moving existing data warehouse workloads into a distributed data platform.
Create custom software components (e.g. specialized UDFs) and analytics applications.
Employ a variety of languages and tools to marry systems together.
Recommend ways to improve data reliability, efficiency and quality.
Implement & automate high-performance algorithms, prototypes and predictive models.
We are looking for motivated people with:
Interest working with AWS technologies such as Redshift, RDS, S3, EMR, ADP, Hive, Kinesis, SNS/SQS and QuickSight.
Interest in Python, R, sh/bash and JVM-based languages including Scala and Java.
Interest in Hadoop family languages including Pig and Hive.
Familiarity with high performance data libraries including Spark, NumPy and TensorFlow.
Proven ability to pick up new languages and technologies quickly.
Intermediate level of SQL programming and query performance tuning techniques for data integration and consumption using design for optimum performance against large data assets within an OLTP, OLAP and MPP architecture.
Knowledge of cloud and distributed systems principles, including load balancing, networks, scaling, and in-memory versus disk.
Experience building data pipelines to connect analytics stacks, client data visualization tools and external data sources.
Exposure to stream-processing and messaging, such as Storm, Spark-Streaming, Kafka and MQ.
Understanding of DevOps and CI/CD toolset, such as Jenkins, GitLab CI, Buildbot, Drone and Bamboo.
Some experience with programming Languages, such as Scala, Java, R and Python.
We offer members of Team Daugherty:
Excellent health, dental and vision insurance.
Revenue sharing and a 401(k) retirement savings plan.
Life, disability and long-term care insurance.
Little to no travel.
Robust career development and training.
When you are a Daugherty employee, your job doesn’t end when a contract is up. You stay on as an indispensable member of the team with career growth opportunities tailored to your interests and talents. We want you to be eager to take on a new challenge. We are always 100% honest about what to expect, because we don’t want Daugherty to be just another job; we want Daugherty to be your dream job.

Interested? Apply today to take your career to the next level!

Due to COVID-19, most of our employees are working remotely. We’ve implemented a virtual hiring process and continue to interview candidates by phone or video and are onboarding new hires remotely. We value the safety of each member of our community because we know we’re all in this together.

Daugherty Business Solutions is an inclusive Equal Employment Opportunity employer that considers applicants without regard to gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, ethnicity, disabled or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

If you require accommodations or assistance to complete the online application process, please inform any recruiter you are working with (or send an email to careers@daugherty.com) and identify the type of accommodation or assistance you are requesting. Do not include any medical or health information in this email. The recruiting team will respond to your email promptly.",4.4,"Daugherty Business Solutions
4.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1985,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
52,Data Engineer,$67k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

NJVC, LLC

Company Job Title: Data Engineer

Clearance: Top Secret with ability to obtain SCI

Location: Springfield, VA

Reports To: Program Manager

FLSA Status: Exempt, Full Time, Regular

Summary:

The Data Engineer will work with product owners and data stewards to deliver high quality technical solutions in response to business requirements. You will be counted on to provide your peers with technical expertise that will offer solutions for difficult programming problems.

Duties and Responsibilities:

SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS) including UI and custom code features.
Write or create stored procedures, SQL scripts, SSIS packages that can be used to:
Move data from source databases to target databases
Clean / Condition data
Convert or transform data
Reconcile and confirm converted data
Find data errors
Validate data to business rules
Ability to examine existing ETL scripts and track data back to source
SQL Server administration, tuning, and workbench.
Work with business experts to understand data and complete data mappings.
Focus on the development of extract, transform, and load (ETL) jobs currently using Microsoft SQL, Server, and SSIS.
The environment currently supports hundreds of related ETL jobs that move data between 30 different source systems and between multiple classifications.
Part of the challenge as a data engineer will be to find scalable and efficient coding solutions that plug into this extensible system in order to add more data to the Enterprise data store.
Other duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.)

Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field
Equivalent years of experience in lieu of degree
4 years of relevant experience with the following software / tools:
Experience with Microsoft SQL
Prior experience supporting IC/DoD
The existing data warehouse is built on Microsoft SQL hosted on Amazon Web Services (AWS), so experience developing solutions that scale well in these environments is a plus.
Active Top-Secret Clearance with ability to obtain SCI

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Ability to work independently and yet be effective within a team setting
Must be capable of managing multiple efforts with time related constraints in a fast-paced contracting environment
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate and collaborate with diverse internal and external stakeholder groups and individuals
Friendly presence, helpful attitude, good interpersonal skills, and ability to work well with others.
Excellent skills in Microsoft Word, Excel, and other Office applications
Proficient with Microsoft Office Applications, and experience working in a home office setting as well as the ability to train end users on frequently asked technical issues.
Ability to provide technical assistance and support over the phone; good phone skills, professional demeanor, previous customer service experience strongly desired.

Good problem-solving skills; ability to visualize a problem/situation and think abstractly to solve it

Physical Demands: (The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.)

While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.

Work Environment: (The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.)

The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.
During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise.

Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Native preference under PL 93-638.

We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.

Primary Location: United States-Virginia-Springfield

Organization: NJVC

Strategic Business Unit: Military Intelligence and Operations Support

Security Requirements: Top Secret

Job Schedule: Full Time Exempt

Recruiter: Jonas Patterson

Req ID: 2000001203",2.9,"Chenega Corporation
2.9","Springfield, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
53,Data Engineer,$74k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Group O is seeking a strong candidate with advanced analytics experience to fill an exciting Data Engineer role for an AI partner to Fortune 500 companies. In this role, you will be a valuable in managing large amounts of data and implement loading disparate data sets while managing the technical communication between the team and client.

Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, preprocessing using Hive and Pig.
Manage the technical communication between the team and client
Work with big data team to deliver cutting edge solutions

2-5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Ideally, this would include work on the following technologies:
Proficiency in at least one of the following: R, C++ or Python (preferred). Scala knowledge a strong advantage.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc..
Hands-on experience with Apache Spark and its components (Streaming, SQL, MLLib) is a strong advantage.
Operating knowledge of cloud computing platforms (AWS, especially EMR, EC2, S3, SWF services and the AWS CLI)
Experience working within a Linux computing environment, and use of command line tools including knowledge of shell/Python scripting for automating common tasks
In addition, the ideal candidate would have great problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners.
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related technical degree",3.1,"Group O
3.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
54,Product Testing & Lab Operations Engineer,$53k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"PURPOSE OF JOB

Do you have ideas? Do you look at a product and want to understand how it delivers its benefits? Do you like hands on work? Do you like collaborating and coordinating with others to achieve a goal?

Lead product testing for the growing Owens Corning Roofing Components business. This role will be based at the Components R&D Center in Granville, OH which includes a Product Testing Laboratory that conducts performance testing and a Pilot Line that runs prototyping trials. This supports the manufacturing and new product development activities for the Roofing, Geosynthetics, and Protective Packaging business segments. The work includes leading lab coordination and improvements, product testing, data collection and analysis, competitive benchmarking and customer-inspired test method development. This position works closely with the product development, pilot, quality, IP teams and customers.

Join an organization that believes that every employee owns a piece of our bold growth goals and ultimate success. We are a market-leading Fortune 500® company with a history and focus on growth through customer-inspired innovation. Owens Corning is devoted to delivering sustainable solutions across our three business segments while striving to ensure our people and products make the world a better place. We take pride in having an inclusive and diverse workplace with employees around the globe. A holistic sense of community exists across our entire organization as our talent grows globally. We are a company that fully recognizes the importance of paving a path to a sustainable and safe enterprise through investing in our people. Our desire to make an impactful difference in the world flows from top down to all levels of the organization. By being a company that instills pride within each and every employee, we aspire to build market-leading businesses; global in scope - human in scale.

Reports to: Program Leader, Components Core Technologies

Span of Control: An individual contributor of a small team.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES

LAB LEADERSHIP (50%)

Coordinates lab activities and delivers operations improvements, partnering with others to deliver successful outcomes.

Coordinates day to day execution of product testing, test method development and benchmarking
Establishes and improves operations, including management systems and workflows
Determines priority calls in conjunction with customers, and ensures timely completion of tests
Leads communication and collaboration within team, with lab customers, and stakeholders
Sets personal performance and development objectives and delivers against these
Collaborates to define the team strategy and metrics for growth and leads execution against milestones

TEST METHOD DEVELOPMENT & PRODUCT TESTING (50%)

Develops test methods and technical claims.Conducts product testing and competitive benchmarking.

Lives the Owens Corning safety culture every day, working safely and identifying and driving improvements
Conducts product testing, analyzes data and reports results and recommendations
Develops customer-inspired test methods and validates against field performance
Develops meaningful technical claims to help market and sell OC products
Provides technical direction and feedback to others, sharing knowledge throughout the organization
Supports operation of pilot line plastic extrusion equipment to create prototypes

JOB REQUIREMENTS

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelors degree in Engineering or Science field
Must be comfortable using a computer including MS Office Suite (Word, Excel, Outlook, Powerpoint)
Knowledge of laboratory practices
Ability to repetitively lift objects up to 40 lbs and stand for a large portion of the day

PREFERRED EXPERIENCE:

2-3 years experience in industrial R&D lab is preferred
Experience leading teams and projects, especially in R&D environment is preferred
Experience using statistics to drive data-based decisions and develop customer-inspired test methods is preferred
Technical knowledge and experience with ASTM, roofing, geosynthetics, or packaging testing is preferred
Prior experience operating plastic extrusion equipment is preferred
Ability to travel up to 10% of the time is preferred

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:

Strong desire to learn and own delivery of project and team outcomes.
Self-motivated with the ability and desire to work independently to learn and apply new technical areas.
Team oriented, with high energy and desire to build strong relationships, collaborate and drive results across multi-functional and discipline boundaries in a dynamic environment.
Passion for understanding how things work and the ability to collect, analyze and present data to drive decisions.
Resilience and agility to adapt to an ever-changing environment and business.
Out of the box thinking to identify new approaches to overcome obstacles.
Organized leader with the interest to build a team, direct work, drive improvements and deliver outcomes.
Ability to understand and translate customer needs into feasible test methods and meaningful technical claims.
Practices safety-conscious behaviors in all operational processes and procedures.
Attention to detail and dedication to documenting and embedding knowledge within the organization.
Excellent written, presentation and verbal communication skills. Strong computer skills.",3.9,"OWENS CORNING
3.9","Granville, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1938,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
55,Modeling & Simulation Test Engineer,$44k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"AEgis is seeking a modeling and simulation engineer with a background in testing, federation development, and/or integration to support DIA/MSIC Integrated Threat Analysis and Simulation Environment (ITASE) program. The candidate will establish, improve and maintain testing suites and processes for ITASE software products focusing on Intelligence Community (IC) authoritative integrated weapons systems models across land, air, sea, space, and cyber domains, but also potentially including the simulation architecture, scenario configuration tools, analysis tools, integration tools and system-of-systems ITASE simulations.
The candidate will establish, improve and maintain testing suites and processes for ITASE software products constructed for use in the ITASE Modeling and Simulation (M&S) framework. These products include the simulation architecture, scenario configuration tools, integration tools, analysis tools, system-of-system ITASE simulations, and IC authoritative integrated weapons systems models across land, air, sea, space, and cyber domains. The candidate must be able to comprehend and analyze system technical documentation, system intelligence assessments, ICDs, and software specifications; interact with IC System Analysts and model developers; and examine model, tool and architecture capabilities and interfaces to define, develop and implement unit tests, system tests and systems-of-systems tests based on comprehensive system- and process-level understanding of ITASE simulation architecture and models.
Day-to-Day Duties:
The candidate’s primary focus will be to develop, execute and analyze test plans and test results for constructive and high-fidelity virtual authoritative weapons systems. Test plans should be derived from in-depth, system-level knowledge of the system’s capabilities, limitations, operations, doctrinal intent, and other assessments. The candidate should review model developer documentation and test plans, IC system assessments, and all relevant documentation to produce test plans to verify development claims; validate system performance versus assessments, engineering analysis, and hardware test results; define edge-case and other relevant test cases not examined by the developer; and provide tests which can be incorporated into the automated testing framework. The candidate will analyze all test data with regards to veracity, relevance, and source, and provide conclusions in a written report or in the issue documentation system, as required by project scope. Model performance will be evaluated at both the system and system-of-systems levels. Candidate will be expected to develop and execute complex M&S scenarios.
Candidate should be able to collect, organize, and analyze data to summarize, document, present, and archive findings. Candidate will generate technical memoranda, reports, and briefings to detail the analysis, findings, limitations and caveats of the threat M&S. Participation in various TIMs is expected as well as periodic coordination with the ITASE PMO.

Required:
*Must possess a current TS/SCI security clearance
· Must possess a minimum of 5 years of software test background
· Must possess a bachelor’s degree in a technical field
· Must possess a minimum of 5 years of experience working with constructive/virtual simulation environments.
· Must have experience working with Distributed Interactive Simulation (DIS) or High Level Architecture (HLA) simulation federations
· Must possess a minimum of 5 years of experience and a thorough understanding of C, C++, C# or Python development languages
· Able to work well within a software development team
Desired:
· Possess a TS/SCI with CI Poly
· Strong understanding of the software development process using object-oriented development practices.
· Highly motivated to develop software from requirements gathering through design, coding, and testing.
· 5+ years of experience working Army, Joint, Intel Community or other Command and Control Systems
· 5+ years of object-oriented design and implementation experience
· 5+ years of experience developing network or database interface applications
· Strong understanding of software, computer, and network architectures
· Understanding of common industry and military network protocols
· Working knowledge of SQL and experience interfacing with databases.
· Creating and manipulating records within a relational database from C++ or C# using native calls, ADO.NET, ODBC, or OLE DB

AEgis Technologies
– Leading the Transformation of Modern Warfare
The AEgis Technologies Group (AEgis) provides advanced engineering solutions across the space superiority, directed energy, missile defense, electronic warfare & cyber, C4ISR, and intelligence markets. The Company was founded in 1989 and has served its core customer base as a trusted partner for decades focused on solving the Defense and National Security Community’s hardest challenges. AEgis is an end to end life cycle partner through R&D, development, and into operations. We are the trusted provider leading the transformation for tomorrow’s multi-modal and multi-domain warfare. AEgis Technologies – Leading the Transformation of Modern Warfare.",4.2,"The Aegis Technologies Group, Inc.
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
56,Senior Software Engineer - Medication Decision Support,$95k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Health Care– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

CareKinesis, a division of Tabula Rasa Health Care is looking for a talented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based Medication Decision Support Platform.

MDS is transforming how clinical professionals visualize and interpret medication therapy management and pharmacogenomics. This team oversees complex calculations, high throughput data processing, as well as the user experience to interpret many different categories of clinical data in the most straightforward and efficient way possible. Our goal is to change the way all healthcare users will understand the impact (pros and cons) of adding or removing any drug from a patient's overall medication regimen.

The candidate selected for this role will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer, he or she will take a paramount role in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team growth through mentorship.

ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Work in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services (Node.js, React.js, Redux preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
EDUCATION:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.

M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)

EXPERIENCE:
6+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Experience in Healthcare Technology (preferred)
OTHER SKILLS and ABILITIES:
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to occasionally work remote when warranted.
Regular office activities include: game nights, paddle boarding, yoga on the pier, team lunches and happy hours.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE",4.4,"CareKinesis
4.4","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
57,Stability and Control Engineer - ERC,-1,"Job Description:

Stability and Control Engineer

The Stability and Control Engineer shall support the Air Force Seek Eagle Evaluation of Compatibility and Technical Advisory process by contributing to evaluating aircraft/store configurations to determine aircraft dynamic response and stability characteristics. The work performed will be in direct support to the Air Force Seek Eagle Office. The ideal candidate will be a strong team player with excellent communication skills accustomed to stability and control theory for aircraft. This position will require collaborative work as part of a larger team.

Must be able to work directly with contractor and Government personnel in a mixed badge environment to accomplish aircraft/weapons compatibility certifications.

Responsibilities:

Create, modify, and run computer simulation programs to perform linear, non-linear and stability and control analysis of aircraft structures

Conduct analyses, research data, run and edit computer simulation programs, and write justification to support flight certification recommendations

Plan and monitor flight tests, reduce flight test data, and integrate wind tunnel and flight test data to determine dynamic response and dynamic stability flight limits

Produce and maintain simulation algorithms and codes developed specifically for aircraft stability and control simulations including MATLAB, SIMULINK, and KESTRAL software

Document analyses and write justifications to support aircraft-store compatibility recommendations

Primary Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities

Working experience, internships or graduate research projects that provided experience in aircraft stability and control or aircraft flight dynamics

Advanced thinking and problem solving ability

Excellent interpersonal skills

Excellent written and oral communication skills

Very good attention to detail and a candidate who takes ownership and pride in all work

Strong analytical and organizational skills

Travel may be up to 25%

Education and Experience

Master's degree in Aeronautical, Aerospace, or Mechanical Engineering is highly desired; however, with the right experience a BS degree would be considered.

Entry-level and experienced candidates accepted

Security Clearance Requirements

Per contract requirements, must be a US Citizen, as you must be able to obtain a DoD SECRET Security Clearance.

Current clearance is desired",3.0,"ERC, Inc.
3.0","Eglin AFB, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
58,Civil Engineer II,$61k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"General Summary*
Civil Engineer II will perform engineering duties in planning, designing, and overseeing construction and maintenance of land development, oil field, and public infrastructure. Facilities include, but are not limited to, roads, storm drain, and water and sewage systems.
Essential Job Function*
Provide design of land development, oil field, or public agency projects.
Inspect project sites to monitor progress and ensure conformance to design specifications and safety or sanitation standards.
Compute grade requirements, and/or flow rates, to determine design specifications.
Plan and design transportation or hydraulic systems and structures, following construction and government standards, using design software and drawing tools.
Analyze survey reports, maps, drawings, aerial photography, and other topographical or geologic data to plan projects.
Perform design computations and plan detailing for compliance with codes, manuals, and design consideration for clients.
Other duties as apply.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities*
Great verbal and oral communication
Able to give and receive guidance
Critical thinking
Problem solving skills
Must have knowledge of AutoCAD Civil3D
Education and Experience*
Bachelor of Science Degree in Civil Engineering, Agricultural Engineering, or closely related field

Possess a California P.E. license in Civil Engineering

Must possess 4-8 years’ experience in Civil Engineering and Design

Must possess 4-5 years’ experience using ACAD

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://dpsiinc.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/DiversifiedProjectServices/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible",2.7,"Diversified Project Services International (DPSI)
2.7","San Luis Obispo, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
59,Data Engineer,$86k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems
4.5","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
60,Project Engineer and Senior Project Engineer,-1,"Duties may include:

assume responsibility for completion of detail phases of assigned projects under direction of project and cognizant engineering; provide detailed solutions to assigned engineering problems; make engineering and design calculations applying basic engineering principles, theories and concepts; prepare technical reports and other technical documents such as procedures and operation and maintenance manuals; prepare cost estimates related to assigned technical projects; prepare engineered work packages under supervision for construction or modification of equipment and facilities; analyze specific equipment or system failures of limited scope and recommend repairs, modifications, or appropriate corrective actions through application of basic engineering principles; provide general functional requirements to perform basic design of new equipment/systems or modification of existing equipment/systems; provide engineering support to other groups; make technical presentations.

Knowledge shall include an understanding of engineering principles, theories, and concepts and microcomputer applications; ability to deliver oral presentations to convey technical findings and recommendations; ability to write clear, concise, and organized memos and reports.

· DOE experience preferred.

· Sound communication skills to effectively interface with internal and external customers.

· Able to work well in the field and take ownership of assigned system equipment mechanical and electrical control systems.

· Able to work with groups to provide overlapping support to other engineers while possibly working on several assigned tasks.

· Able to clearly communicate technical information to non-technical personnel both verbally as well as in writing.

· Able to expand skill set beyond own discipline to include understanding of control systems, interfaces with other electrical, mechanical, and structural systems.

· Able to work in an industrial and construction site environment including walking over uneven surfaces, in the underground mine, and over long distances with periods of standing.
Project Engineer*
In addition to the respective design, systems, or programs engineering discipline qualifications stated above, a Project Engineer shall possess the following qualifications:

1) 10 or more years professional experience including Construction Engineering, Project Engineering, and Project Management in the Nuclear Industry

2) Engineering experience at both construction projects and operating nuclear facilities

3) Project Engineering experience with both mid to small size projects

4) Knowledge and experience with delivery of engineering basis documents and detailed engineering specifications and drawings, including the full range of documents for equipment procurements.

5) Demonstrated experience leading and managing a large engineering workforce, including matrixed resources or Architect Engineering firms.

General duties for a project engineer include:

1) Promote a nuclear safety culture; personally exhibits safe behaviors; understands safety requirements and ensures their incorporation into project plans

2) Develop project scope

3) Perform project planning

4) Prepare cost estimates

5) Develop schedule

6) Assist Project Engineering Manager or Senior Project Engineer with maintaining project schedule by monitoring schedule progress, coordinating engineering activities to support the schedule, identifying issues to management and recommending actions; actively participates in problem solving

7) Assist the Project Engineering Manager in controlling project costs by identifying any potential changes to scope, schedule, or cost; evaluates changes and recommends actions to mitigate impacts; reviews proposed changes for adherence to project plan requirements; and, seeks management’s approval before implementing changes

8) Assist the Project Engineering Manager with maintaining a high level of quality by adherence to procedures

9) Confirm project deliverables meet requirements through design review, testing and inspection

10) Maintain project records and data

11) Represent project team at meetings and in interfacing with other organizations
Senior Project Engineer*
In addition to the respective engineering discipline stated above, the Senior Project Engineer shall possess the following qualifications:

1) 20 or more year’s professional experience including Construction Engineering, Project Engineering, and Project Management in the Nuclear Industry

2) Engineering experience at both construction projects and operating nuclear facilities

3) Project Engineering experience with both large and smaller projects

4) Knowledge and experience with delivery of engineering basis documents and detailed engineering specifications and drawings, including the full range of documents for equipment procurements.

5) Demonstrated experience leading and managing a large engineering workforce, including matrixed resources or Architect Engineering firms.

General duties for a Senior Project Engineer may include:

1) Promote a nuclear safety culture; personally exhibits safe behaviors; understands safety requirements and ensures their incorporation into project plans

2) Develop project scope

3) Perform project planning

4) Prepare cost estimates

5) Develop schedules related to projects assigned

6) Assist Project Engineering Manager with maintaining project schedule by monitoring schedule progresses, coordinating engineering activities to support the schedule, identifying issues to management and recommending actions; actively participates in problem solving

7) Assist the Project Engineering Manager in controlling project costs by identifying any potential changes to scope, schedule, or cost; evaluates changes and recommends actions to mitigate impacts; reviews proposed changes for adherence to project plan requirements; and, seeks management’s approval before implementing changes

8) Assist the Project Engineering Manager with maintaining a high level of quality by adherence to procedures

9) Confirm project deliverables meet requirements through design review, testing and inspection

10) Maintain project records and data

11) Represent project team at meetings and in interfacing with other organizations

Other / Special Considerations

1) Experience with DOE, and commercial nuclear industries are desired.

2) Bachelor of Science in engineering, Bachelors in engineering, or Bachelor of Science, in a related engineering discipline.

3) Experience with Nuclear Quality Assurance programs and Configuration Management programs.

4) Experience with field walkdowns for design efforts.

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
Experience:
to 20 yrs of Construction / Project Management: 10 years (Required)
to 20 yrs of Construction Project / Nuclear Facility: 10 years (Preferred)
to 20 yrs of Project Engineering: 10 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Pinnacle Specialty Group,"Carlsbad, NM",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
61,Senior Data Engineer,$95k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Brain Corp is a San Diego-based AI company creating transformative core technology for the robotics industry. Our diverse engineering teams in Software, Hardware Design, and Embedded Systems are creating comprehensive solutions to support the builders of today's autonomous machines in successfully producing, deploying, and supporting commercial robots across industries and applications. Brain Corp is funded by the SoftBank Vision Fund and Qualcomm Ventures. For more information please visit: https://www.braincorp.com/

Position Summary:

As a member of the Software Engineering team, the Senior Data Engineer owns the definition, execution, and delivery of technical architecture for Brain Corporation's Product Analytics team. Your work will improve the quality, reliability, accuracy, and consistency of our data. You will help build project-specific data pipelines and validation tools. You will have a hands-on role with product specialists and be responsible for working with them to understand data requirements and then implement those requirements in software.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Fully own critical portions of Brain Corporation's product analytics data model.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand needs, model tables using data warehouse best practices, and develop data pipelines to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality data.
Work with technical and product stakeholders to understand data-oriented project requirements.
Write code that is understandable, simple, and easy to maintain.
Design, implement and ensure the accuracy of validation and related services for data models.
Think and work agile, including automated testing, continuous integration and deployment.
Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.
What you need:
Bachelor's in Computer Science or other related field.
5-8+ years software development experience.
Passionate about data quality and delivering effective data to impact the business.
Experience with sourcing and modeling data from application REST-like APIs.
MPP/Cloud data warehouse solutions (Snowflake, etc).
Proficiency in SQL, experience writing ETLs.
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js, Python, or willingness to translate experience in equivalent language.
Things that make a difference:
Master's in Computer Science or other related field.
Experience with Kafka, AMQP or other message bus.
OpenAPI/Swagger.
Express.js, NestJS.
SAML, OKTA.
Azure experience is a plus.
Being comfortable outside of your comfort zone - explore new tech, make your own tool, or find a new way to address an old problem.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Essential functions may require maintaining the physical condition necessary for sitting, walking or standing for periods of time; operating a computer and keyboard; talk and hear at normal room levels; using hands to finger, grasp, and feel; repetitive motion; close visual acuity to prepare and analyze data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal; extensive reading; lift, push, carry, or pull up to 10 pounds.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. Employee is exposed to the typical office environment with computers, printers and telephones.",3.6,"Brain Corp
3.6","San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
62,Senior Software Engineer with Top Secret,$101k-$204k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Opportunity: Our team is seeking a talented Top Secret cleared Full Stack Software Engineer to work in our NW Washington DC location.

This role supports DHS’s Office of Intelligence and Analysis (I&A). I&A is responsible for developing DHS-wide intelligence through managing the collection, analysis and fusion of intelligence throughout the entire Department. I&A disseminates intelligence throughout DHS, to the other members of the United States Intelligence Community, and to first responders at the state, local, and tribal level.
What You'll Get To Do as a FullStack Software Developer: *
Employ software development techniques and methodologies for solving tough analytical challenges in support of one of our nation's premier law enforcement entities
Use software development skills to automate manual analytical processes
Utilize technical developer skills including, but not limited to: Python, R, Java, JavaScript, d3, Leaflet, Pig, Elasticsearch, PHP, Oracle, Angular JS, XML, .NET, Hadoop and other related technologies
Opportunity to expand upon beyond specializations to include both front end user interfaces as well as back end services;
Provide technical expertise to support migration of applications and data sets to the cloud
Deploy developed IT solutions, user applications, databases and other IT capabilities
Design and develop specialized user solutions, applications and databases using a hybrid Agile approach within a DevOps environment
Provide Tier 3 technical support for deployed applications and databases
Ensure design consistency with open development standards and guidelines
Work with business analysts, user experience developers, and project management to estimate and provide updates on tasks.
Maintain code integrity and organization
Collaborate with the rest of engineering team to design and launch new features
You’ll Bring These Qualifications:
Active Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility
BS degree in a related discipline and eight (8) to twelve (12) years of progressive experience
or an MS degree in a related discipline, and seven (7) to ten (10) years of progressive experience
or a Ph.D. degree in a related discipline, and two (2) to five (5) years of progressive experience
Proficient experience utilizing Angular, Node.js, Javascript, MongoDB, JSON, XML
High experience level with back-end programming languages (Java, Spring, C#)
Prior experience with the following technologies: Elasticsearch , Webservices, Microservices,
Working knowledge with Datastores – MongoDB, HDFS, S3, MSSQL, Accumulo
Familiar with technologies jQuery, ASP/.Net, NoSQL, PL/SQL, LDAP, HTTP, REST/SOAP, RDBMS
Familiar with Amazon Web Services (AWS), Hadoop Big Data and cross domain data services
Working knowledge with IDE’s – Eclipse, Netbeans, Visual Studio
Additional Requirements: *
Familiar with Configuration Management and CI Tools – Maven, Jenkins, Ansible
Working knowledge with public keys and digital certificates
Familiar with Linux/Unix server environments
Source control with Git/GitLab, TFS/Visual Studio
Experience with Agile development methodology
Keen interest in learning and using the latest software tools, methods, and technologies to solve real world problem sets vital to national security
Understanding of cloud concepts and enabling tools and technologies (AWS/C2S, MS Azure, Informatica, VMWare etc.)
Experience with automated testing patterns and tools
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have: *
Direct Experience with DHS and Intelligence Community (IC) component's data architectures and environments
One or more of the following certifications: DoD 8570 IAT Level II, ITIL, AWS Associate or Professional Solution Architect
Master’s Degree in Computer Science or related field
Experience with DevOps environments
Expertise in various COTS, GOTS, and open source tools which support development of data integration and visualization applications
Experience with cloud message APIs and usage of push notifications
Specialization in Object Oriented Programming languages, scripting, and databases
Familiar with Python, Groovy, Shell Script
About OneGlobe LLC: *
OneGlobe LLC was founded in 2005 to provide quality Information Technology solutions that exceed expectations. We focus on IT System Modernization using agile software development practices and DevSecOps to deliver intuitive and maintainable systems that we help our customers improve their processes and capabilities. We provide full service IT solutions and have the skill to identify, plan and perform cost-saving steps throughout the system lifecycle to enhance system efficiency, while optimizing the value that we deliver to our customers. Our team has the drive and right mindset to feel ownership on the projects they work. They partner with our customers to give the extra effort sometimes required to deliver success.

We provide highly competitive benefits package to include: extensive medical/dental/vision, 7% of your annual salary toward 401(k), Paid Time Off (PTO), $5,000 annually toward ongoing education and training, and more. We also have monthly social and tech events!

See additional positions at: http://www.oneglobeit.com/#careers

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Discount
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Referral Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Spring: 8 years (Preferred)
Software Engineering: 8 years (Preferred)
Angular: 8 years (Preferred)
Java: 8 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20016 (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"OneGlobe LLC
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
63,Full Stack Software Engineer - Remote Work Opportunity,$48k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose and Scope

As a Full Stack Software Engineer at Tolmar Inc., you will be a member of the IT team in the Windsor, CO office, augmenting our development capacity by contributing high-quality code to the existing code base for our proprietary applications. You will work with other IT members in a collaborative environment to meet deadlines and improve the overall code quality.

Essential Duties& Responsibilities
Design, develop and test applications/components. You will deliver highly tuned, testable and optimized application and database code per spec and be expected to offer alternative approaches when reviewing requirements.
Collaborate closely with stakeholders, QA and infrastructure teams throughout all phases of the software and product development lifecycle.
Stay current on technology and domain trends, frameworks and cutting-edge technology.
Contribute to architecture and design decisions.
Implement third party products needed to support systems and applications, including development toolkits.
Analyze business operations to understand strengths and weaknesses and determine opportunities to automate processes and functions.
Be responsible for expanding the feature set of the platform in an extensible and scalable manner.
Own individual modules and act as the technical SME for them.
Get the experience of building products from scratch and taking them all the way to production.
Work with business and provide solutions to problems faced by customers.
Create logical data models based on functional requirements.
Perform quality assurance review of specifications for internal and external delivery.
Troubleshoot and provide technical support and solutions to users.
Prepare and update documentation for new or existing systems.
Monitor system effectiveness in satisfying user needs.
Perform other related duties, as assigned.
Education and Experience
Bachelor’s Degree required; Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Information Technology preferred.
5+ years of full stack enterprise software development experience using Microsoft ASP Net Core (C#), SQL Server, Microservices architecture, WCF, XML/ Web services; RESTFUL APIs, CSS3/Bootstrap, HTML5, JavaScript, Angular, TypeScript and JSON highly desired.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Experience working in a regulated industry (e.g. Pharmaceutical, Bio-Pharmaceutical, or Medical Devices) preferred.
ERP implementation, replacement or support experience
Strong desire to learn and grow professionally.
Proficient in both front and back end web development.
Experience in implementing responsive web application using Bootstrap framework is essential.
Highly proficient in writing T-SQL queries and stored procedures.
Experience in SQL Server SSAS, SSIS and SSRS preferred.
SharePoint development experience preferred.
Mobile development experience preferred.
Experience with SaaS / PaaS environments such as Azure is preferred.
Good understanding of software design patterns and object oriented design concepts.
The ability to take a project from scoping requirements through actual launch of the project as a team.
Strong analytical, problem solving and programming skills.
Strong knowledge in data structures and algorithms.
Good understanding of Computer Science fundamentals, object oriented programming concepts and web technologies.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills.
Experience communicating with other teams to collect requirements, review test cases and translate the product requirements to technical requirements.
The ability to work independently or as a team with the guidance of managers.
Ability to document the technical design and approach for the features developed.
Core Values
The Full stack software engineer is expected to operate within the framework of Tolmar’s Core Values:
Consistently operate with the highest standards of ethics and compliance.
Take ownership of your actions, success and setbacks.
Respect each other and understand that honest collaboration is at the heart of our company success.
Go the extra mile to make things happen.
Be committed to all we do and the patients we serve.
Embrace change with enthusiasm.
Strive to learn about and understand the needs of customers and patients, and take action with great speed and efficiency no matter the task.
Requirements
Full stack enterprise software development experience using Microsoft ASP.NET (C#), SQL Server, WCF, XML/ Web services; RESTFUL APIs, CSS3/Bootstrap, HTML5, JavaScript, AngularJS, TypeScript and JSON highly desired.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information.",3.3,"TOLMAR
3.3","Windsor, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
64,Senior Data Warehouse Engineer.... Awesome pay and great work life balance,-1,"Do you want to make a major contribution to a stable, positive work environment? Salary depends on experience but is generous with excellent benefits, paid time off, 401k and yearly raises.

This role is open due to a recent promotion within the department. There is a lot of room for growth within the orginization.

Vital Skills:

· Minimum of 5+ years experience with SQL development demonstrating a mastery of use.

· 5-8 years experience working with data in a variety of capacities – analyst, developer, report

development

· Hands-on experience with at least one of the following Databases (SqlServer, Oracle,

Snowflake)

· Ability to create reports using PowerBi or other industry leading Business Intelligence Software

· Experience with ETL/ELT tools such as SSIS, Azure Data Factory, Pentaho, Talend, etc

· Dev-ops experience using GIT, developing, deploying code to production

· Proficient in working in Unix/Linux as well as Windows server environment

· Proficient in using Azure Cloud Services such as Azure Data Factory, key vaults, service bus,

logic apps, power automate, etc

· Proficient in programming in Python/shell or other scripting languages for the purpose of data

movement

Your day to day activities would be:

· Create ETL/ELT framework for Data Analytics Team

· Design and develop pipelines to bring data into and send data from our Data warehouse to

other analytical solutions

· Support existing pipelines and troubleshoot issues as they arise.

· Create and maintain PowerBI apps.

· Improve governance of our data assets including our PowerBi Datasets, Dataflows.

· Taking a lead role in selection/creation of data catalog for all data assets.

· Identifies new areas of data, research and data technology that can solve business problems

· Utilize effective project planning techniques to break down complex projects into tasks,

manage the scope of projects, and ensure deadlines are kept

· Leverages, contributes and uses data best practices / lessons learned to develop technical

solutions used for descriptive analytics, ETL, predictive modeling, and prescriptive analytics

· Develops technical solutions using data techniques in data & analytics processes.

· Develops and builds frameworks/prototypes that integrate data and advanced analytics to

make business decisions.

· Implements new areas of data technologies, (ingestion, processing, distribution) and research

delivery methods that can solve business problems.

· Co-mingles data sources to lead work on data and problems across departments to drive

improved business & technical results through designing.

Education:

· Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Information Technology",5.0,"Merito Group LLC
5.0","Reston, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
65,Senior Data Warehouse Engineer .. Lots of room for growth. Positive work environment,-1,"Do you want to make a major contribution to a stable, positive work environment? Salary depends on experience but is generous with excellent benefits, paid time off, 401k and yearly raises.

This role is open due to a recent promotion within the department. There is a lot of room for growth within the orginization.

Vital Skills:

· Minimum of 5+ years experience with SQL development demonstrating a mastery of use.

· 5-8 years experience working with data in a variety of capacities – analyst, developer, report

development

· Hands-on experience with at least one of the following Databases (SqlServer, Oracle,

Snowflake)

· Ability to create reports using PowerBi or other industry leading Business Intelligence Software

· Experience with ETL/ELT tools such as SSIS, Azure Data Factory, Pentaho, Talend, etc

· Dev-ops experience using GIT, developing, deploying code to production

· Proficient in working in Unix/Linux as well as Windows server environment

· Proficient in using Azure Cloud Services such as Azure Data Factory, key vaults, service bus,

logic apps, power automate, etc

· Proficient in programming in Python/shell or other scripting languages for the purpose of data

movement

Your day to day activities would be:

· Create ETL/ELT framework for Data Analytics Team

· Design and develop pipelines to bring data into and send data from our Data warehouse to

other analytical solutions

· Support existing pipelines and troubleshoot issues as they arise.

· Create and maintain PowerBI apps.

· Improve governance of our data assets including our PowerBi Datasets, Dataflows.

· Taking a lead role in selection/creation of data catalog for all data assets.

· Identifies new areas of data, research and data technology that can solve business problems

· Utilize effective project planning techniques to break down complex projects into tasks,

manage the scope of projects, and ensure deadlines are kept

· Leverages, contributes and uses data best practices / lessons learned to develop technical

solutions used for descriptive analytics, ETL, predictive modeling, and prescriptive analytics

· Develops technical solutions using data techniques in data & analytics processes.

· Develops and builds frameworks/prototypes that integrate data and advanced analytics to

make business decisions.

· Implements new areas of data technologies, (ingestion, processing, distribution) and research

delivery methods that can solve business problems.

· Co-mingles data sources to lead work on data and problems across departments to drive

improved business & technical results through designing.

Education:

· Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Information Technology",5.0,"Merito Group LLC
5.0","Arlington, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
66,Senior Software Engineer - React Native,$70k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"We're looking for experienced, talented and highly motivated software engineers to join our team. As a growth stage technology company, Clear Capital is seeking developers eager to be part of a team, working closely with every part of the company from graphic designers to our executive team.

What you’ll do
Write high quality, well-tested, extensible and scalable code
Evaluate the short- and long-term implications of every implementation decision
You’ll work with a tight-knit team solving tough problems by building quality enterprise solutions with a professional design and coding process
Learn from accomplished developers through mentoring and committed collaboration and take your dev chops to the next level
Make an immediate impact by quickly getting up to speed and building features from start to finish
Who we’re looking for
You are experienced in building offline first applications, leveraging geolocation information and have working knowledge of popular gaming and virtual reality frameworks
You love tackling really tough problems, and value the correct solution over a sloppy one
You have a passion for software development, with side projects to prove it
You understand the value of tested solutions, and you’re a capable debugger
You’re comfortable reading & writing code, and can describe what each part of the code is doing
You’re great at taking constructive feedback on your work
You’re passionate about our mission to disrupt how banks, lenders and investors value real estate
Our tool kit

We believe in using the most effective tool for the job, and also relying on the strengths of our team. While most of our engineers lean toward front- or back-end development, we encourage full-stack learning which makes our team nimble enough to tackle the diverse set of challenges we face. Here are the key technologies that we use:
Modern JavaScript
React Native, Redux, Reselect, React Native Elements
Popular gaming and virtual reality frameworks (Unity, Unreal, ARKit, ARCore)
Flexbox, CSS
Jest, React Native Testing Library
Xcode, Android Studio, Jenkins
Sentry
Git
Atlassian (Jira, Confluence, BitBucket)
Why you’ll love it
Disrupt the Real Estate data industry by bringing cloud based, enterprise software and data services to the market for big banks, lenders and investors
See your work move into production quickly, and avoid the bureaucracy that slows down larger companies
Enjoy a modern office layout that is quiet, yet collaborative surrounded by top quality engineers that enjoy working with each other
Receive great benefits like 401(k) match, and health benefits, PTO and paid holidays
Work with a growth oriented company that is transforming itself and an industry where you can have a real impact on the company's future
About Us

Clear Capital is the premier provider of real estate valuation, analytics, and technology solutions. Powered by its more than 45 years worth of information on nearly every U.S. metro, neighborhood, and property, Clear Capital’s solutions are trusted by community credit unions and billion-dollar financial institutions alike. Clear Capital is headquartered in Reno-Tahoe with a team of more than 500 nationwide, dedicated to going wherever it leads, and doing whatever it takes.

To all recruitment agencies: Clear Capital does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Clear Capital employees, or any other company location. Clear Capital is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.

Compensation

Salary commensurate with experience

Clear Capital is an equal opportunity employer",4.0,"Clear Capital
4.0","Reno, NV",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
67,iFit Content Data Analyst,$33k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"Founded in 1979, ICON Health & Fitness is the world’s largest fitness manufacturer. We are known for our best-in-class consumer fitness brands (NordicTrack, ProForm, FreeMotion, Weslo, Weider, and iFit) that are distributed through hundreds of the world’s best retailers.

We create the tools, technology, and equipment to help everyone from elite athletes focused on their next big day, to beginners getting ready for day one, to move more, move better and move forward.

At Icon Health and Fitness, we are proud to offer competitive compensation as well as the following benefits:
Paid Training
Competitive compensation package with growth based on performance
Full benefits package (Medical, Dental, Vision and Life insurance)
401(k) with company match
Paid time off
Discounts on Icon products
Discounts at local retail stores
The chance to test the fitness products we create in our state-of-the-art gym on location
Onsite massage therapist
Working in beautiful Cache Valley, Utah, with access to an exceptional outdoor lifestyle, a university campus nearby
Happy work-life balance
Collaborative work space and environment
A free beverage center and snack bar to keep you hydrated and fueled throughout the day
SUMMARY

Icon Health & Fitness is seeking a gifted individual who will serve as a trusted business advisor for a rapidly growing global fitness brand called iFit. This person’s focus will be to support decision-making by completing a variety of strategic and tactical data tasks and initiatives.

iFit produces world-class fitness content in video format, which is made available via streaming on high-end workout equipment with built-in tablets. The content is accessed on a subscription basis. Your purpose will be to support the production and development of this content by working with the Director of Content, SVP of Marketing, President of iFit, iFit Studio film producers, and other analysts at the company to provide insight into what content is being accessed, what subscribers want most, and what is contributing to business growth, user engagement, and subscriber retention.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Data gathering: get the data you need, on your own, whenever it is needed
Data mining: finding the “gems” of the data which may be overlooked in high-level reports
Data explaining: explain what you find out--potentially complex issues--in layman’s terms
What you’ll actually be doing:
Developing and maintaining business intelligence infrastructure and analytical framework for iFit
Work with backend database developers to develop new data sources which will provide insight to the business
Integrating primary and secondary data sources into an enterprise data warehouse
Acquiring data from sources to interpret and analyze results
Use statistical techniques to understand and interpret trends
Implement data analyses to optimize operational efficiency
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Filter and clean data by reviewing data sources
Correcting data issues at the source if they are discovered
Locating and defining new process improvement opportunities
Maintain data integrity across multiple data sources
Manage recurring or automated reporting using BI tools
Complete analyses projects or inquiries on short time frames
Fulfill ad-hoc requests for data to stakeholders across the company
Being proactive about delving into data, with a goal to gain new insights into customer behavior, preferences, wants, dislikes, etc
Be willing to learn new skills to enhance the value of your analyst role
Using all means at your disposal to complete analysis projects
Sitting down with iFit stakeholders regularly to relay insights they need to have
If there is new data we need, you will be working with iFit software developers to find ways to collect what we need in new ways
Writing SQL day-in, day-out to get the data you need
Building automated reports using BI software (Tableau)
Providing ad-hoc data to requestors across the company
Identifying and resolving data issues as they are discovered
Other duties may be assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ideal Candidates will have:
Three to five years demonstrated experience with statistical analysis software/languages (SAS, R, Python)
Three to five years demonstrated experience in deep dive analytics with
The fitness industry, or
Analytical experience crafting strategies for new content with well known streaming companies (Netflix, Hulu, D+, Prime, etc.).
Required skills for this position:
Exposure to RDBMS (MS SQL Server, Amazon Redshift, Oracle, or others)
Proficiency in any SQL development software (SSMS, DBeaver, DBVisualizer, etc)
Working knowledge of SQL (3+ years)--SQL test to be administered
Intermediate to Advanced expertise in MS Excel or Google Sheets
Experience in BI tools (Power BI, Qlik, Tableau, MicroStrategy, Domo, etc)
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
Master’s Degree in statistical discipline preferred.
Must have a B.A. or B.S. in related field or equivalent experience.
REASONING ABILITY

Must have great people skills. Able to handle stressful situations. Must have a positive attitude.

CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS

As needed for position. May require a valid driver’s license.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Typical office environment

DISCLAIMER

Your employment at ICON is ""at will"". You and the company each have the right to terminate the employment relationship at any time for any cause or for no cause at all. Nothing but an express written contract signed by you and a Vice President of this Company can modify this ""employment at will"" arrangement.

""We do not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, ancestry, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, Veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.""",3.8,"Icon Health and Fitness
3.8","Logan, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
68,Sr RF Engineer Lead,$58k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sanmina Corporation (Nasdaq: SANM) is a leading integrated manufacturing solutions provider serving the fastest-growing segments of the global Electronics Manufacturing Services (EMS) market. Recognized as a technology leader, Sanmina Corporation provides end-to-end manufacturing solutions, delivering superior quality and support to Original Equipment Manufacturers (OEMs) primarily in the communications networks, defense and aerospace, industrial and semiconductor systems, medical, multimedia, computing and storage, automotive and clean technology sectors. Sanmina Corporation has facilities strategically located in key regions throughout the world.

Sr. RF Engineer Lead

Job Purpose:

The design engineering group provides complete end-to-end product development solutions to a variety of customers. These product solutions include development of test and measurement modules, 4&5G macro cell frequency variants, optical modules, etc. The team delivers product solutions from concept definition through to volume manufacturing.

The design team is seeking a Sr. RF Engineer leader. Responsibilities include the execution of complex RF, radio and electro optical systems design. The candidate will be expected collaborate with a cross function product development team to deliver products from concept through to manufacturing.

Nature of Duties:

Act as lead technical authority on RF product developments

Collaborate with project management to coordinate development team’s activities and manage project schedule

Participate in technical discussions with customer’s technical team to review project status and design solutions

Provide detailed design of RF systems and circuits for a broad range frequency to up 60GHz

Characterize RF components including power amplifiers, mixers, PLLs and switches

Develop verification test plans and execute the tests

Execute schematic capture and support PCB layout of RF circuits

Perform cascaded analysis and system link budgeting for RF systems

Perform RF transition designs for high frequency interconnections

Develop antenna designs for millimeter wave applications

Write software scripts to automate repetitive aspects of verification testing and data analysis

Support SMT builds, monitor yields and develop solutions to improve quality

As part of integrated product development team, participate in every phase of product development, including requirements definition, architecture, component selection, detailed implementation, integration and test.

Work within interdisciplinary engineering team to develop high end RF product solutions in line with customer needs.

Education and Experience :

Relevant degree in engineering

>12 years of related industry experience

Expert level experience related to the development of 4&5G macro-cell remote radios

Expert level experience with simulation tools HyperLynx, HFSS, ADS, Momentum, Genesys

Experience with capture tools such as Mentor and Cadence

Expert level experience with radio parametric testing such as EVM, ACLR, sensitivity, etc.

Expert level experience with network analyzers, spectrum analyzers, and phase noise analysis tools

Programming experience in Matlab, C++, Python an asset

Sanmina is an Equal Opportunity Employer – M/F/Veteran/Disability/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity",3.1,"Sanmina Corporation
3.1","Carrollton, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1980,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
69,Database Engineer/Developer,-1,"Database Engineer/Developer*
Salary: * 60-90k
Location: * Temple, GA
Database Engineer/Developer is responsible for all aspects of the design, development and delivery / implementation of data and database solutions. This person will need to:
be able to understand the SDLC model and what their specific activities are in designing and then delivering a solid, robust data solution
to understand how to develop and enforce coding standards and source code development standards for database objects / code
to design, develop and deliver data models that are clean, understandable, maintainable and solid
to design, develop and implement solid test plans to accurately test the data solution code / objects / resources
to support and maintain database servers and systems; and to develop and maintain detailed and accurate documentation per all project standards.
Responsibilities*
· Design, develop and deliver / implement data solutions to include: architecture design, prototyping of concepts to proof of concept, development of standards, design and development of test plans, code and module design, development and testing, data solution debugging, design and implementation of a solution that follows efficient design techniques and development that meets and exceeds the intent of the design of the data solution.

· Effectively manage day-to-day tasks / activities to effectively meet the deliverables and schedule of a data solution component within a larger application project

· Lend support to various business and technology teams as necessary during design, development and delivery to ensure solid, scalable, robust solutions

· Support and maintain data and database systems to meet business delivery specifications and needs

· Be able to clearly communicate complex technical designs and solutions in clear, concise and easily readable format by both technical and non-technical personnel

· Communicate effectively in both verbal (i.e. day-to-day discussions, team meetings) and written (requirements and design specifications) form, as well as have an overall ability to be clear and concise in all communications

· Accurately determine, assign, track and manage project task, activity, documentation, and time information

· Accurately assess the risks associated with each solution design / project
Skills*
· Strong design, development and implementation experience with .Net framework (5 yrs)

· Expertise with SQL, SQL server and Entity Framework (5 yrs)

· Experience with web application and design

· Thorough working knowledge of the design and database development processes, methodologies and their direct implementation to data solution projects

· Strong database setup, configuration, maintenance / support, programming, debugging and testing skills, troubleshooting skills, and experience with numerous operating systems, database environments and architectures

· Experience in developing and executing a data solution implementation plan

· Strong knowledge and experience with database tuning, ETL, DTS, T-SQL and business intelligence technologies

· Excellent ability to understand and express complex topics

· Demonstrated leadership and attention to detail skills through prior experience at the tactical / implementation levels
Education / Experience*
· Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering or a related field, AND At least 5 (five) years of experience in data solutions development.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
.NET: 5 years (Required)
SQL Server: 5 years (Required)
Location:
Temple, GA 30179 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Confidential,"Temple, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
70,Software Engineer Backend,$49k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"RealTruck, a Truck Hero company, specializes in truck and Jeep® accessories. We are a well-established, privately held, company that is transforming itself into a leading-edge technology company seeking to disrupt the automotive aftermarket e-commerce space. We have offices in Florida, North Dakota, Indiana and Missouri.

Our mission is to revolutionize the truck accessory industry by focusing on innovation, inspiration and unmatched service. We provide an immersive and engaging experience for truck enthusiasts with expert advice and comprehensive information on every product we sell.

Position Summary: The Backend Software Engineer plays a significant role in our Technology Team, helping drive the future direction of our systems and is responsible for developing and maintaining several aspects of our cutting edge cloud-based eCommerce platform.

Primary Responsibilities:
Work with backend team to develop and implement server-side solutions
Work with systems processing large amounts of data required to support operations
Write clean, maintainable, and testable code to ease further development. Provide reasonable test coverage using unit testing best practices
Research and recommend ways to improve and modernize existing systems
Education and Experience:
BS, Computer Science with 3+ years of experience, or equivalent working with Node, or other backend languages
Experience troubleshooting and optimizing existing code
Conceptual understanding of modern software practices including automated testing, and CI/CD
Understanding of public cloud PaaS (Heroku, DigitalOcean, or AWS)
Basic understanding of Docker/containers
Skills and Abilities:
Excellent communication and organizational skills
Experience working in a TDD environment
Experience working with an enterprise ERP system, especially NetSuite
Experience building with IaaS systems like AWS or GCP
Experience with functions as a service system like AWS Lambda or Azure Functions
Experience with event-driven architecture and asynchronous programming
In light of the current pandemic situation, to protect all team members we also require the ability to:
Pass daily pandemic health screening protocols which include responding to CDC recommended personal health and activity related questions.
Follow pandemic safety protocols which may include:
Wearing of an approved face covering at all times
Washing hands/use of hand sanitizer upon entry to facility and as needed throughout the day
Cleaning/disinfecting of personal work area
Maintaining social/physical distancing requirements (six feet from others) whenever possible
In some circumstances submitting to company paid virus testing through approved medical provider
Travel
10% or less.
Total Rewards!
Comprehensive Benefits Package for you and your family with coverage beginning the 1st of the month following the start of employment. This includes medical, dental, vision, basic life and AD&D, Short Term/Long Term Disability, Critical Illness, Accident, Hospital Indemnity, and Legal Coverage
Eligibility to participate in our company matching 401k plan after 30 days of employment.
PTO allowance with no waiting period.
Healthcare Flexible Spending Account and Dependent Care Flexible Spending Account.
Employee Assistance Program.
Tuition Reimbursement Program.
Employee discounts automotive aftermarket accessories.
Opportunities: To participate in some of our many different professional development programs offered, to give back to our community, support our Veterans, have fun at work, to be a part of something great, and much more!",3.7,"RealTruck - ECommerce
3.7","Fargo, ND",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Automotive Parts & Accessories Stores,Retail,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
71,Data Architect,-1,"CE Strategy is a rapidly growing business intelligence firm recently named by Adweek Magazine as the 87th fastest-growing agency in the world, based in Rochester, New York. Established in 2015, CE Strategy has evolved into a business intelligence firm that leverages data science to develop strategies that achieve client goals for increasing top-line revenue and decreasing bottom-line costs. We do this by focusing on four core services: the aggregation and visualization of data, insight through data science, development of business strategy, and continuous optimization.
Position Summary*
The Data Architect position is a member of the CE Strategy BI & analytics team and, as such, plays an important role in maintaining and growing existing client relationships. This role is both strategic and operational in nature, and an ideal candidate will possess the following:

A solid foundation in systems development:
The candidate should understand the system development life cycle; software project management approaches; requirements, design, and test techniques.
Depth in data modeling and database design:
As a core skill for this position, an ideal candidate is sound across all phases of data modeling, from conceptualization to database optimization.
The required skills also extend into SQL development and perhaps database administration.
Breadth in established and emerging data technologies:
An ideal candidate is either experienced or conversant in emerging tools like columnar and NoSQL databases, predictive analytics, data visualization, and unstructured data.
While not necessarily deep in these technologies, the candidate is experienced in one or more, and understands them sufficiently enough to guide clients in understanding and adopting them.
The ability to conceptualize, understand, and articulate the big data picture:
This position initiates, evaluates, and influences projects from the perspective of the entire organization.
While mapping systems and interfaces used to manage data, sets standards for data management, analyzes current state and conceives future state, and owns/executes projects needed to close the gap between current state and future goals.
This position reports directly to the Director of Analytics & BI and indirectly to the V.P. of Client Service and has potential for advancement within the organization.
Primary Responsibilities: *
Evaluate current data systems
This position is responsible for evaluating the current state of a client’s databases and other data systems. They will analyze these databases and identify new solutions to increase efficiency and performance.
Define database structures
Define the overall database structure, including recovery, security, backup, and capability specifications. This definition provides a way for data architects to determine overall requirements for database structure.
Propose solutions
After analyzing, evaluating, and defining current database structures, data architects create and propose solutions to upper management and stakeholders. This often includes designing a new database and presenting it to interested parties.
Implement database solutions
Responsibilities include implementing the database solutions that are proposed as part of the larger project. This entire process includes developing process flows, coordinating with data engineers and analysts, and documenting the installation process.
Train new users
As an expert in the new database solutions they design and implement, train new data analysts, engineers, or other client stakeholders.
Technical Skills Required: *
Application server software (e.g., Oracle)
Database management system software (e.g., Microsoft SQL Server)
User interface and query software (e.g., IBM DB2)
Enterprise application integration software (e.g., XML)
Backup/archival software
Agile methodologies and ERP implementation
Knowledge of predictive modeling, NLP and text analysis
Data modeling (e.g., erwin DM, Enterprise Architect, Visio, and others)
Data mining
UML
ETL Tools
Python, C/C++ Java, Perl
UNIX, Linux, Solaris, and MS Windows
Hadoop and NoSQL databases
Knowledge of data visualization tools
Familiarity with: *
Data visualization tools— Tableau, Power BI, Sisense, Looker, and others
Database management tools — Microsoft SQL Server, phpMyAdmin
Data modeling tools — Oracle SQL Developer, Database Workbench, ER/Studio
Experience, Education, and Essentials for Success*
Experience
3-5 years in a similar role
The ideal candidate has experience consulting with multiple clients across several verticals and lines of business
Education
Bachelor’s degree in related discipline (including data science, data engineering, MIS, analytics, or others) and master’s degree preferred
Essentials for Success*
Well respected and influential
Able to emphasize methodology, modeling, and governance
Technologically neutral and diplomatic in nature
Enthusiastic, articulate, and persuasive
Interest and ability to thrive in a “startup” atmosphere
Excellent time management skills; ability to manage multiple details and deadlines in a multitask environment; good oral and written presentation skills
A highly motivated self-starter
A strong commitment to the Customer Experience
Entrepreneurial spirit challenged by the mission to help to grow a company
Superior professional presence and business acumen
Embraces a team and collaborative atmosphere
“Whatever it takes” approach to solving complex business scenarios
All employees benefit from a highly competitive compensation and benefit structure. Qualified applicants will be contacted to schedule interviews.

CAUSE + EFFECT Strategy provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, CAUSE + EFFECT Strategy complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $85,000.00 per year

COVID-19 considerations:
To keep our employees safe we formally check and record temperatures each day, provide masks, hand sanitizer, and limit interactions with clients or vendors outside our our team.

Experience:
Data Architecture: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.causeandeffectstrategy.com
Company's Facebook page:
www.facebook.com/CEStrategyNY
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"CAUSE + EFFECT Strategy
5.0","Rochester, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
72,Foreign Military Sales (FMS) Systems Engineer MQ-9,$44k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB TITLE: Foreign Military Sales (FMS) Systems Engineer MQ-9

PROJECT OVERVIEW:

AFLCMC / WII is responsible for the development, test, production, and sustainment of the MQ-9 UAS. This project provides Life Cycle Sustainment in the product support areas to include Supply Support, Maintenance Planning, PHS&T, and Tech Orders for MQ-9 and associated systems. This position provides advisory and assistance services support to the government program office at their Wright-Patterson AFB operating location.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Act as engineering team leader or supervisor, developing engineering procedures and controls, managing project efforts, and taking the lead in problem resolution for aircraft research, development, production, and lifecycle acquisition and sustainment activities; interface with weapons system Contractors, vendors, and Government representatives regarding the technical aspects of engineering activities; independently apply engineering principles to investigate, analyze, plan, oversee, and evaluate weapons system development and sustainment activities; review and prepare engineering and technical analyses, reports, change proposals, and other technical documentation; and provide engineering expertise, oversight, and participation to activities involving weapons system and associated support equipment hardware/software development, integration and test, configuration management, quality assurance testing, and acquisition and resource management
Support development and sustaining engineering support for RPAs, similar vehicles, and associated systems, subsystems and ground control stations; the development of long range plans, roadmaps and mission area plans; processes required to analyze operational capability requirements and determine adequate technical solutions; the integration of radar systems, Electro-Optical/Infrared (EO/IR) sensors, weapons, and other payloads/stores; processes necessary to support environmental requirements; and all aspects of RPAs, similar systems and associated ground control stations development and supportability
Ensure new designs are sustainable, meet system requirements and requiring-office expectations; support the resolution of SWaP issues for RPA or similar vehicle / systems; support laboratories (i.e. Air Force Research Laboratory (AFRL)) and / or special projects for new technologies; and provide technical and feasibility analyses for development, testing and fielding of RPAs or similar vehicles.
Assist the PM in the effort to support, track and provide USAF existing documentation / information for country-specific airworthiness certification requirements IAW approved Delegation of Disclosure Letter (DDL)
Provide advisory assistance / witnessing Acceptance Test Procedures (ATP) for both aircraft and GCSs with the FMS Country representatives
REQUIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

Security Clearance: Top Secret/SCI
Active TS/SCI clearance
Ten (10) years experience
Masters degree in relevant field
Eight (8) years of additional work experience may be substituted for a Masters degree; or, four (4) years of additional work experience plus a Bachelors degree may be substituted for a Masters degree.
Five (5) years of any experience must have been performed on DoD programs/projects
DESIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Experience with Unmanned Systems (UAS)
WORK LOCATION: Wright Patterson AFB, OH

TRAVEL: 10%

KEY WORDS: Engineering; Systems Engineering; Air Worthiness; Data Analysis; ECP; Acquisition Support; Foreign Military Sales; FMS #MON

WBB is a technical and management consulting company that provides innovative products and services that solve government and commercial customers toughest problems. For more than 30 years, WBB has set the standard for excellence in consulting services, while providing its employees with an outstanding work environment with ample opportunities for growth and success. WBB continues to enjoy impressive growth, which is directly attributed to the companys hiring practice of always hiring the very best professionals from government, military and industry.

We are proud of our diverse environment and are an Equal Opportunity Employer. WBB is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity. WBB participates in E-Verify.

WBB does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of WBB and WBB will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",4.1,"Whitney, Bradley and Brown
4.1","Dayton, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
73,Physical Security System Advanced Systems & Test Engineer,$58k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor's degree in systems engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 3 years of relevant experience. Agile experience preferred

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

Department of Defense Secret security clearance is required within a reasonable period of time. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

General Dynamics Mission Systems has an immediate opening for a Physical Security System Advanced System & Test Engineer. This position provides an opportunity to further advance the cutting-edge technology that supports some of our nation’s core defense/intelligence services and systems. General Dynamics Mission Systems employees work closely with esteemed customers to develop solutions that allow them to carry out high-stakes national security missions.

REPRESENTATIVE DUTIES AND TASKS:

Performs requirements analysis, requirements definition, requirements management, functional analysis, performance analysis, system design, detail trade studies, systems integration and test (verification), validation and interface definition studies of subsystem or system elements under supervision of the lead systems engineer
Performs technical planning, cost and risk analyses, and supportability and effectiveness analyses for subsystems and system elements
Performs customer requirements analysis, develops system requirements and defines allocations to lower levels (elements and components)
Performs detailed technical analyses for a subsystem or system elements
Develops and evaluates systems, networks and information systems to ensure designs meet applicable governmental security specifications
May provide system accreditation/certification evaluation and test support to ensure all technical security features (e.g., identification, authentication, access control, labeling, and auditing) of the system are considered and function properly
May develop system security documentation on both new and fielded information systemsÂ
Participates in Modeling and Simulation
Researches and analyzes data, such as vendor products, COTS components, GFE/CFE, specifications, and manuals to determine feasibility of design or application
Supports the generation of technical engineering products by using the appropriate standards, processes, procedures, and tools throughout the system development life cycle
May provide leadership and/or direction to lower level employees
Independently determines proposed approach to solutions
Contributes to the completion of major programs and projects
Plans and executes project tasks for activities described above
Creative, innovative responsibilities requiring advanced decision-making skills
Defines processes for technical platforms, system specifications, input/output and working parameters for hardware and/or software compatibility
Demonstrates good judgment in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions
Designs a complete and complex framework, system or product
Identifies, analyzes and resolves system design weaknesses
Regular contact with senior levels of internal work groups
Works under limited direction
Contact with Deputy Program Managers Engineering (DPME) and other professionals within the Engineering department and with project teams across the company
Frequent contact with external customers
Travel may be required
Security clearance may be required
Provides resolution to a diverse range of complex problems
Independently determines approach to solutions
Keeps abreast of technology trends
Contributes to the achievement of business objective

KNOWLEDGE SKILLS AND ABILITIES:

Proficient use and understanding of systems engineering concepts, principles, and theories
Proficient knowledge of other related disciplines
Proficient with requirements management & system modeling tools
Recognizes various architectural patterns
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Proficient written and verbal communications skills
Able to sell concepts and ideas
Creative thinker
Ability to multi-task
Proficient ability to grasp and apply new information quickly and effectively handle complex assignments
Shows initiative on assignments, exercises independent judgment and professionally executes projects with little direction
Proficient ability in communicating issues, impacts, and corrective actions
Proficient ability to clearly report relevant to sound systems engineering design
Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran

To learn more about the General Dynamics Mission Systems Pittsfield facility, click HERE.",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Pittsfield, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
74,NETWORK ENGINEER II,$44k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB SUMMARY

Under the general direction of the Manager of Network Engineering, the Network Engineer II will spend approximately 25% of the time on network troubleshooting, 20% of the time on network design, 15% of the time on configuration of equipment and services, 10% of the time on research and development for equipment and technology, and 10% of the time on customer and internal communication. An additional 7% of the time will be spent on equipment implementation, 5% of the time on equipment maintenance, 5% of the time on training, and 3% of the time on Network Engineering costing. Remote work with reporting on-site once a week to our Ellettsville office if hired in the greater Indianapolis area.

The Network Engineer III is responsible for architecting the network through logical design, implementation of equipment, and administration and configuration of the network. The Network Engineer will maintain the current network through upgrades, equipment refreshments, forecasting of areas needed for improvement, and troubleshooting and resolving issues that occur throughout the network based on thought and skill-based solutions.

In this position, the Network Engineer II will impact the whole organization via the health and expansion of the core, aggregation, and access networks that carry all of the Commercial and Residential data, Streaming TV, and Voice services. The Network Engineer will design the network infrastructure for customers as well as for Smithville. This includes creating processes to minimize customer impacts, developing standard architecture for network survivability and redundancy, planning network spend to meet budget and designs, and developing Methods of Procedure (MOP) to document network changes and maintenance activities. At times, the Engineer will perform overnight maintenance and network restoration work.

The Network Engineer II will spend a significant amount of time planning and scheduling activities for themselves and others. Coordination with customers, Support teams, Sales, Customer Service Representatives, Telecommunication, and Plant Engineering will be required during installation, troubleshooting, planned maintenance, outages, and new service turn-ups. Additionally, the Network Engineer will be required to make important decisions on a regular basis. Decisions will include but are not limited to: meeting team objectives, supporting a new project effectively in the current network, impact of customers during outages and network upgrades, and best practices to improve and administer the network.

The Network Engineer II will be expected to communicate daily with Network Operations, Sales, Technical Support, and Warehouse/Inventory. On a weekly basis, the Engineer will communicate with Customer Service, Plant Engineering, Central Office Engineers, Telecommunications, Cable Teams, and Project Management. On occasion, they will communicate with IT and Accounting.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Network Troubleshooting– MPLS, OTN, ERPS, SIP, BGP, Layer 2, and hardware IP routing (25%)
Network Design– Residential, Commercial, Core, and Voice (20%)
Equipment and Services Configuration (15%)
Research& Development for Equipment and Technology (10%)
Customer and Internal Communication (10%)
Equipment Implementation– Cisco, Ciena, Calix, and Metaswitch (7%)
Equipment Maintenance (5%)
Training (5%)
Network Engineering Costing - SalesForce Commercial Costing (3%)
QUALIFICATIONS
Technical Degree in Telecommunications or Information Systems or equivalent industry experience
Industry certifications (Cisco CCNA, CCNP)
Knowledge of Internet Protocols, routing and switching, OTN, GPON, VOIP, and troubleshooting
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Attention to detail
Good project management skills; ability to work to deadlines
Methodical and analytical approach
Expected use of company vehicle, laptop, cell phone, light meter, speed tester, testers (EXFO or JDSU) for Ethernet/T1, fiber cleaning kits, basic tools (snips, screwdrivers, hammers, and more), and printer/copier
Expected to learn on the job within 6-9 months– familiarity with Smithville Calix, Cisco, Ciena, and Metaswitch design, circuit monitoring tools, Smithville locations, Smithville specific procedures for circuit deployments, Smithville documentation (fiber and customer data), customer contact Standards of Procedure (SOP), and outage response.
TYPICAL WORKING CONDITIONS
Approximately 80% of the time work is completed indoors in a climate controlled office environment (office, meeting room, or similar), 10% of the time outdoors exposed to changing weather conditions, and 10% of the time outdoors in an enclosed vehicle or temporary shelter
On occasion, the Network Engineer II will work above ground where the possibility of falling exists (ladders)
Other conditions include indoors in tight equipment spaces, around loud equipment, and possible eye hazards due to laser exposure
Typically works 40 hours per week; may work overtime, evenings, and/or weekends as needed to meet critical deadlines or respond to problems
PHYSICAL DEMANDS
Continuous fingering, handling, feeling, talking, and hearing.
Often sitting, walking, reaching at/below and above shoulder level, lifting up to 30 pounds, and close and distance vision.
Sometimes standing, bending, squatting, climbing, kneeling, twisting, lifting 31 up to and over 45 pounds, and color and depth vision.
Rarely pulling.


REQUIRED BEHAVIORAL CHARACTERISTICS
Accountability: Demonstrates integrity, accountability, and efficient stewardship of Smithville resources in a manner consistent with Smithville’s Value Statements.
Adaptability: Changes behavioral style or method of approach when necessary to achieve a goal; adjusts style as appropriate to the needs of the situation. Responds to change with a positive attitude and a willingness to learn new ways to accomplish work activities and objectives
Communication and Collaboration: Creates an atmosphere in which timely and high-quality information flows smoothly up and down, inside and outside of the organization; encourages open expression of ideas and opinions. Develops cooperation and teamwork while participating in a group, working toward solutions which generally benefit all involved parties.
Initiative: Does more than is required or expected in the job; does things that no one has requested that will improve or enhance products and services, avoid problems, or develop entrepreneurial opportunities. Plans ahead for upcoming problems or opportunities and takes appropriate action.
Job Proficiency: Applies and improves extensive or in-depth specialized knowledge, skills, and judgment to accomplish a result or to accomplish one’s job effectively. Understands technical aspects of one’s job and continuously builds knowledge, keeping up-to-date on the technical or procedural aspects of the job.",3.7,"Smithville Telephone Company
3.7","Indianapolis, IN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1922,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
75,Advanced Mechanical Engineer,$50k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in Mechanical Engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 3 years of relevant experience.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

Imagine building your career by developing the solutions that support the mission of our nation’s service members, intelligence analysts and first responders. That’s the challenge that’s waiting for you at General Dynamics Mission Systems. Here you have the opportunity to redefine innovation and excellence for the world. Are you ready? Then make a career move that makes an impact at General Dynamics Mission Systems.

We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers’ missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar space and everything in between.

As an Advanced Mechanical Engineer, you’ll design and develop in such areas as mechanical, thermal, hydraulic, thermodynamic, or heat transfer for production, transmission, measurement, and use of mechanical and/or electromechanical systems, instruments, controls, engines and/or machines. Basically, you’ll test your skill and knowledge each and every day by working with the best of the best.

What you’ll experience:
Hands on approach for identifying and eliminating process inefficiencies and constraints using various data analysis techniques (TOC, SPC, DOE, 6 Sigma, etc.)
Applies Quality and SPC tools to manufacturing processes and performs analysis of the associated data to drive continuous improvement
Proficient use and understanding of tolerancing and performance budgeting in addition to Design for Manufacture (DFM) concepts, principles, and theories
Develops, evaluates, and improves manufacturing processes, utilizing knowledge of product design, materials and parts, fabrication processes, tooling and production equipment capabilities, assembly methods, and quality control standards
Identifies Key Process Characteristics (KPC’s) and tracks and reports in program metrics
Creates designs and releases models / drawings for tooling used in the fabrication and testing of optics and optical assemblies. Troubleshoots and modifies designs as required.
Solid knowledge with technical standards, manufacturing/fabrication methods, government/industry standards
Ensures compliance of practices, procedures and instructions relative to applicable corporate standards (ISO, MIL, etc)
Develops detailed work instructions for critical optical manufacturing processes / tests
Contributes to continuous improvement activities and Root Cause / Corrective Action investigations
Actively uncovers technical and organizational risks and ensures they are included in risk mitigation plans
What you bring to the table:
Solid understanding of statistics and application to manufacturing processes including statistical process control (SPC), design of experiments (DOE), statistical hypothesis testing.
3D CAD experience (Solidworks experience preferred)
Technical drawing knowledge: drawing standards, GD&T (Geometric, Dimensioning and Tolerancing), etc.
Ability to create verification compliance documents to show drawing requirements and customer / industry specifications are being adhered to
Knowledge of Design for Manufacturability and Design for Assembly
Requires technical evaluation skills, and basic manufacturing engineering knowledge
Six Sigma/lean manufacturing tool skills a plus
What sets you apart:
Creative thinking with the ability to multi-task
Ability to quickly grasp and apply new information
Effectively handle and lead complex assignments
Ability to write technical papers and proposals
Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Cullman, AL",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
76,Software Systems Engineer,$76k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Farm Credit Mid-America, we believe people are our strongest asset. We are consistently looking to hire individuals from a wide range of experience and capabilities who have a desire to serve. Currently, we have over 1,400 employees across Indiana, Ohio, Kentucky and Tennessee.

We are looking for a passionate technology professional with experience implementing and administering enterprise software. An ideal candidate would have a strong technical aptitude and background encompassing a broad technical skillset.

Experience and/or knowledge in the following area(s) is a plus; database systems and data integration experience, .Net, MS SQL, Loan Origination Systems (LOS), Customer-relationship management (CRM) systems, IT Service Management software. Come join our team oriented, collaborative culture!

This position will be an enterprise software systems technical expert that works collaboratively with various team members in the administration, installation, configuration, customization and integration of association enterprise business applications (e.g. Loan Origination Systems, Customer Relationship Management (CRM) systems, Enterprise Content Management (ECM) systems, IT Service Management/Enterprise Service Management). Will serve as the escalation point of contact for enterprise software systems to aid in troubleshooting and problem resolution. This position will have the ability to create workaround procedures when standard procedures have failed and the knowledge to seek out appropriate internal and external resources when urgent problems arise to resolve issues in a timely fashion.

MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES :

Design, coordinate and perform the installation and configuration of complex enterprise software systems.
Proactive, efficient and accurate administration of enterprise software systems throughout all application environments. (E.g. Prod, Dev, Staging, DR). Coordinating upgrades and patches with other technology teams and business owners.
Document procedures for installation, upgrades, and customizations. Provide design expertise for system upgrades and application integration initiatives and projects.
Effective and timely problem solving, coordination and resolution of escalated support incidents.
Identifies and executes on opportunities for improvement in processes and technology. Stays abreast of technology trends and current business challenges. Applies technology to solve business problems and create a better customer experience (internal and external).
Perform day-to-day system administration, proactively monitor key enterprise systems for issues to avoid system downtime and enhance performance.
Build strong relationships with business partners, vendors and customers.
Anticipate and raise project, business, and technical issues to the appropriate resource(s).
Represent and communicate the mission and values of Farm Credit Mid-America and comply with its conduct policy, security policy and confidentiality expectations.
Performs other responsibilities as required.

MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS

Education and Experience

Bachelor's degree in computer science, business or related field; with at least one year experience supporting enterprise software applications; or a minimum of four years of direct experience in a software administration/software implementation role. Good project management skills, oral and written communication skills, and analytical skills necessary.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES :

Key Competencies: integrity, motivational fit, problem solving, customer focus, teamwork, adaptability.

Knowledge of procedures and techniques as applicable to various enterprise technology components, configuration, administration and support of enterprise software systems, scripting and automation techniques, loan originations systems (LOS) customer relationship management (CRM) systems, SQL/Microsoft SQL Server; Farm Credit Mid-America financial services; enterprise content management (ECM) systems, software deployment and change management processes, Microsoft Windows server platform, Microsoft Windows Internet Information Services (IIS), C#/.NET framework.

Skills in enterprise software application implementation and administration; project management; communication and presentation skills; tact; verbal and written communication; analyzing and developing processes; Evaluation of software with recommendations for solutions to problems or use within association; complex problem solving.

Ability to exercise leadership and judgment within a team environment; complete tasks on a timely basis; analyze, evaluate and develop solutions to complex problems; be innovative, creative, objective and persuasive; work with both technical and business resources.

Here's What We Can Offer You...

Farm Credit Mid-America has an outstanding Total Rewards package, which includes, but is not limited to:

Salary commensurate with experience
15 vacation days, 15 sick days, and 11 paid holidays per year
401(k) plan with outstanding match
Medical, Dental, Vision, STD, LTD, Life/AD&D benefits, etc.
Fitness Incentive Program
Tuition assistance for employees and dependents.

Requirements of the job include the ability to do the work, with or without reasonable accommodations. It is the Association's policy to make reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities. Leadership retains the right to add, subtract or change duties of the position at any time.

Farm Credit Mid-America is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other category protected by law.

IND123",3.7,"Farm Credit Mid-America
3.7","Louisville, KY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
77,Data Engineer,$52k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network and our mission is to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our Product team to design and build a robust set of tools and pipelines to support data analytics efforts. You’ll manage and optimize our core infrastructure by creating and maintaining data pipelines. You will work with other engineers and analysts from the Product and Business teams to design, implement, and maintain a data ecosystem that delivers actionable insights to make key business decisions. You have technical chops but can also work independently to prioritize issues, work within ambiguity, and manage conflicting deadlines. You are creative, data-driven, results-oriented, and eager to help us solve data problems of varying complexities.

Responsibilities
Develop technical solutions using proven techniques in data and analytics processes
Develop, prototype, and build frameworks based on open source and commercially available tools
Orchestrate and maintain data pipelines that meet security standards and ensure the integrity and quality of data
Demonstrate a passion for serving the needs of internal and external customers by enabling them with self-service reporting tools and analytics capabilities
Drive the execution of data initiatives that provide key performance metrics
Understand the data related challenges, nuances, and requirements to identify and recommend the optimal technical approach
Train and educate team members as well as stakeholders about best practices in data engineering and governance
Collaborate closely with the engineering and devops team to implement DataOps, thus reducing our analytics development cycle
Research and improve our data platform to ingest, process, transform, and distribute insightful data to our audience ranging from executives, analysts, and engineers to customers, vendors, and partners
Evangelize data driven culture by breaking down silos and encouraging data sharing
Qualifications
3+ years of hands-on experience in data engineering for a SaaS company or a mature startup
Proven experience working with various tools but more importantly, familiarity with how to best assemble and deploy production ready data stack to any cloud environment
BS in a quantitative or scientific field such as computer science, computer engineering or equivalent experience
Experience in applying agile software development approach - Git, CI/CD, Jira, etc - to data engineering
Familiar with SQL and other popular programming languages (such as Ruby, Python, .NET, etc)
Exceptional fluency with SQL; you conquered the join venn diagram long ago and have moved on to explaining cost based optimization to your peers on the engineering team
Some level of experience working in the cloud - AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with ingesting, processing, and visualizing data sources of varying types - structured/relational and unstructured
Experience in developing, managing, and manipulating large, complex datasets
Data-driven, detail-oriented individual with excellent storytelling and problem-solving abilities
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team
Superb time management, prioritization of tasks and ability to meet deadlines with little supervision
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.2,"Id.me
3.2","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
78,Informatica IICS SQL Integration Engineer,-1,"Chicago Preferred - Lake Forest, CA considered
*SQL Informatica IICS Integration Engineer* - $120K - $128K + Bonus + Relo. 80% bonus on individual performance
*Temporarily remote YES* but onsite initially for some days
Remote-based position on an interim basis only due to Covid-19 Pandemic. Upon approval of “Return to Office” site guidelines, this role will require the individual to work onsite
*Hands-on not just lead a team*
*Experience with Cloud-based integrations* (Salesforce, Azure, Amazon, Google)
Good knowledge/experience with *data governance* practices
*5 year Informatica*
*1+ year experience specifically using Informatica IICS preferred*, other cloud-based tools considered
*Strong SQL coding skills for data analysis and testing*
*Data Extraction skills a must*

*Before sending your WORD resume only* be sure your resume includes all the required skills you have, preferable under your work history.
*Resumes without a last name* or phone number or email address will be deleted.
Put Sr SQL Data Architect in the subject line.
*Pointing out the required skills you have* with a number of years’ experience, will get an immediate response from me.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $6,000.00 per year

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Flexible schedule
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Parental leave
* Relocation assistance
* Retirement plan
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* 8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
* Bonus pay

Education:
* Bachelor's (Preferred)

Experience:
* SQL: 1 year (Preferred)",-1,"Computer Recruiters, Inc","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
79,Senior Systems and Data Security Engineer,-1,"Senior Systems and Data Security Engineer *
Principal Duties and Responsibilities*
Responsible for the design, test, operation and implementation of secure operating systems, networks, and database products.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities

• Responsible for performing all analysis, engineering, and solution development necessary to ensure the safety of information, systems assets and to protect systems and data from intentional or inadvertent access or destruction.

• Responsible for using current information security technology disciplines and practices to ensure the confidentiality, integrity and availability of Army information assets in accordance with established DoD, Army, and industry standards and procedures.

• Develops and maintains knowledge base on changing regulatory, threat, and technology landscapes to continually develop or maintain security policies and standards, and ensure compliance throughout the Army enterprise related to the Army metering program.
Skills and Experience Requirements: *
• Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent.

• Minimum of 0-10 plus years of work related experience.

• In depth understanding of cyber security policy and tools, threat mitigation, network topologies, intrusion detection, PKI, operational technology, control systems and secured networks.

• DoD 8570/8140 IAT Level III certifications required

• Ability to clearly present and communicate technical approaches and findings.

• US Citizenship required; Ability to obtain and maintain DoD SECRET Security Clearance

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Security Clearance Required:
Confidential (Required)
Company's website:
www.cmadvancedtech.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/cmadvancedtech/",-1,CM Advanced Technologies,"Huntsville, AL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
80,"Senior Software Engineer, Distributed Systems (Cloud)",$83k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"Come join a winning team!

Take a walk around our offices and you’ll see a dedicated group of professionals who care about improving health care. Our team thrives on collaboration and sharing ideas, whether in a cross-functional meeting or at one of our office events.

While we're diverse in our backgrounds and skills, we have much in common. A passion for our mission. A strong sense of integrity. A belief that we're making a positive impact and a commitment to having fun.

We are seeking a Senior Software Engineer for our Lexington, MA office.

Job Summary

As a Senior Software Engineer on a highly skilled Cloud Platform team, you will be expanding and improving common libraries and services used by the rest of the engineering organization to expose application features and functionality in the cloud. You will focus on backend infrastructure, while leveraging proven distributed systems experience. You will strive to make the system faster to build, better tested, easier to deploy and more observable.

Duties and Responsibilities
Play an important role in the design and implementation of our highly scalable hosted (SaaS) solutions, with lots of autonomy while receiving guidance and feedback to help you grow
Assume full range of software engineering responsibilities, including architecture, design, development, testing and production support
Collaborate with DevOps, Product Management, Release Delivery, Customer Support and other groups towards developing most optimal solutions and troubleshooting issues
Practice modern agile software development practices that deliver high quality code: continuous integration and deployment, and automated testing
Qualifications
BS/MS degree in Computer Science or related field, and 5+ years of relevant work experience
Outstanding technical problem-solving, design and coding skills
A proven ability to learn and adapt to new, complex development environments with deep dive analytical skills
2 + years’ experience building distributed highly scalable hosted (SaaS) solutions
Java expertise
Proficiency with relational data stores
Dedicated to producing quality code through best practices
Desired Skills
Programming in functional paradigm language, such as Scala
Experience with distributed streaming platforms, such as Kafka
Reactive programming principles using frameworks like Akka and Play
Working knowledge of Java open source frameworks
Deep familiarity with RESTful Web APIs, JSON, web services and Linux environment
Cryptography, security, and data privacy
Experience developing for Continuous Deployment on AWS, GCP or similar
At Imprivata, we have a top-notch work environment, developmental opportunities, a competitive total rewards package, and the desire to have fun. If you have the skills and qualifications as we have described above, we want to hear from you!

Imprivata provides equal employment opportunities to minorities, females, veterans, and disabled individuals, as well as other protected groups.",3.4,"Imprivata
3.4","Lexington, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
81,Senior Test Engineer - 704th Test Group,$59k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB TITLE: Senior Test Engineer - 704th Test Group

PROJECT OVERVIEW:

""This position is contingent upon contract award""

The Aerospace Survivability and Safety Office (704th Test Group (TG)/Operating Location (OL)-AC) is the preeminent aircraft survivability and landing gear safety resource for the United States Air Force (USAF). The 704th TG/OL-AC supports Department of Defense (DoD) acquisition and sustainment requirements through world-class capabilities for aircraft survivability and landing gear systems Research, Development, Acquisition, Test, and Evaluation (RDAT&E), enabling more survivable and safe aircraft operation by the warfighter.

The 704th TG/OL-AC consists of the Survivability Assessment Flight and Landing Gear Test Flight. These two Flights are tailored to their distinct survivability assessment (OL- Aircraft Vehicle Survivability Facility (ACS)) and unique landing gear safety (OL-Aircraft Landing Gear Facility (ACL)) missions. These Flights support their missions through basic Research, Development, Test, and Evaluation (RDT&E), platform integration, demonstration, and Title 10 Live Fire Test and Evaluation (LFT&E).

JOB DESCRIPTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:

Provides test and evaluation of hardware and/or software development. This includes developing and documenting test plans and procedures, conducting testing, and evaluating and documenting results. Prepares studies, plans, and analyses in support of the program.

REQUIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

Security Clearance: Secret
Active Secret (DoD) clearance required
Bachelors Degree in electrical, aerospace, systems, or mechanical engineering
10 years of experience in test & evaluation planning, execution, data recording & reporting
DAWIA Level III, Test & Evaluation
Familiar with a variety of the test & evaluation concepts, practices, and procedures
DESIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Masters Degree in electrical, aerospace, systems, or mechanical engineering
Survivability and/or lethality testing
Modeling & Simulation experience
WORK LOCATION: Wright-Patterson, OH

TRAVEL: 15%

KEY WORDS: Test & Evaluation, Live Fire, Lethality, Survivability, Modeling & Simulation, Test Instrumentation

WBB is a technical and management consulting company that provides innovative products and services that solve government and commercial customers toughest problems. For more than 30 years, WBB has set the standard for excellence in consulting services, while providing its employees with an outstanding work environment with ample opportunities for growth and success. WBB continues to enjoy impressive growth, which is directly attributed to the companys hiring practice of always hiring the very best professionals from government, military and industry.

We are proud of our diverse environment and are an Equal Opportunity Employer. WBB is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity. WBB participates in E-Verify.

WBB does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of WBB and WBB will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",4.1,"Whitney, Bradley and Brown
4.1","Dayton, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
82,ETL Developer,$59k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Reporting to the ETL Lead of Information technology, the ETL Developer is responsible for the loading, extraction, transformation, organization, and reporting of complex international data that spans 5 Latin American countries. The incumbent will have experience working with “large data” that spans several countries.

Responsibilities:
Create complex data loading processes for Operational Data Stores, Data Warehouses and Data Marts that satisfy all functional and technical requirements.
Responsible for extracting data from various sources, transforming the data as required, and loading it to various target (ETL) database(s) and/or structures
Analyze and review complex object and data models and the metadata repository in order to structure processes and data for accuracy, efficiency, and maintainability
Work with various levels of project managers, data modelers, DBAs, and system administrators to design load processes and identify potential problem areas.
Collaborate with the Data Architect to understand, interpret, and implement complex data integration requirements.
Work with internal business clients to solve data integrity issues and ensure timely data availability.
Assist in data load monitoring and problem resolution. Take action to resolve recurring issues.
Serve as an expert for DataStage software development who can advise team on best practices, capabilities and limitations,
Act as SME to team in the plan, design, and delivery of BI and Data Warehouse solutions
Assess existing DataStage code and determine refactoring.
Advice on the application of standards/methodology practices to the project
Open to learn the new technologies like Informatica ,Tibco Data virtualization
Qualifications:

Experience:

Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent work experience in Computer Science, Information Systems, or other related field.
Minimum of Five years of experience with developing code using IBM’s InfoSphere DataStage
Experience delivering BI and Data Warehouse solutions with both Dimensional and Relational modeling a plus.
Automotive Lending or Financial Services industry experience desired

Skills & Knowledge:

Minimum of Five years of DataStage (v8.5 and later versions)
Proven experience with SQL and relational databases (Oracle 11g preferred)
Solid design, coding, testing and debugging skills
Strong analytical and good communications skills
Knowledge of standards and practices in BI, Data Warehousing, ETL and DataStage
Ability to develop DataStage guidelines and standards
Excellent communication skills are essential.
Familiar with: Windows, Unix/Linux, PL/SQL, Shell Scripting

#LI-CH1",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Detroit, MI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
83,Production Engineer Tech,$36k-$64k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description
_Preferred requirements: _*
Computer Skills: *
Corel and/or AutoCAD Experience
Microsoft Excel, Word & Outlook
Solidworks or similar 3d software
General drafting skills: *
Scaling Artwork/Fonts
Cleanup of client provided art
General knowledge of metal fabrication: *
General material knowledge of Aluminum, Steel, Stainless Steel & Plastics
Folding, Bending & Rolling
CNC Router Parts set-up
General knowledge of electrical: *
LED’s
Neon
Amps/Circuits
Primary & Secondary Voltage
Subcontractor communication skills: *
General Knowledge of Laser or Water Jet Cutting, Metal Brushing etc.
Ability to work with subcontractors to successfully execute scope
_Job Description: _*
Process assigned shop drawings to create accurately detailed lists for sawed parts and needed materials, develop diagrams and instructions for internal equipment operators (Press Brake, Shear Machines, Ironworkers, etc.) and generate vector art files for CNC Router Tables when required. Scaling parts/fonts out of shop drawings is required to develop flat layouts to be formed to accurate finished sized parts by calculating bend allowances. Creation of Material Requests for shop’s Purchasing Department and instruction documents for various internal equipment operators is done with standard Excel forms. Vectorized art for parts to be laser cut, water jet cut, milled or brushed, by others is done with Corel and AutoCAD. Releasing part development documents for jigs and fixtures, installation templates, etc. will be required as shop management sees appropriate. Design development by enhancements of fabrication details for ease of installation, serviceability and cost effectiveness is often required.

Outsourced work from vendor list or researching new vendors to obtain price & lead time for parts or service may be needed. Provide detailed description and/or drawing of parts/service. Clear communication of scope of work, material information and any other important details is mandatory. Identification of non-stock materials is required for each assignment as Material Inventory data is available to be referenced. Use of internal reports and seeking information from production staff is often needed. Timeliness in all functions of this role and attention to detail and accuracy is required.

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
www.agi.net",3.9,"AGI
3.9","Virginia Beach, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Other Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
84,Electrical Engineer / FPGA Designer,-1,"*Position: *Electrical Engineer / FPGA Designer

*Reports to: *Director of Engineering

*About the Company*:

Founded in 1968, Klein Marine Systems is the world's leading supplier of side scan sonar equipment. Our sonar is used by the world’s largest Navies, surveyors, universities, and wreck hunters. One of our many successes is developing sonar that found the Titanic wreck.

Our strategic location in Southern New Hampshire enjoys short commutes, low taxes, lower housing cost, and convenient proximity to the Boston metro area.

*Job Description: *

Design cutting-edge sonar imaging systems for both unmanned underwater vehicles (UUV) and underwater towed systems. Convert logic and algorithm descriptions into functional products. Debug completed PCB assemblies in-system, in collaboration with other software and hardware engineers. Enjoy learning from the very best in the industry while making a significant personal contribution.

*Areas of work to include*:

* Mixed signal design
* FPGA coding (Verilog / System Verilog)
* Verification testing
* Collaboration with software and mechanical engineering

*Requirements: *

* BS Electrical Engineering – Or similar experience
* Experience designing electronics, FPGA or embedded microprocessor systems

*FPGA - Required*

* Design FPGAs from specifications using Verilog HDL. (Xilinx, Vivado experience a plus )
* Use Verilog test benches to verify FPGA compliance to specifications.
* Apply suitable timing constraints to guarantee reliable operation.

*FPGA - Preferred*

* Familiarity with digital filters in FPGA - low-pass, pulse-compression, FFT.
* Ability and willingness to reverse-engineer and improve existing FPGA designs.

*Circuit Design Required: *

* Design digital PCB circuitry for data I/O, computer interface. (OrCAD experience a plus)
* Guide PCB layout to achieve signal integrity in digital circuitry. (PADs experience a plus)

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Flexible spending account
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Professional development assistance
* Relocation assistance
* Retirement plan
* Tuition reimbursement
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* 8 hour shift
* Monday to Friday

Work Location:
* One location

Company's website:
* kleinmarinesystems.com/

Benefit Conditions:
* Waiting period may apply

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Klein Marine Systems,"Salem, NH",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
85,Lead Back End Engineer,$107k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds.

Why work for just any analytics company? At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs


The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview


As a Lead Back End Engineer you will you will lead the Innovation Labs’ back end development efforts on a new web-based data science product (sorry we can’t say much yet on what it is publicly, but we promise it’s great!). In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Work closely with Engineering Leadership to architect, design and develop the back end services, APIs and infrastructure to power this new application
Design and develop and deploy a robust data processing and ML API platform
Help to recruit, scale and mentor the back end engineering team
Define and promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
Work closely with Product and Front End counterparts to drive the product to completion
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***
Requirements
7+ years of experience in building large scale web applications, ideally into a B2B and/or enterprise environment
3+ years in a Technical Leadership capacity
Experience writing production-quality code in a modern web framework/technology (Python, Node, Go, Scala, etc)
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience in docker-based infrastructure on AWS (or another cloud provider).
Experience with automated testing and CI/CD platforms and tools like CircleCI, Selenium, etc.
Track record of sharing knowledge with team members through mentoring, code reviews, pair programming, and presentations.
Experience working with Product, Design, DevOps and other departments in a cross-functional way.
Bonus
Experience with Java/Scala and/or Python.
Startup experience (building products from 0→1 and 1->10).
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries.
Experience in ML/AI/Data Science python environment (sklearn/etc.)
Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
86,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"Overview:

Who is Virgin Pulse?

Virgin Pulse, founded as part of Sir Richard Branson’s famed Virgin Group, helps organizations build employee health and wellbeing into the DNA of their corporate cultures. As the only company to deliver a powerful, mobile-first digital platform infused with live services, including coaching and biometric screenings, Virgin Pulse’s takes a high-tech-meets-high-touch-approach to engage employees in improving across all aspects of their health and wellbeing, every day – from prevention and building a healthy lifestyle to condition and disease management to condition reversal, all while engaging users daily in building and sustaining healthy habits and behaviors. A global leader in health and wellbeing, Virgin Pulse is committed to helping change lives and businesses around the world for good so that people and organizations can thrive, together. Today, more than 3100 organizations across the globe are using Virgin Pulse’s solutions to improve health, employee wellbeing and engagement, reduce costs and create strong workplace cultures.

Who are our employees?

At Virgin Pulse we’re passionate about changing lives for good. We want to make a difference in the world by helping people be healthy so they can perform at their best, every day, at work and home. Our award-winning solutions support leading employers in improving and simplifying the employee health and wellbeing journey and engaging people in all aspects of their health. But our world-class products and programs are nothing without our people – the employees who design, build, promote, sell, test and perfect the latest innovations in workplace health and wellbeing. Our people are our top priority and we invest in their health and happiness. At Virgin Pulse, we have so much more than a strong, supportive company culture – have a shared vision for a healthier, happier world.

Responsibilities:

Who you are.

As a Senior Software Engineer at Virgin Pulse you will be working on a Digital Health SaaS platform that supports millions of engaged, active members in 20 languages across 190 countries, serving over 50 billion+ API calls every year to mobile and desktop users. As a Senior Software Engineer at Virgin Pulse you will be working with a passionate and strong team of engineers, product managers and UX Designers. With your strong background in cloud technologies and software architecture you will have the opportunity to develop, manage and optimize our tech stack and production pipelines. This work might include projects like building out new customer facing features, creating the APIs for new capabilities, data integration from our customers or partners, developing new strategies for managing our product stack or optimizing existing code to make it more performant. We are looking for someone with an appetite for growth and we offer the opportunity to learn directly from our highly skilled group of engineers.

You offer strength in production-ready code in Java, .Net or Kotlin using strong analytical skills. We value the desire and ability to learn quickly but familiarity with Angular and the AWS ecosystem would be a plus. Excellent problem-solving abilities, strong communication skills, and the desire and ability to self-start and time-manage in a fast-paced environment will set you up for success in our team.

What your typical day looks like.

Delivering production ready code in Java and Kotlin
Design, develop and deploy backend services with focus on high availability, low latency and scalability
Monitor, test, and continuously optimize your designs
Provide technical leadership and coaching to the more junior team members to enable them to build better software.
Master our development process, culture and code base, then think of ways to improve it and implement within our team.
Take operational responsibility for the services that are owned by your team, potentially including taking part in off hour calls with systems support team
Qualifications:

What you bring to the team.

In order to represent the best of what we have to offer you come to us with a multitude of positive attributes including:

Fluency in Java and/or .Net
4 or more years of experience developing services and APIs
A solid understanding of best practices for software development including testing, monitoring, and design
Desire to go beyond the functional solution to build maintainable and well tested code
A desire to partner closely with product managers to refine the product
Ability to articulate and champion design strategies related to scalability, maintainability, performance, security and usability.

What makes you stand out.

Experience with highly scalable systems in an AWS ecosystem
Experience with some of the tools in our tech stack, particularly Spring Boot, Cassandra, PostgreSQL and/or Elasticsearch
Experience with Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery technologies like Maven, TeamCity, Ansible, Harness, Terraform, or similar.

Security Competencies:

Work to maintain system and data security at a high standard, ensuring the confidentiality, integrity and availability of the Virgin Pulse application is not compromised. Adhere to industry best practice coding standards and verify all code developed at Virgin Pulse is free from bugs and security vulnerabilities (OWASP/CWE).

Why work here?

We believe a career should provide competitive pay and benefits, a collaborative and supportive work environment, strong employee culture and cutting-edge technology and services — so many reasons to love it here.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to any protected class status.",-1,VirginPulse,"Minneapolis, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
87,Electrical Engineer/CS/Physicist (R&D Sensor System Development),-1,"Sensor System Development/Processing/Data Collection*
SUMMARY DESCRIPTION: * Development, integration, and advanced processing of state-of-the-art digital sensors and data collection/processing technology. The responsibilities include multi-INT sensor system design, development, integration, data collection, and data processing. In addition to design and development of EO/IR optics, focal plane array, electronics, and other sensor technology. Similar positions exist for developing/enhancing post acquisition sensor, signal processing algorithms and AI algorithms for real-time imagery display and exploitation, design and integration of electronic hardware and software for sensor data processing, acquisition, and dissemination.
QUALIFICATIONS: * BS/MS/Ph.D. in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Physicist or equivalent. Experience in signal, image, and data processing with knowledge of analog and digital electronics. Experience in system hardware design. Knowledge in some or several of these areas is preferred:
Xilinx SOC FPGA hardware design using RTL in VHDL and embedded software design.
Printed Circuit Board design using Altium Designer.
Electronic component and sub-system design and integration.
Familiar with Aerospace wiring best practices for systems.
Real-time signal processing for electro-optical and infrared sensors.
Image enhancement/processing
AI algorithm development and deployment with CUDA GPUs
Experience with C/C++, MATLAB, optics, focal plane array and sensor technology desired.
Must be a U. S. citizen and have an existing DOD SECRET security clearance.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Alaire Technologies, Inc.","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
88,(HIH 10077) Sr. Software Engineer (Cloud) – Randolph AFB,$86k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"(HIH 10077) Sr. Software Engineer (Cloud) – Randolph AFB (TX)

Location: San Antonio, TX

Clearance: Secret

PCI has an exciting opportunity for a Senior Software Engineer located at Randolph AFB in San Antonio, Texas. This position will be in the Air Force Human Resources Systems Division, which supports a variety of Air Force personnel web applications. The Sr. Software Engineer will provide software engineering support for the HR Systems Personnel Applications and its subsystems. This role will require oversight of technical planning, acquisition, development and sustainment of Air Force-based Oracle applications.

Responsibilities:

The successful candidate will perform work that applies a broad theoretical and practical knowledge of software engineering including, but not limited to the following:
Provide software engineering support and oversight for Air Force Cloud-Based Personnel Systems
Provide software/systems engineering, analyses, specialized technical support to technical interchange meetings, direct assistance to program managers and support the design and fielding of HR systems.
Provide technical consultation and support in the development of web applications and programs
Analyze network communication requirements, design specifications and technical specifications or Oracle Application solutions
Develop and maintain system topology and architecture diagrams
Participate in Integrated Product Team (IPT) meetings and reviews to ensure Systems Integrator is adhering to program requirements and systems engineering process. Determine operational feasibility by evaluating analysis, problem definition, requirements, solution development, and proposed solutions.
Document and demonstrate solutions by developing documentation, flowcharts, layouts, diagrams, charts, and code comments.
Prepare and install solutions by determining and designing system specifications, standards, and programming.
Improve operations by conducting systems analysis and recommending changes in policies and procedures as needed.
Evaluate, test, and approve licensed software products and recommend for purchase.
Collect, analyze, and summarize development and service issues.
Review and provide software engineering and technical advice/assistance on project deliverables such as:
Software Development Plan
Software and Interface Requirements Specification
Software and Interface Design Description
Database Design Description
Software Test Plan, Test Description and Test Report
Software Product Specifications
Data Migration Plans/Reports (Technical Reports)
Interface Control Documents (ICDs)
Assure project quality, security, and compliance requirements are satisfied
Conduct reviews on program portfolio to evaluate and/or recommend alternative plans, improve software engineering programs/processes, manage/sustain program technical baseline, and design/perform system level tests to assure that subsystems and system performance is achieved in accordance with approved specifications.
Required Qualifications:
MA/MS in Computer Science, Information Technology or other Engineering discipline and 12 years of experience, 5 of which must be in the DoD; or
BA/BS in Computer Science, Information Technology or other Engineering discipline and 15 years of experience, 5 of which must be in the DoD; or
20 years of directly related experience with proper certifications, 8 of which must be in the DoD
Technical/analytical skills in systems/software engineering (HR systems is a plus) and the knowledge needed to support the full acquisition life cycle from pre-award to post-award, development, testing and fielding.
Experience in Air Force Program software and and systems engineering policies, procedures, and practices
Knowledge of reporting tools that support cloud implementation
Experience as a systems or network engineer for a large enterprise software or ERP system
Experience managing and integrating COTs software into a DoD environment
Experience with Windows Server environments, IIS, .NET
MS Office Applications – MS Visio, MS Access DB, MS Excel, MS Word, MS Outlook
High proficiency with computers and software applications, including MS Office
Expert attention to detail
Strong verbal and written communications skills


Desired Qualifications:
Knowledge of Cloud (AWS, Azure) infrastructure architecture, development methodologies, and service types (IaaS, PaaS, and SaaS) is a plus
ERP conversion/data migration/cloud implementation experience is a plus
Knowledge of DevSecOps practices and implementation a plus
Oracle and SQL RDBMS products experience a plus
Experience collaborating with multiple technical teams across multiple organizations is a plus
Knowledge of secure software development such as Oracle Single-Sign On (SSO) Software and /or Working Knowledge a plus
Unix experience a plus
Any of the following certifications is also desirable:
AWS Cloud Solutions Architect
Network +
Security +
CISSP
CSSLP
CMMI Level 2.0 Software Process Improvement",4.6,"PCI
4.6","San Antonio, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
89,Database Administrator - Cloud Services,-1,"Why 2nd Watch

2nd Watch is in growth mode, and we are looking for like-minded, focused team members to join us! We are looking for the most technically forward-thinking, cloud-passionate employees in the world, and strive daily to align our core values with those that we hire Elevating Each Other, Being Outcome Driven, Winning as a Team, Being Bold, Trusting Each Other, and Having FUN! these are all key elements to who we hire.

2nd Watch has a unique company culture and working environment that live and breathe success and promote pushing the envelope every day in your respective role at the company. This is what drives our teams a perpetual thirst for knowledge, and a desire to work with the best people and take on big challenges together. Getting our attention takes creativity, integrity, a desire to improve yourself and your co-workers each day, and a track record of caring about who you are affecting, both positively and negatively, while you are getting the right stuff done.

We offer roles ranging from all levels in our Sales, Managed Cloud Services, Cloud Enablement, DevOps, Product Development teams and beyond. We are looking for superstars to help raise the bar, setting industry-level standards around project management and delivery of AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud services.

About 2nd Watch

As a cloud native company, 2nd Watch has walked alongside our clients for over a decade helping them migrate to the cloud, accelerate application development, and deliver on their companys strategic goals through the blend of technology and innovation that is at our core. Our services deliver cloud native capabilities through strategic consulting, modernization services, and specialized technology practices focused on maximizing the value of public cloud through:
Business Transformation
Cloud Advisory
Datacenter Migration & Application Modernization
Optimization
Data Engineering
Compliance, Security & Business Continuity
DevOps
Managed Cloud services
With a client NPS of 85, our approach has been successful for some of the worlds leading brands and is tested, trusted, and proven to accelerate your cloud adoption.

2nd Watch is an AWS Partner Network (APN) Premier Consulting Partner, a Microsoft Azure Gold Partner, and a Google Cloud Platform Partner. The venture-backed company is headquartered in Seattle, Washington. To learn more about 2nd Watch, visit www.2ndwatch.com or call 888-317-7920.

Position Title:

Database Administrator ( DBA ) Cloud Services

The ideal candidate is someone who

· Operates with the highest levels of integrity

· Thinks Big and takes on Big Challenges

· Has a continuous thirst for knowledge and is a perpetual learner

· Strives to make themselves and everyone around them better

· Has a passion for technology

Database Administrator - Cloud

Continue building your technical skills with an awesome team of industry professionals
Make your mark in this rapidly growing startup as we bring Cloud Services to the Enterprise
Work closely with top-tier customers to ensure success in a highly rewarding role

2nd Watch (www.2ndwatch.com ) is a global systems integrator based in the US, and we specialize in helping enterprise customers migrate their infrastructure to the cloud using the majority of opensource technologies. Were well funded, growing rapidly and have already established an impeccable track record of customer success across the country.

We're building our team with talented and passionate Database Administrators to maintain client databases & applications.

Were hiring exceptional Database Administrators to work with our enterprise customers. 2nd Watch puts our customers first and we obsess over ensuring their trust is our first priority. To earn that trust in a constantly changing technology arena like cloud-computing, it requires building a world-class team to tackle unforeseen challenges. You will be responsible for supporting, maintaining, configuring and troubleshooting a wide range of databases and applications spanning multiple clients.

Responsibilities:

Supporting a broad range of relational and non-relational database technologies, including but not limited to Aurora, MySQL, Oracle, SQL Server, PostgreSQL, NoSQL, DynamoDB, and Redshift
Installing database software
Creating databases
Performing upgrades and patching of the database and software to new release levels
Starting up and shutting down the database
Managing the databases storage structures
Managing users and security
Managing schema objects, such as tables, indexes, and views
Making database backups and performing recovery when necessary
Proactively monitoring the databases health and taking preventive or corrective action as required
Monitoring and tuning performance and query optimization
Perform regular security reviews including recommending gaps in infrastructure not meeting compliance rules (PCI, SOC2, HIPAA etc), document systems, processes, and procedures
Feed market intelligence and potential product improvements to the exec and technical team and development team
Expert development of run books and system configuration and architecture documentation
Continuously improve your skills, product expertise, and knowledge on related technical topics
Ensure that our applications and infrastructure are designed and implemented to the highest security standards thus maintaining and enhancing customer trust
Evangelize security within 2nd Watch and be an advocate for keeping customer information secure
Requirements:
Bachelors in Computer Science or related discipline
Experience working in public cloud infrastructures, such as AWS and Azure.
Experience working in large enterprise environments
Technical degree and 10+ years experience in Database Administration
AWS and database technology certifications are highly desired
Working knowledge of database administration activities including backup strategies and alerting
Automation experience a plus; Jenkins, Chef, Puppet, CloudFormation
You will have access to several customer production sites and applications.
Confidentiality and non-disclosure of client information is a requirement and non-negotiable
Familiarity of a disaster recovery process and reporting security breaches is desired
Familiarity with and experience working with the following compliance standards: Sarbanes Oxley, HIPAA, PCI, SOC-2
Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"2nd Watch, Inc.
3.8",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
90,Senior Control Systems Engineer,-1,"The Senior Control Systems Engineer provides hardware and software troubleshooting and programming assistance on utility systems, manufacturing equipment, laboratory equipment and building systems in a highly regulated cGMP environment. This individual will be a part of a team to advance a fundamentally important aspect of the company’s long-term success focused on internal manufacturing capability. The Senior Control Systems Engineer is creative, team oriented, and has hands on experience in process and building automation technologies required to support a cGMP manufacturing facility.

Ownership and administration of equipment control systems in a cGMP regulated environment
Identify, lead, and support system improvements; development of detailed specifications, engineering documents, and standard operating procedures
Lead technical root cause analysis, incident investigations, and troubleshooting issues related to electrical, instrumentation, and equipment control systems
Supply information and technical data for securing spare parts
Provide responsive customer support with emphasis on customer satisfaction
Perform start up and commissioning activities as required
Work in a collaborative team environment and interact with other support groups such as Engineering, Facilities, Validation, Quality Assurance, IT, and Manufacturing
Interact and oversee work of vendors and/or contractors
Develop and implement preventative maintenance programs for control systems

Bachelor’s Degree in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science, Chemical Engineering, Biotech Engineering or related life science engineering with 5+ years’ experience in operations/manufacturing environment
Manufacturing control systems automation background focused specifically in design, installation, programming, validation and lifecycle maintenance of automated equipment specifically in GMP environment
Experience in change control, non-conformance, corrective and preventative actions, and validation practices
Experience with Rockwell Automation is strongly desired (Factory Talk SE, PlantPAX, Studio 5000)
Experience with Johnson Controls, Data Historian (Factory Talk Historian SE, PI) and system integration of OEM equipment (OPC communication)
Knowledge of GAMP software development lifecycle, ANSI/ISA-S88 and S95 industry standards and 21 CFR Part 11
Experience with network architecture including TCP/IP, Routing, Switching, Network IDS/IPS, Active Directory, Domain Integration and Firewalls
Excited about working collaboratively in a fast paced, team-based environment",4.4,"Homology Medicines, Inc.
4.4","Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
91,Development Test Engineer - R&D,$41k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Summary: TTI Floor Care is home to some of the world's best-known floor care brands - Hoover, Dirt Devil and Oreck. Our dynamic team, located in Charlotte, North Carolina is passionate about creating innovative products through a user centered design approach. As a member of the Research & Development team you will have the opportunity to work across brands and categories in the consumer and commercial industries. The fast-paced work is rewarding and covers the entire range of corded and cordless floor care appliances.

As a critical part of the Advanced Engineering group, this Development Test engineer will be a key contributor for developing new consumer, commercial products and systems. You will utilize standard test and fabrication equipment to verify physical functioning units which could include; creative experimentation, problem-solving skills to create and validate new solutions, complete execution of engineering test plans. You will collaborate with CFD Engineers, Test Engineers, Mechanical Engineers, Electrical Engineers and Industrial Designers to maximize performance. The perfect candidate for this role will be self-motivated and have a keen interest in understanding how things work. They will be patient, persistent, detail oriented and capable of taking constructive feedback while working collaboratively.

Essential Responsibilities:
Provide product focused engineering testing support to the Advanced Engineering group for a variety of consumer and commercial products
Assist in the design, build, and prototyping to iteratively to prove out design concepts
Test product using standard test equipment and procedures, and analyze results to evaluate performance and issue recommendations
Develop new tests to troubleshoot product designs as needed
Read schematic drawings and engineering instructions for assembling electronics units, applying engineering knowledge.
Drives innovation and incorporation of next generation: Stay abreast of relevant technologies and assess innovations regarding their applicability to floor care and other consumer products.
Responsible for lab organization and efficiencies, creating and maintaining test fixtures and test equipment
Requirements/Qualifications:
Education: Associates Degree in Electrical Engineering Technology, Mechanical Engineering, Mechatronics or equivalent work experience. Ability to read and interpret schematics, assembly drawings, procedure manuals, parts lists
Personal computer skills required to configure and load software, analyze, graph and communicate data
Familiarity in supporting control of AC and DC motors, pumps, motor controllers, and electronic circuits or technologies in similar field. Familiarity with lithium-ion batteries
Minimum 1-year experience (including Co-ops and internships) in test/validation, system test plans and troubleshooting.
Routinely work in a hands-on manner.
Solid understanding of equipment, tools and software to design, test and analyze systems and components as well as electronic lab equipment, calibration, etc.
Understanding in the use of oscilloscopes, DVM's, power supplies, data acquisition systems, power analyzers, etc. Matlab and LabVIEW is a plus.
Experience with Creo or equivalent CAD package a plus
Self-starter, highly motivated with good organizational and time management skills.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills (written and verbal) within and outside the organization, including the ability to discuss and explain complex technical details to non-technical audiences.
Pro-active approach with risk analysis, including the development of mitigation strategies before issues arise.
Strong project management skills, attention to detail, and strong analytical and interpretative skills.
Proficient in common office applications (MS Office, PowerPoint, Excel, Project).
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by employees assigned to this position. This document is subject to change at any time and is not intended to be exhaustive of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required by employees with this position title. The physical requirements described on the supplemental Occupational Worksheet are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of the job. Reasonable accommodations may be made upon request.

#LI-CC1

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",3.3,"TTI Floor Care North America Inc.
3.3","Charlotte, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
92,Civil Associate II (Structural Software Engineer),$38k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Michael Baker International is a leading provider of engineering, development, intelligence and technology solutions with global reach and mobility. The firm offers a comprehensive range of innovative services and solutions in support of federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of private development and commercial clients. Michael Baker International’s focus is on the safety and security of people across the world through planning and engineering improvements to infrastructure and the environment, and through protection of our quality of life and freedom in support of national and international security. With more than $1 billion in annual revenue, Michael Baker International has more than 5,000 employees in over 80 offices located across the U.S. and internationally, and is ranked as the 26th largest design firm in the U.S. by Engineering News Record (ENR). Michael Baker International’s Mission is to make a difference by providing innovative solutions to sustain the future and further the safety, security and quality of life for people across the globe by providing the highest level of expertise, unmatched quality and effective project teams for a diverse range of projects and clients. Michael Baker International offers excellent benefit packages that includes: Medical, Dental, Vision, Disability Insurance, Life Insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts, Additional Paid Time Off, Flex-Time, 401-K Retirement Plan, Tuition Reimbursement and Employee Credit Union. To learn more, please visit us on the web at www.mbakerintl.com . Michael Baker International is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer - M/F/Disability/Veteran/e-Verify Employer

WHO WE ARE

Michael Baker International is a leading provider of architectural, engineering and consulting services , including design, planning, environmental, construction and program management. The company provides its comprehensive range of services and solutions to support U.S. federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of commercial clients. Michael Baker’s more than 3,000 employees across nearly 100 locations are committed to a culture of innovation, collaboration and technological advancement to help solve challenges for clients and communities throughout the country. To learn more, visit https://mbakerintl.com/ .

BRIDGE PRACTICE

Michael Baker International has addressed bridge design, construction and preservation challenges with innovative and sustainable solutions. Exemplifying its depth and versatility in the bridge space, Michael Baker International, ranked Number Five by Engineering News-Record in its annual ranking of Bridge Design Firms in the United States, has partnered with clients on a full spectrum of bridge types-from conventional grade separations to major, complex river crossings, including trusses, arches, box girders and cable-stayed bridges.

DESCRIPTION

Combining a degree in Civil Engineering and knowledge/ education in computer science is an awesome career, but not an easy opportunity path to find. At Michael Baker International, this career is a reality!

We are looking for a Civil Associate II for our Moon Twp., PA location that has 2-4 years' experience ready to work on bridge related software projects .

This is great opportunity with career growth potential and the opportunity to contribute on large cutting-edge projects. The engineer/developer will be part of Michael Baker’s Bridge Software Group. This group has been applying computer technology to the bridge profession for over 30 years, using bridge engineering experience combined with a wide range of programming skills.

The American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials (AASHTO) contracted with Michael Baker In 1999 to develop a comprehensive bridge software package to guide bridge engineers through the initial design phase of a bridge and to maintain data for analysis and load rating throughout the lifespan of the bridge. The software development has been continuous since then and has been expanded to include nearly all bridge types designed and maintained by member states throughout the nation.

In addition, the software group maintains and enhances software projects for the Pennsylvania Department of Transportation (PennDOT). These projects include software that designs and drafts simple span steel and prestressed concrete bridges (BRADD3-Bridge Automated Design and Drafting) and a group of analysis/design/rating programs for prestressed concrete beams, steel beams, steel floorbeams, abutments and retaining walls, concrete box culverts, elastomeric bearing pads, and sign structures.

This position will be responsible for utilizing a combination of bridge engineering skills and software development skills to perform tasks on these projects. This position also involves working under the direct supervision of registered Professional Engineers and involves both bridge engineering and software engineering and related skills and often crosses over to work with our bridge design group.

Michael Baker International offers competitive salaries/benefits, a great work environment, the ability to work on high profile projects, significant professional growth potential and the strength and stability that only comes from 80 years of making a difference.

PROFESSIONAL REQUIREMENTS

Bachelor’s Degree in Civil Engineering or related field
2-4 years of experience under a registered Professional Engineer
Knowledge of structural analysis and finite element analysis
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Desire to pursue a career in software development related to bridges and transportation structures

PREFERRED SKILLS

Passing the Fundamentals of Engineering exam and obtaining an Engineer-In-Training certificate
Knowledge of bridge engineering and AASHTO’s bridge design and evaluation specifications
Strong structural engineering background
Knowledge of software programming using:
C++ and/or C# development and debugging
Other programming experience: VB.NET, FORTRAN, Matlab
Finite element analysis programming
Domain design using OOP
GUI design
OpenGL or general computer graphics
BIM for bridges or 3D modeling
Producing XML Reports (C++/C#)
Software testing

MICHAEL BAKER INTERNATIONAL EEO STATEMENT

Michael Baker International is proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. Michael Baker International provides equal employment opportunity for all persons, in all facets of employment. Michael Baker International maintains a drug-free workplace and performs pre-employment substance abuse testing and background checks. We encourage all qualified applicants to apply for any open position for which they feel they are qualified and all will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship status, marital status, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other legally protected status.

EEO is the Law. Applicants to and employees of Michael Baker International are protected under Federal law from discrimination.",3.5,"Michael Baker International
3.5","Moon Township, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
93,Civil Associate I (Structural Software Engineer),$37k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Michael Baker International is a leading provider of engineering, development, intelligence and technology solutions with global reach and mobility. The firm offers a comprehensive range of innovative services and solutions in support of federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of private development and commercial clients. Michael Baker International’s focus is on the safety and security of people across the world through planning and engineering improvements to infrastructure and the environment, and through protection of our quality of life and freedom in support of national and international security. With more than $1 billion in annual revenue, Michael Baker International has more than 5,000 employees in over 80 offices located across the U.S. and internationally, and is ranked as the 26th largest design firm in the U.S. by Engineering News Record (ENR). Michael Baker International’s Mission is to make a difference by providing innovative solutions to sustain the future and further the safety, security and quality of life for people across the globe by providing the highest level of expertise, unmatched quality and effective project teams for a diverse range of projects and clients. Michael Baker International offers excellent benefit packages that includes: Medical, Dental, Vision, Disability Insurance, Life Insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts, Additional Paid Time Off, Flex-Time, 401-K Retirement Plan, Tuition Reimbursement and Employee Credit Union. To learn more, please visit us on the web at www.mbakerintl.com . Michael Baker International is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer - M/F/Disability/Veteran/e-Verify Employer

WHO WE ARE

Michael Baker International is a leading provider of architectural, engineering and consulting services , including design, planning, environmental, construction and program management. The company provides its comprehensive range of services and solutions to support U.S. federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of commercial clients. Michael Baker’s more than 3,000 employees across nearly 100 locations are committed to a culture of innovation, collaboration and technological advancement to help solve challenges for clients and communities throughout the country. To learn more, visit https://mbakerintl.com/ .

BRIDGE PRACTICE

Michael Baker International has addressed bridge design, construction and preservation challenges with innovative and sustainable solutions. Exemplifying its depth and versatility in the bridge space, Michael Baker International, ranked Number Five by Engineering News-Record in its annual ranking of Bridge Design Firms in the United States, has partnered with clients on a full spectrum of bridge types-from conventional grade separations to major, complex river crossings, including trusses, arches, box girders and cable-stayed bridges.

DESCRIPTION

Combining a degree in Civil Engineering and knowledge/ education in computer science is an awesome career, but not an easy opportunity path to find. At Michael Baker International, this career is a reality!

We are looking for a Civil Associate I for our Moon Twp., PA location that has 0-2 years' experience ready to work on bridge related software projects .

This is great opportunity with career growth potential and the opportunity to contribute on large cutting-edge projects. The engineer/developer will be part of Michael Baker’s Bridge Software Group. This group has been applying computer technology to the bridge profession for over 30 years, using bridge engineering experience combined with a wide range of programming skills.

The American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials (AASHTO) contracted with Michael Baker In 1999 to develop a comprehensive bridge software package to guide bridge engineers through the initial design phase of a bridge and to maintain data for analysis and load rating throughout the lifespan of the bridge. The software development has been continuous since then and has been expanded to include nearly all bridge types designed and maintained by member states throughout the nation.

In addition, the software group maintains and enhances software projects for the Pennsylvania Department of Transportation (PennDOT). These projects include software that designs and drafts simple span steel and prestressed concrete bridges (BRADD3-Bridge Automated Design and Drafting) and a group of analysis/design/rating programs for prestressed concrete beams, steel beams, steel floorbeams, abutments and retaining walls, concrete box culverts, elastomeric bearing pads, and sign structures.

This position will be responsible for utilizing a combination of bridge engineering skills and software development skills to perform tasks on these projects. This position also involves working under the direct supervision of registered Professional Engineers and involves both bridge engineering and software engineering and related skills and often crosses over to work with our bridge design group.

Michael Baker International offers competitive salaries/benefits, a great work environment, the ability to work on high profile projects, significant professional growth potential and the strength and stability that only comes from 80 years of making a difference.

PROFESSIONAL REQUIREMENTS

Bachelor’s Degree in Civil Engineering or related field

0-2 years of experience under a registered Professional Engineer

Knowledge of structural analysis and finite element analysis

Excellent oral and written communication skills

Desire to pursue a career in software development related to bridges and transportation structures

PREFERRED SKILLS

Passing the Fundamentals of Engineering exam and obtaining an Engineer-In-Training certificate

Knowledge of bridge engineering and AASHTO’s bridge design and evaluation specifications

Strong structural engineering background

Knowledge of software programming using:

C++ and/or C# development and debugging

Other programming experience: VB.NET, FORTRAN, MATLAB

Finite element analysis programming

Domain design using OOP

GUI design

OpenGL or general computer graphics

BIM for bridges or 3D modeling

Producing XML Reports (C++/C#)

Software testing

MICHAEL BAKER INTERNATIONAL EEO STATEMENT

Michael Baker International is proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. Michael Baker International provides equal employment opportunity for all persons, in all facets of employment. Michael Baker International maintains a drug-free workplace and performs pre-employment substance abuse testing and background checks. We encourage all qualified applicants to apply for any open position for which they feel they are qualified and all will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship status, marital status, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other legally protected status.

EEO is the Law. Applicants to and employees of Michael Baker International are protected under Federal law from discrimination.",3.5,"Michael Baker International
3.5","Moon Township, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
94,Senior Engineer of SSD NAND Characterization,$90k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Responsibility:

As part of this role, the candidate will perform but not limited to the following functions:
Work with the Firmware team to define the needed VU commands, develop, implement, debug and run firmware tools for SSD level NAND characterization.
Develop and implement test items and test scripts for internal test platform to validate SSD level NAND reliability and performance.
Analyze customer requirements and dealing with customer issues.
Work with NAND reliability team to deliver NAND reliability requirements and validating through SSD level NAND characterization.
Perform collaboration with other stakeholders for SSD architecture/FW/SoC and NAND team.
Qualification:
BS degree in engineering is required
5+ years of hands-on development/analysis experience in SSD or storage systems.
Expertise knowledge in NAND reliability test and JEDEC standards.
Hands-on experience of SSD level testing, performance measurement.
Ability to work on SSD system performance analysis with flash friendly file systems and databases.
Ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment.
Knowledge of SSD level NAND management schemes such as Read Reclaim and Background Media Scan.
Excellent oral and written skills for communication and documentation.
Data process and analysis using C/C++, Matlab or Python, Spotfire.
Self-motivated, strong team player
Preferred Qualification:
Experience in SSD customer engagement is a plus.
Experience in state of the art of NAND flash memory, 3D-NAND experience is a plus.
Experience with multi-ARM core based development is a plus.",3.4,"SK Hynix Memory Solutions America Inc.
3.4","San Jose, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
95,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"You could say Brightree by ResMed is a technology company. And that’s true. But Brightree is, at its heart, about people. We develop innovative, end-to-end technology solutions and services for people facing everyday challenges in the post-acute care industry. Brightree helps streamline processes, improve efficiency, and increase profitability. For over fifteen years, organizations big and small have put their trust in us—for our wide-ranging solutions, our leadership, and our unmatched customer service. Going to work each day and creating new ways to positively impact our customers’ businesses and the lives of patients is just what we do. Because Brightree is, after all, about people.

To learn more about Brightree technology and solutions watch this short video by our CEO: https://vimeo.com/293016800

Let's talk about Responsibilities:
**Location - Peachtree Corners, GA***
Work as part of a team focused on researching, analyzing, and implementing the most highly performance applications possible. Collaborate with other engineers and product owners to identify best in class software solutions to complex problems in the HME industry
Maintain and refactor existing based on research and performance profiling
Lead technical design discussions that produces high-performance, highly scalable and resilient software components
DB design/changes
Provide unit tests for all code; assist quality assurance resources with developing test plans
Assist with the development of performance tests and contribute to performance testing framework development
Conduct code reviews with other developers, including security checks
Promote SOLID design principles for software development in a cloud-based environment
Mentoring junior members of the team
Participate in technical interviews
You are passionate about software and technology and you are relentless in pursuing software performance and optimization objectives
Ability to analyze data and make recommendations based on data insights
You share our customer centric culture
You like to be challenged and you enjoy solving highly complex problems
You are a great team player who possess strong interpersonal and communication skills

Let's talk about Skills and Experience:

5+ years of experience in software engineering, preferably for a software company using Microsoft technologies in a web-based application.
You are experienced with a range of tools and techniques for performance profiling, debugging, and log analysis
Any experience with performance testing tools and approaches; particularly MSTEST, JMeter is a plus
Knowledge of .Net (C# and/or VB.net), ASP.NET and web technologies such as SignalR, Web API, WCF, View.js, Angular, TypeScript, JavaScript, CSS, HTML and Ajax.
Experience with MS SQL Server (TSQL/SQL) in a high-volume transaction environment; ability to understand SQL query plans and develop solutions
In-depth knowledge of Microsoft-focused software systems and their architectures
OO knowledge and practical experience of design patterns
Practical experience with source code configuration, versioning, and promotion
Excellent problem solving, issue identification and technical documentation skills
Ability to manage multiple concurrent priorities and meeting deadlines
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Experience using VS 2017/19, SQL Server 2014/2017, .Net 4.7/Core & C# 6, 7 techniques
Agile software methodology experience
Experience working in a SaaS model
Experience working in environments with a DevOps Culture and exposure to Continuous Delivery is a great plus

#LI-NF1

Joining us is more than saying “yes” to making the world a healthier place. It’s discovering a career that’s challenging, supportive and inspiring. Where a culture driven by excellence helps you not only meet your goals, but also create new ones. We focus on creating a diverse and inclusive culture, encouraging individual expression in the workplace and thrive on the innovative ideas this generates. If this sounds like the workplace for you, apply now!",3.5,"Brightree
3.5","Peachtree Corners, GA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
96,Senior Data Engineer (2 Openings--Urgent Need),-1,"Why Should You Join First Advantage?

First Advantage is in the midst of a technology revolution, and the best time to join us is right now! We are developing incredible solutions, working with amazing customers, and we would love to see how your skills could help get people back to work. Our brand new Data team is recruiting several passionate people in greater metropolitan areas across the Central and Eastern time zones (namely Chicago, Atlanta, Charlotte, Austin, Boston, Houston, Columbus, Tampa, etc) in the US! This opportunity is for remote work, with occasional travel to our Atlanta office.

First Advantage has over 4000 employees across the world and does over 71 million background screens a year, so if you’re looking for opportunities working with advanced technologies to produce awesome user experiences and securely process high-volume transactions leveraging massive amounts of data, then this is the place for you!

We work with Fortune 100 and Global 500 hundred companies, so your work will directly impact some of the largest enterprises in the world!

We need talent that is Informed, Insightful, Transformational, and Progressive

We’re looking for two Sr Data Engineers! You’re our ideal candidate if you 5+ years of strong experience and expertise with SQL, 3+ years of experience working with Python, Hive/Hadoop, and Apache Spark (RStudio is a plus), and you have strong data analytics and troubleshooting skills. The Sr Data Engineers manage the complex data flow across multiple Enterprise systems and will be working with business and technical teams to load data from various internal and external sources to FADV data warehouses and DataLake systems hosted from on premise or cloud. We’re looking for someone who can do the deeply analytical work, and knows how to code. If you meet those requirements, and have experience working with integration software packages like Oracle Data Integrator or Mulesoft, you could be a great fit!

Our brand new Data team have the opportunity to build a game-changing solution from the ground up, and that solution will drive the next generation of background screening. Joining our team right now is an incredible opportunity to be on the ground floor of our technology transformation, and will give you a chance to make a real difference!

Minimum Requirements
Minimum of 5 years of strong experience and expertise with SQL
Minimum of 3+ years of experience working with Python, Hive/Hadoop, Apache Spark. RStudio is a Plus
Strong communication skills and creative skills
Strong data analytics and troubleshooting skills
Preferred Requirements
RStudio, and experience with data integration software packages like Oracle Data Integrator or Mulesoft
Strong working experience in an OEM product company that with variety of integrated customer base
Experience with programming languages like Java/.NET
Strong experience in Relations Database and Big Data analytics
Knowledge of other BI tools like Oracle Business Intelligence, SQL Server Reporting, Cognos
Experience with machine learning models (neural, bayesian, clustering algorithms, decision tree, supervised learning, unsupervised learning)",3.5,"First Advantage Corporation
3.5",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
97,Distribution Data Technical Operations Engineer (IT Leader),$63k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"About This Opportunity

A proactive, technical leadership role supporting distribution center production, focusing on maximizing IT systems reliability and operational performance. Overall site responsibility for stability and technology services within the distribution center.

Use your skills, experience and talents to be a part of groundbreaking thinking and visionary goals.

Daily Operations - Overall responsibility for distribution center data center operations and IT systems functions being accomplished on a daily basis. Manage vendor resource and workflow to ensure technology service initiatives are supported and service level agreements are met.

Data Center Management - Ensure the distribution center data centers are maintained to predefined standards (prototype and best practice). Manage all technology system infrastructure within the distribution center. Understands different technology system platforms, applications, hardware and infrastructure and how they interact with and impact the distribution center.

Vendor Management /Escalation - Provides appropriate feedback and takes appropriate follow up actions to ensure Vendor SLAs are met. Provides necessary training and onboarding for vendor technicians servicing the distribution center.

Floor Time Flexibility to be on call 24/7 as well as ability to support other sites as needed

Requirements

Bachelors degree in IT related field or equivalent experience

Strong technical aptitude and skills including network, server, telephone, and desktop experience

Strong technical knowledge of operations hardware and applications

Excellent communication skills and ability to manage vendor partners

Strong reasoning, troubleshooting, problem solving and analytical skills

Ability to adjust working hours and/or respond to on-call escalations

Similar Industry Titles and Key Words: Support Supervisor, Desktop Support Manager, Help Desk Manager, Data Center Technician

Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA)

Target will provide reasonable accommodations (such as a qualified sign language interpreter or other personal assistance) with the application process upon your request as required to comply with applicable laws. If you have a disability and require assistance in this application process, please visit your nearest Target store or Distribution Center or reach out to Guest Services at 1-800-440-0680 for additional information.",3.6,"Target
3.6","Logan Township, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,General Merchandise & Superstores,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1
98,Data Engineer,$69k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Engineer will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture. The ideal candidate is experienced at data wrangling, enjoys data systems, and enjoys building things from the ground up. The data engineer will support the analytics teams at our client’s site by creating processes and programs to ingest the many unstructured files we receive, transform the data into a standard form and load it into the ecosystem. The right candidate will be excited with the prospect of optimizing and redesigning the client’s data architecture for the next set of data initiatives.
Use tools to build processes to extract, transform and load data from multiple sources
Assemble complex data sets that meet business requirements
Identify, design and implement processes to automate manual processes
Create structured datasets from unstructured data from multiple sources
Experience working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
QUALIFICATIONS
3-5 years of experience with SQL query language plus experience creating complex queries
3-5 years of experience with Hadoop; specifically, Hive, HiveQL and HDFS
3-5 years of experience building processes supporting ETL work
1-3 years of experience building and optimizing big data pipelines and data sets
1-3 years of experience with programming languages: Python, Scala, PySpark
Strong Analytical skills
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Information Systems or some other related field
OneMagnify powers business performance for its clients with actionable analytics, compelling marketing communications through brand strategy, and technology solutions for companies here and around the world. We think that’s pretty cool, making us an exciting place to work. But there is so much more to this employee-centric company. For example, it’s all the fun and important things we do—like our charitable giving team program, summer poker walks, quarterly cake day and, of course, the creative client solutions we deliver daily. It all stems from a culture of caring—for each other, our clients and the world around us.

OneMagnify is an equal opportunity employer.
OneMagnify is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.7,"OneMagnify
4.7","Dearborn, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1967,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
99,Analytic Software Engineer - TS/SCI w/FSP Required,-1,"Job Description:
Join our team of talented engineers in the Fort Meade area supporting critical national security programs. As an analytic software engineer, youll work closely with mission SMEs to develop niche analytics for the Intelligence Community. These may be batch analytics that operate over large volumes of data at-rest, or they may be streaming analytics that operate over smaller volumes of data in-motion. When operational, your analytics will support Phoenixs core mission of Arming the Analyst.

This position will support multiple programs and is open to both mid-level and senior candidates. A typical day includes engineering activities across a mid-sized team, exploring mission data sets, working with mission SMEs to understand tradecraft, and developing analytics to support that tradecraft. All development will be conducted within an Agile process using standard Scrum practices (daily stands-ups, sprint planning, sprint demos/retrospectives).

*** Top Secret SCI Clearance with Full-Scope Polygraph Required ***

Technical Skills Required
5+ years of experience in Java software development
3+ years of experience with distributed technologies such as Hadoop, Spark and Kafka
3+ years of experience implementing RESTful web services
3+ years of experience processing XML and JSON data formats
3+ years of experience using Git, JUnit, Maven and Jenkins
3+years of experience developing software in a Linux environment
3+ years of experience supporting Defense or Intelligence programs
Technical Skill Preferred
Experience developing analytics with MapReduce, Spark or similar technologies
Experience with distributed databases such as Accumulo or HBase
Experience working in an Agile environment using Jira and Confluence
Basic understanding of Python or Scala
Basic Machine Learning algorithms & techniques
Benefits Offered:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% Company paid
401K Automatic 10% company contribution; no matching required
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Company laptop built to your specification
Referral Bonuses Upfront AND Annually Recurring
Open Source Bonuses Contribute to our GitHub projects
Professional Development Paid training, Certifications and Enrichment
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is an engineering services company that protects US Warfighters and supports US Intelligence efforts. As a small business operating in the Baltimore & DC areas, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Phoenix specializes in inter-agency functionality that connects our federal, military and commercial clients with shared mission solutions. We do this with Big Data technologies, Machine Learning techniques, Cloud-Hosted platforms, and enterprise architectures.

Our team is geographically dispersed across the country. Thus, we rely on innovative techniques to advance our employees' skills and promote company culture:
We incentivize employees to participate in our Open-Source GitHub projects
We incentivize and support employees in writing whitepapers for the community
We invest in research and development (R&D) to expand our mission capabilities
We promote technical discussion across Slack, Google Meet and Social Media platforms
With these innovations, Phoenix provides a dynamic and inclusive environment for our employees. Please visit us at https://www.phoenix-opsgroup.com/ for more information.

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
